BUILDING  AND  MAINTAINING  A  HEALTHY

AND  STRONG  NASA  WORKFORCE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  17,  2007

Serial No. 110–31

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

35–235PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

HON.  MARK  UDALL,  Colorado,  Chairman

DAVID  WU,  Oregon
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MIKE  ROSS,  Arizona
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
VACANCY

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
RICHARD  OBERMANN  Subcommittee  Staff  Director
PAM  WHITNEY  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
KEN  MONROE  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member
ED  FEDDEMAN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

DEVIN  BRYANT  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  17,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement by Representative Mark Udall, Chairman, Subcommittee on Space
and  Aeronautics,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.  House  of
Representatives ....................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Witnesses:

Ms.  Toni  Dawsey,  Assistant  Administrator,  Human  Capital  Management;
Chief  Human  Capital  Officer,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administra-
tion (NASA)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Mr.  John  G.  Stewart,  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  Fellow;

Member, Panel on NASA Multi-sector Workforce

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Dr. David C. Black, President Emeritus, Universities Space Research Associa-
tion;  Adjunct  Professor,  Physics  and  Astronomy  Department,  Rice  Univer-
sity; Co-Chair, Committee on Issues Affecting the Future of the U.S. Space
Science  and  Engineering  Workforce,  National  Research  Council,  The  Na-
tional Academies

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Lee  Stone,  Legislative  Representative,  NASA  Council  of  IFPTE  Locals,

International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Discussion

Opinions on NASA’s Response to National Academies’ and NAPA’s Reports
How NASA Is Achieving Workforce Goals .........................................................
Suggested Resources for Funding NASA ...........................................................
Introduction of Mr. Feeney as Ranking Member ..............................................
Suggestions  for  Utilizing  the  Current  Pool  of  Workers  and  Developing  a
Workforce for the Future .................................................................................
Future Vision for NASA ......................................................................................
Age Demographics of the NASA Workforce .......................................................
Workforce Implementation Plan .........................................................................
Importance of In-house Scientists at NASA ......................................................
Ratio of Permanent and Nonpermanent Civil Servants ...................................

(III)

13
14

15
16

17
19

24
26

28
30
38

38
40

53
55
56
58

60
61
63
65
65
67

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Ms.  Toni  Dawsey,  Assistant  Administrator,  Human  Capital  Management;
Chief  Human  Capital  Officer,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administra-
tion (NASA) ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  John  G.  Stewart,  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  Fellow;

Member, Panel on NASA Multi-sector Workforce

Dr. David C. Black, President Emeritus, Universities Space Research Associa-
tion;  Adjunct  Professor,  Physics  and  Astronomy  Department,  Rice  Univer-
sity; Co-Chair, Committee on Issues Affecting the Future of the U.S. Space
Science  and  Engineering  Workforce,  National  Research  Council,  The  Na-
tional Academies ..................................................................................................
Dr.  Lee  Stone,  Legislative  Representative,  NASA  Council  of  IFPTE  Locals,
International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers .................

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Supplemental  Information  for  the  Record  by  Dr.  John  Stewart,  Academy
Fellow and Member of the NASA Multi-sector Workforce Panel .....................
NASA: Balancing a Multi-sector Workforce to Achieve a Healthy Organization,
A  Report  by  a  Panel  of  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration,
February 2007 ......................................................................................................

Page

70

79

82

85

92

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

BUILDING  AND  MAINTAINING  A  HEALTHY

AND  STRONG  NASA  WORKFORCE

THURSDAY,  MAY  17,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:03  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Udall
[Chair of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Building and Maintaining a Healthy

and Strong NASA Workforce

THURSDAY, MAY 17, 2007

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

On  Thursday,  May  17,  2007  at  10:00  am,  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, Subcommittee on Space and Aeronautics will hold a hearing to examine
National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  workforce  issues  and  the
recommendations of independent review panels for ensuring the health and vitality
of  the  NASA  workforce  in  the  21st  century.  This  is  the  first  in  a  series  of  NASA
workforce  hearings.  Later  hearings  will  address  Shuttle  transition  workforce  issues
and specific legislative proposals.
Witnesses:

Witnesses scheduled to testify at the hearing include the following:

Ms. Toni Dawsey

Assistant Administrator for Human Capital Management, NASA

Fellow,  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration,  Member,  NASA  Multi-sector

Mr. John G. Stewart

Workforce Panel
Dr. David Black

Co-Chair, Committee on Meeting the Workforce Needs for the National Vision for

Space Exploration, National Research Council
Dr. Lee Stone

Legislative Representative, NASA Council of IFPTE Locals, International Federa-

tion of Professional and Technical Engineers

Background
Potential Issues

The following are some of the potential issues that might be raised at the hearing:
• Is  NASA’s  Workforce  Strategy  the  Right  Approach  for  Building  the
NASA  Workforce?—NASA  is  undertaking  a  sizable  shift  of  programmatic
activities  as  the  Agency  endeavors  to  carry  out  the  President’s  Vision  for
Space  Exploration.  Specifically,  NASA  is  in  the  midst  of  the  following
changes:

Æ Implementing the Vision for Space Exploration;
Æ Retiring the Space Shuttle by 2010;
Æ Completing the International Space Station;
Æ Developing the Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle (CEV) and the Ares Crew

Launch Vehicle (CLV);

Æ Refocusing the aeronautics program;
Æ Dealing with a flatter funding profile than previously assumed; and
Æ Encountering a growing, retirement-eligible workforce.

These changes will have a significant impact on the NASA workforce in large
part  because  the  Agency  has  not  developed  a  human  space  transportation
system  in  over  25  years.  Pursuant  to  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2005,
the  Agency  has  developed  a  Workforce  Strategy  to  ensure  that  NASA  pos-
sesses a workforce of the appropriate size and skills to carry out its programs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

However,  the  strategy  only  covers  the  period  through  FY  2011.  Is  NASA’s
Workforce Strategy the right approach for building NASA’s future workforce?
How  well  does  the  strategy  address  the  two  recent  independent  reports  on
NASA’s workforce—the National Academy of Public Administration’s (NAPA)
NASA: Balancing a Multi-sector Workforce to Achieve a Healthy Organization
and the National Academies’ Building a Better NASA Workforce: Meeting the
Workforce Needs for the National Vision for Space Exploration? What, if any,
gaps  or  shortcomings  do  the  reports  identify  in  the  Workforce  Strategy,  and
what actions does NASA plan to take in response?

• NASA’s Workforce Strategy and Long-Term Planning—NASA’s Strategy
states  that  ‘‘The  workforce  strategy  allows  NASA  to  deal  effectively  with  the
critical issues now facing the Agency, particularly a significant amount of un-
covered  capacity  [workers  whose  time  is  not  allocated  to  projects  at  100  per-
cent]. . ..  NASA  does  recognize  that  some  future  events,  such  as  the  termi-
nation of the Space Shuttle Program, require long-term planning. . ..’’ On the
other  hand,  the  Strategy  notes  that  ‘‘Planning  is  a  task  requiring  sensitivity
to  ongoing  changes  in  programs,  budgets,  political  priorities,  and  the  labor
market.’’ What are the underlying assumptions on which the strategy was de-
veloped?  Was  the  strategy  aimed  at  responding  to  near-term  workforce  chal-
lenges,  and  if  so,  is  the  existing  strategy  sufficient  for  long-term  planning?
NASA  has  developed  a  strategic  plan  that  outlines  the  Agency’s  goals  and
programs for the next decade. Does NASA have a workforce strategy and im-
plementation  plan  that  supports  the  Agency’s  strategic  plan?  How  robust  is
the  Workforce  Strategy  against  potential  changes  in  resources  and  priorities
that Congress or a new Administration might have for NASA?

• Workforce  Strategy  and  NASA’s  Contract  Workforce—NASA’s  Work-
force  Strategy  reflects  an  analysis  of  competencies  and  approaches  for  build-
ing  and  strengthening  the  Agency’s  18,000  civil  servant  workforce.  However,
the Agency also relies on some 44,000 contractors to execute its projects. The
National Academies report states that ‘‘in the short-term, NASA does not pos-
sess  the  requisite  in-house  personnel  with  the  experience  in  human  space
flight  systems  needed  to  implement  the  VSE  [Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration]. . .. Much of the workforce on which NASA has historically relied, and
will  continue  to  rely,  exists  outside  the  Agency. . .’’  in  industry  and  at  uni-
versities. Does NASA plan to include contractors and academic researchers in
its  strategic  workforce  decisions?  How  is  NASA  making  long-term  decisions
about the number of contractors it may need, at which centers, and for which
competencies,  skill  areas,  and  positions  it  will  need  those  contractors?  Does
NASA  have  the  right  infrastructure  and  in-house  skills  for  managing  con-
tracts and procurements?

• The  Pipeline  of  NASA  Workers—NASA,  like  other  government  agencies,
has  used  hiring  freezes  to  control  the  size  of  its  workforce  and  avoid  Reduc-
tions in Force (RIFs). Opportunities to bring entry level civil servants into the
workforce  depend,  in  part,  on  attrition,  buy-outs,  or  acceptances  of  early-re-
tirement  offers.  This  practice  has  led  to  a  NASA  workforce  that  is  comprised
of  an  increasing  number  of  retirement-eligible  workers  and  an  insufficient
number of younger workers who can rise to leadership positions in the future.
The  National  Academies  report  notes  that  NASA  will  suffer  a  long-term
shortage  of  in-house  technical  expertise  in  human  space  flight  systems  if  the
Agency does not take steps to improve the pipeline of future leaders and man-
agers.  What  steps  is  NASA  taking  to  ensure  a  pipeline  in  its  workforce?  The
independent reports also recommend improvements to NASA’s mentoring, in-
ternship, cooperative education, and graduate fellow programs in the interest
of  attracting  new  talent  to  NASA.  In  addition,  the  National  Academies  rec-
ommends  that  small  science  space  flight  programs  be  used  as  opportunities
to train younger workers and build the skills in program/project management
and  systems  engineering  the  Agency  has  says  it  needs.  Does  NASA  plan  to
make  any  changes  to  its  training  and  recruitment  programs?  How  effective
are  buy-outs  and  early-retirement  offers  in  opening  positions  for  younger
workers,  and  how  is  NASA  ensuring  that  those  offers  do  not  eliminate  indi-
viduals with skills that are difficult to replace?

• The  Workforce  Strategy  and  NASA’s  Aeronautics  and  Science  Pro-
grams—NASA’s workforce strategy identifies a moderate diminished need for
Full-Time  Equivalents  [FTEs]  in  space  sciences,  biological  sciences,  physical
sciences,  among  other  competencies.  The  National  Academies  report  rec-
ommends  that  ‘‘NASA  should  assess  whether  the  skill  levels  of  in-house  sci-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

entists at each field center are appropriate to fulfilling that center’s scientific
leadership and service responsibilities and should ensure that appropriate ef-
forts  are  made  to  maintain  the  scientific  competency  and  currency  of  each
center’s scientific workforce.’’ How well does the strategy address the need to
develop  and  maintain  healthy  science  and  aeronautics  programs?  Were
NASA’s  assessments  of  needs  in  the  space,  biological,  and  physical  sciences
based  on  the  Agency’s  understanding  of  the  core  capabilities  needs  and  the
number  of  individuals  that  can  meet  those  core  capabilities?  Or  rather,  were
NASA’s assessments based on the projected resources available for those dis-
ciplines  in  view  of  the  Agency’s  other  priorities?  Does  NASA  have  mecha-
nisms  for  assessing  the  research  and  engineering  capabilities  needed  from
universities to support current and potential NASA programs?

• Other  Challenges  Facing  NASA’s  Workforce—During  the  June  2006
Science Committee workforce hearing, a NASA official testified that the Agen-
cy  had  reduced  the  problem  of  ‘‘uncovered  capacity’’  (workers  whose  time  is
not  allocated  to  projects  at  the  100  percent  level)  by  two-thirds,  but  still  car-
ried  significant  uncovered  capacity.  Furthermore,  NASA  had  instituted  re-
training  programs  to  enable  uncovered  workers  to  take  on  new  tasks.  What
are  the  causes  of  uncovered  capacity?  What  is  the  status  of  the  Agency’s  un-
covered  capacity  and  how  effective  have  the  retraining  programs  been?  Are
NASA’s  approaches  to  handling  uncovered  capacity  adequate  over  the  long-
term?  NASA  has  reported  difficulty  in  tracking  uncovered  capacity  and  the
NAPA report notes that NASA does not have a transparent process for moni-
toring its uncovered capacity; there is no accounting code or tracking of when
an  employee  is  uncovered  or  working  on  tasks  outside  his/her  competencies.
Does  NASA  plan  to  make  any  changes  in  response  to  improve  its  monitoring
of uncovered capacity?
• Is ‘‘Ten Healthy Centers’’ a Good Idea?—NASA’s Workforce Strategy em-
braces  the  goal  of  maintaining  a  fully  productive  workforce  at  all  of  its  field
centers in what it calls ‘‘Ten Healthy Centers.’’ Centers have been given new
exploration  roles  but  face  challenges  as  they  shift  from  a  focus  on  research
or  aeronautics,  for  example,  to  exploration  projects.  The  National  Academies
report  notes  that,  ‘‘According  to  NASA,  the  immediate  problem  with  employ-
ees  whose  primary  skills  are  not  currently  needed  is  most  significant  at  the
three aeronautics centers (Ames, Glenn, and Langley).’’ In addition, these cen-
ters have been identified as carrying the highest percentages of uncovered ca-
pacity.  The  NAPA  report  questions  ‘‘whether  the  pursuit  of  ten  healthy  cen-
ters  will  yield  a  healthy  NASA.’’  What  is  NASA’s  definition  of  a  healthy  cen-
ter?  What  are  the  long-term  implications  of  the  ‘‘Ten  Healthy  Centers’’  ap-
proach?’’

• Supporting Strategic Decisions about the NASA Workforce—NASA has
assessed  its  requirements  for  the  categories  of  workers  the  Agency  needs  to
support its programs. The Agency has used an information system—the Com-
petency  Management  System  (CMS)—devoted  to  workforce  planning  to  con-
duct this assessment. The independent reports assert that NASA needs more
information  for  its  workforce  planning,  question  the  adequacy  of  the  CMS,
and  recommend  that  NASA  develop  models  for  projecting  future  competency
and  skill  requirements.  In  particular,  the  National  Academies  recommends
that  more  information  is  needed  about  the  current  skills,  experience  levels
and  expected  attrition  of  the  center  workforce.  Competencies  and  experience
levels  need  to  be  translated  into  specific  positions.  What  is  the  status  of  the
CMS  and  does  NASA  plan  to  make  any  changes  to  CMS?  Will  NASA  work-
force decisions and future planning be based on robust, transparent data and
analyses? What information does NASA plan to acquire to support both short-
term and long-term workforce decisions and plans?

• Looking  Beyond  NASA  to  Build  the  Future  NASA  Workforce—The
NAPA and National Academy reports seem to suggest that NASA’s workforce
planning  would  benefit  from  the  same  innovation  and  external  partnerships
that make the Agency’s space missions so successful. The National Academies
state that ‘‘the solution to NASA’s workforce issues is not to be found by con-
sidering  NASA  in  isolation  from  the  rest  of  the  aerospace  ecosystem  [NASA,
Department  of  Defense,  industry,  and  universities].’’  NASA  should  conduct
workforce  planning  in  cooperation  with  other  government  agencies,  industry,
and  universities.  Both  independent  reports  recommend  that  NASA  use  inter-
agency partnerships and improve internships and cooperative programs to at-
tract  new  talent.  The  National  Academies  recommends  that  NASA  invest  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

nontraditional  approaches  such  as  the  Centennial  Challenges  program  to
build  public  support  and  train  the  next  generation.  NAPA  recommends  that
NASA  consider  detailing  highly  skilled  technical  experts  to  other  agencies
during  periods  when  NASA  projects  do  not  require  those  employees’  skills.
How  would  such  interagency  transfers  work?  How  open  is  NASA  to  looking
beyond  itself  to  address  its  workforce  challenges?  What  plans  does  NASA
have,  if  any,  for  undertaking  innovative  approaches  to  strengthen  and  build
its workforce?

BACKGROUND

This  section  provides  summary  information  on  1)  NASA’s  current  workforce,  2)
the  NASA  Workforce  Strategy,  3)  the  National  Academies  and  National  Academy
of  Public  Administration’s  reports  on  NASA’s  workforce,  4)  the  109th  Congress,
Committee  on  Science’s  hearing  on  NASA’s  workforce  held  on  June  13,  2006,  and
5) on the NASA Flexibility Act of 2004.
Current NASA Workforce Demographics

As  detailed  in  Attachment  1,  NASA’s  workforce  includes  a  total  of  18,343  civil
servants (as of April 2007) and approximately 44,023 contractors (as of April 2006).
The  largest  numbers  of  civil  servants  and  contractor  employees  are  retained  at
Johnson  Space  Center,  Kennedy  Space  Center,  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center,  and
Goddard Space Flight Center, respectively.
Summary of NASA’s Workforce Strategy

Pursuant  to  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2005,  NASA  prepared  a  Workforce
Strategy.  The  Strategy  serves  to  assess  and  build  a  NASA  workforce  that  can
achieve the Agency’s objectives for the Vision for Space Exploration, scientific activi-
ties, and aeronautics research. Specifically, the Strategy identifies the factors affect-
ing NASA’s workforce:

• Implementation of the Vision for Space Exploration
• Retiring  of  the  Space  Shuttle  by  2010  and  development  of  the  Crew  Launch

Vehicle and Crew Exploration Vehicle

• A  refocusing  of  aeronautics  research  program  away  from  technology  dem-

onstration and toward long-term basic research

• Increasing numbers of retirement-eligible workers
• Change  to  full  cost  management  and  a  resulting  need  to  balance  human  re-

sources with center workload and project life cycles

Elements of the Workforce Strategy include:

• The  objective  of  10  Healthy  Centers  that  maintain  a  workload  to  sustain  a

productive workforce.

• A  workforce  planning  process  that  involves  all  levels  of  management,  includ-
ing  center  management,  and  serves  as  a  central  component  of  NASA’s  stra-
tegic, business, and resource planning.

• A  set  of  workforce  planning  tools  including  a  Competency  Management  Sys-
tem (CMS) to identify and monitor NASA’s knowledge base. According to the
NASA  workforce  strategy,  ‘‘Competencies  are  used  to  categorize  the  capabili-
ties  of  an  employee,  identify  the  knowledge  requirements  of  a  position  or
those associated with projects and programs, and forecast the Agency’s work-
force requirements.’’ In addition, a Workforce Integrated Management System
(WIMS) collects and manages NASA’s data on the workforce and competency
planning.

• An  assessment  of  supply  and  demand  for  specific  competencies  in  the  work-
force  between  2006  and  2011,  including  a  projection  of  the  number  of  FTEs
needed  at  each  NASA  center  from  FY  2005–FY  2011,  based  on  expected  re-
quirements and anticipated funding.

Æ NASA  identified,  based  on  the  assessment,  competencies  in  increasing
demand: 1) program/ project management; 2) systems engineering and in-
tegration, and 3) mission operations. Primary competencies in decreasing
demand  are:  1)  engineering  and  science  support;  2)  management  com-
petencies; and 3) paraprofessional business operations, among other func-
tions.

Æ The Strategy discusses a problem with ‘‘uncovered capacity,’’ that is, em-
ployees whose work time is not allocated at 100 percent to project tasks.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

• Identified  steps  for  addressing  the  gap  in  required  competency  areas,  includ-
ing approaches for recruiting new talent and for retaining employees who pos-
sesses competencies required to fulfill the Agency’s objectives.

The Workforce Strategy emphasizes the need for flexibility to reflect new informa-

tion and changes in policies, plans, resources, and political situations.

Building  a  Better  NASA  Workforce:  Meeting  the  Workforce  Needs  for  the
National  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  (National  Academies,  2007)
In  September  2005,  NASA’s  Associate  Administrator  for  Program  Analysis  and
Evaluation  requested  that  the  National  Academies  ‘‘study  the  long-range  science
and technology workforce needs of NASA and the larger aerospace science and engi-
neering  community  to  achieve  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration. . ..’’  The  report’s
key conclusions and recommendations are summarized below:
No National Shortage of Skilled Employees to Support the Vision

• There  is  ‘‘no  looming  national  shortage  of  skilled  scientists  and  engineers  to

implement the VSE over the long-term.’’

• Low  numbers  of  entry-level  NASA  workers  (25–29  year  age  range)  who  can
build  the  experience  necessary  to  implement  the  Vision  over  the  coming  dec-
ades raise concern.

• The  workforce  that  NASA  has  relied  on  in  the  past  and  will  continue  to  rely
on resides outside of the Agency in universities and industry. NASA will need
to  approach  its  outside  scientific  workforce  differently  than  its  outside  engi-
neering  workforce,  because  while  industry  personnel  can  move  among  de-
fense,  commercial  aerospace,  and  NASA  projects,  university  research  talent
will be lost if NASA stops supporting scientific research.

NASA Needs to Collect More Data In Order to Assess its Workforce

• NASA  has  conducted  a  top-down,  headquarters-led  assessment  of  the  Agen-
cy’s  needs  and  skills  to  meet  its  workforce  demands  but  needs  to  conduct  a
bottom-up, center-led ‘‘assessment of the current skills, experience levels, and
projected attrition of the workforce for each individual center.’’

• This information should be used to develop a model that will allow the Agen-
cy  to  project  the  skills  it  needs  to  develop  as  well  as  the  competencies  and
experience  levels  NASA  requires.  NASA  should  translate  such  competencies
and experience levels into specific positions and projected timeframes of when
each center will require those positions.

• NASA  should  also  apply  the  model  to  project  the  mix  of  skills  that  could  be

conducted internally or externally in industry.

Increased Need for Program/Project Managers and Systems Engineers

NASA’s  requirements  for  both  internal  and  external  scientific  and  engineering
workforce share the common need for ‘‘highly skilled program and project managers
and systems engineers.’’ Approaches for increasing these capabilities include:

• Leveraging  workers  with  systems  engineering  and  technical  experience  ac-

quired from robotic science programs for human spacecraft development;

• Providing  opportunities  for  junior-level  workers  to  obtain  hands-on  flight  de-
velopment  experience  through  low-cost  sounding  rocket,  balloon,  and  aircraft
research  projects  to  develop  the  program/  project  management  and  systems
engineering skills that NASA needs now and in the future.

• Retaining existing employees with much needed program/project and systems
engineering  skills  while  also  recruiting  employees  from  outside  the  Agency
that possess those capabilities.

• Using  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  and  working  with  Congress  and  the
executive branch to reduce the barriers that enable the flow of skilled employ-
ees between industry and NASA.

NASA Should Help Train Its Future Workforce

• NASA should become involved in training its potential workforce, because the
Agency  cannot  rely  on  other  government  agencies  or  external  institutions  to
provide ‘‘the skills that are unique to the work the Agency conducts.’’

• NASA  training  programs  have  languished  and  need  additional  support  and
restructuring. The Graduate Student Research Program (GSRP) establishes a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

strong  link  between  NASA  and  university  scientists,  but  similar  connections
do not exist for engineering and human exploration.
• NASA’s Education Program could be used to fund workforce programs includ-
ing hands-on training opportunities in suborbital programs and small mission
programs such as Explorers.
• Nontraditional  means  of  inspiring  and  training  the  future  workforce  such  as
the  Centennial  Challenge  prizes  should  also  be  considered.  Many  of  the  pro-
grams  it  mentions—sub-orbital,  GSRP,  and  Centennial  Challenges—do  not
require  large  investments  and  will  yield  training  benefits  many  times  more
than the necessary investments.

NASA Workforce Within the Broader Context

• The  stability  of  support  for  and  funding  for  the  Vision  will  be  important  to
industry’s ability to attract and maintain skilled and younger workers to sup-
port exploration projects.
• NASA’s  workforce  is  not  an  internal  matter  but  must  be  considered  as  part
of a national strategy with input from national security government agencies,
industry, and universities.

NASA: Balancing A Multi-sector Workforce to Achieve a Healthy Organiza-

tion (National Academy of Public Administration, 2007)

In  March  2006,  the  Senate  Appropriations  Subcommittee  and  NASA  asked  the
National Academy of Public Administration to conduct a study on NASA’s workforce
that  would  focus  on  1)  the  challenges  of  transitioning  from  the  Shuttle  Program  to
the  Vision,  and  2)  acquiring  the  right  balance  within  its  multi-sector  workforce  of
approximately 18,000 civil servants and 44,000 contractors.

Some of the NAPA study panel’s specific concerns are summarized below:

NASA’s Dedication to ‘‘Ten Healthy Centers’’

• The  panel  noted  that  ‘‘NASA  has  not  established  a  comprehensive  evaluation
process to assess and monitor the long-term health of each center.’’ The report
introduces  a  guide  for  assessing  the  health  of  each  center  and  recommends
that  NASA’s  Program  Analysis  and  Evaluation  Office  use  the  guidelines  to
evaluate each center annually.
• The  panel  warns  that  ‘‘. . .the  potential  danger  of  the  ten  healthy  centers  ap-
proach  is  that  actions  intended  to  help  the  struggling  centers  could  harm  the
other centers. Therefore, supporting all ten field installations could come at the
expense of NASA as an agency.’’ The panel added that ‘‘The current and long-
term  health  of  the  three  NASA  research  centers  (Ames,  Glenn,  and  Langley)
is questionable and should be a core concern of NASA headquarters.’’

Multi-sector Balance

• The  panel  noted  that  interpretations  of  responsibilities  that  are  ‘inherently
governmental,’  and  therefore  should  be  conducted  by  civil  servants,  differ
across  the  government.  The  report  presents  guidelines  for  deciding  whether
a  position  should  be  filled  with  a  civil  servant  or  a  contractor.  For  decisions
on  civil  servant  hires,  the  report  introduces  guidelines  for  determining  what
kind  of  appointment  should  be  used:  tenured  permanent  or  multi-year  term.
• NASA’s Workforce Strategy is limited to the civil service workforce. It does not
address  the  contractor  personnel  that  comprise  two-thirds  of  the  Agency’s
total  workforce.  ‘‘Although  the  Strategy  is  consistent  with  historical  ap-
proaches to civil service workforce planning, it was a narrow interpretation of
the Congressional mandate for a human capital strategy to ensure a workforce
of the appropriate size and with the appropriate skills.’’
• NASA’s Competency Management System (CMS) covers only civil service em-
ployees,  however,  NAPA  notes  that  ‘‘other  federal  organizations  have  devel-
oped  systems  to  capture  aggregate  contractor  competencies.  In  June  2006,  for
example,  the  Department  of  National  Intelligence  (DNI)  began  to  develop  a
comprehensive  competency-based  inventory  for  its  civil  servants  and  its  ‘‘em-
bedded’’ (on-site) contractors who are doing core work.’’

Contracting Officer Technical Representatives

• The NAPA panel observes that there is ‘‘An inconsistent definition of the fed-
eral  acquisition  workforce,  which  often  excludes  and,  by  implication  may
undervalue,  Contracting  Officer  Technical  Representatives  (COTRs).  COTRs
are  an  agency’s  technical  link  to  ensure  that  contractors  deliver  quality  prod-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

ucts  meeting  agency  specifications,  schedules,  and  costs.’’  ‘‘The  Panel  believes
that  NASA  must  have  more  comprehensive  information  regarding  who  its
COTRs are, what training they have had, what training they need, what parts
of  their  contracting  work  they  are  doing  effectively  and  timely,  and  what  re-
sponsibilities are perhaps not getting adequate attention.’’
• The  report  also  calls  attention  to  a  December  2005,  NASA  Inspector  General
(IG)  report  that  identified  a  list  of  ‘‘trouble  areas’’  relating  to  the  contracting
process,  including  problems  with  the  financial  management  system  in  track-
ing  contract  spending;  insufficient  transparency  in  work  performed  by  sub-
contractors; sizable cost overruns in some NASA programs, among other con-
cerns. The IG recommended an improved internal control framework, as well
as  establishing  institutional  procurement  officials  accountable  for  acquisition
integrity.’’

Centralization of Human Resources

• The report notes that ‘‘Until recently, each NASA center had its own tools and
processes for workforce strategy and planning, which made it difficult to track
uncovered  capacity,  skill  mismatches,  and  other  human  capital  issues  and
take  appropriate  corrective  actions.’’  Recently  NASA  has  moved  to  centralize
and  make  uniform  its  human  resources  activities  through  its  NASA  Shared
Service  Center.  ‘‘By  consolidating  these  services,  NASA  intends  to  improve
operational  efficiency  and  overall  customer  service  and  focus  more  on  its  core
competencies.  NASA  has  projected  annual  savings  of  up  to  $6.6  million  from
NSSC,  with  more  than  200  civil  service  FTE  across  the  four  redirected  func-
tional areas.’’

Human Resource Tools

• To efficiently manage the anticipated workforce transitions, the NAPA report
calls for workforce flexibilities, including ‘‘modified RIF rules, blanket buy-out
authority with a higher dollar value incentive, and limited statutory authority
for emergency retirement reform.’’

Workplace Planning Scope

• The NAPA panel believes that, in light of the considerable uncertainty in mis-
sion direction that NASA will receive, NASA’s workplace planning should ex-
pand from a one to two-year to a five year horizon.
• The  panel  endorsed  a  recommendation  from  a  2005  GAO  report  (GAO–05–
230)  to  use  scenario  planning.  The  planning  should  be  focused  and  ‘‘Identify
the  driving  forces  underlying  each  likely  scenario;  Incorporate  the  scenarios
into strategic actions; Identify key events that would indicate a particular sce-
nario  is  unfolding;  Create  mechanisms  to  monitor  the  environment;  Make  ad-
justments  to  agency  strategies  based  on  environmental  monitoring;  and  Iden-
tify  and  coordinate  overall  agency  competencies,  schedules,  and  facilities
across programs by scenario.’’
• NAPA  learned  in  October  2006  that  NASA’s  Office  of  Human  Capital  Man-
agement  (OHCM)  is  working  to  incorporate  scenario  planning  into  the  work-
force planning process across the five-year budget cycle.

Maintaining Core Skills

• Drawing  upon  workforce  studies  conducted  by  RAND,  the  Panel  emphasized
the importance of identifying, sizing, and maintaining core competencies. This
process  requires  long-term  planning,  and  according  to  RAND,  analysis  of  the
demand  for  labor  at  the  skill  level  over  time;  understanding  and  definition
of  core  capabilities;  and  planning  over  the  long-term  to  maintain  such  capa-
bilities.

Human Capital Flexibilities

• The NASA Flexibility Act of 2004 enlarged NASA’s workforce flexibilities, yet
the  Panel  notes  ‘‘While  these  flexibilities  are  important,  they  are  much  more
modest  than  those  given  to  the  DOD  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Secu-
rity  (DHS).  NASA  is  subject  to  such  Title  5  requirements  as  staffing,  position
classification, compensation, and performance management. For example, it is
not  authorized  to  implement  pay-banding  or  performance-based  compensation
strategies.’’
• The  panel  recommends  that  NASA  ‘‘Pursue  additional  statutory  and  regu-
latory  authorizations  to  obtain  other  flexibilities  needed  to  strategically  man-
age  the  workforce. . ..’’  For  example,  the  Panel’s  2005  Human  Capital  Flexi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

bilities report recommended that NASA be able to alter its agency’s career life
cycle  by  modifying  retirement  rules  ‘‘to  allow  the  Agency  to  separate  an  em-
ployee  eligible  for  optional  retirement  if  doing  so  would  help  it  achieve  work-
force reshaping or downsizing goals.’’
The Competency Management System (CMS)

• Since 2003, NASA has used a Competency Management System (CMS) to doc-
ument the workforce competencies required by NASA positions and possessed
by  NASA  employees.  As  NASA  has  defined  it,  a  competency  is  not  a  role  or
function,  but  a  base  level  of  knowledge  relevant  to  the  Agency’s  mission  that
defines for a position what knowledge is needed and how it is applied.

• The report notes that ‘‘As presently constituted, CMS is not always as helpful
to centers at the personnel hiring level because it does not track directly to po-
sitions.’’  The  panel  recommends  that  NASA  ‘‘Strengthen  the  CMS  by  inte-
grating  it  with  existing  budget  tools. . .with  a  methodology  for  translating
competency surpluses and deficits into FTE needs.’’

Hearing before the Subcommittee on Space and Aeronautics, Committee on
Science, June 13, 2006. ‘‘The NASA Workforce: Does NASA Have the
Right  Strategy  and  Policies  to  Retain  and  Build  the  Workforce  It
Will Need?’’

During  the  109th  Congress,  the  House  Science  Committee’s  Subcommittee  on
Space and Aeronautics examined issues related to NASA’s workforce during a hear-
ing held in June 13, 2006.

• Ms.  Toni  Dawsey,  NASA  Assistant  Administrator  for  Human  Capital  Man-
agement testified on NASA’s workforce challenges including the Agency’s un-
covered  capacity  and  efforts  to  ensure  that  employees  with  critical  skills  are
not  lost  during  buy-outs  or  early  retirement  offers.  She  also  discussed  the
Agency’s  workforce  strategy  and  the  importance  of  human  capital  tools  and
flexibility  such  as  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act,  cooperative  education  programs,
and intern programs in attracting new talent into the Agency.

• Dr.  Lee  Stone,  Legislative  Representative  from  IFPTE  and  an  employee  of
NASA  Ames  Research  Center  testified  that  NASA  does  not  have  the  right
strategies or policies to build the workforce it needs and that the Agency’s ef-
forts  in  workforce  planning  can  only  provide  short-term  solutions.  The  only
long-term  solution  to  building  a  healthy  workforce  is  to  reverse  the  trend  in
budget cuts to aeronautics, science and exploration programs.

• Dr.  David  Black,  Co-Chair  of  the  National  Academies’  report  on  NASA’s
Workforce testified that, in the view of the Academy committee, NASA’s work
is  incomplete  and  represents  a  top-down  approach  that  does  not  properly  re-
flect  the  workforce  needs  of  individual  centers.  He  also  noted  that  the  lack
of  support  and  budget  for  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  affects  the  Agen-
cy’s  ability  to  find  the  best  and  brightest  employees.  Dr.  Black  noted  that  if
NASA elects to build its workforce internally rather than use outside contrac-
tors, the Agency will over the next five years face a gap in expertise that can-
not be addressed through new hires or in-house employees.

• Mr. John Douglass, President, Aerospace Industries Association testified that
aerospace workforce is aging and that industry is in the process of rebuilding
its  workforce  for  the  future.  He  spoke  about  the  use  of  contractors  for  short-
term  projects  and  civil  servants  for  basic  research  and  development  efforts.
Mr.  Douglass  testified  that  competition  for  systems  engineering  skills  among
industry and other government agencies is of concern. He said that the aero-
space industry can absorb more NASA work.

Uncovered Capacity

Subcommittee  Members  probed  the  issue  of  uncovered  capacity.  Ms.  Dawsey  re-
ported  a  total  of  1000  FTEs  were  uncovered,  which  equates  to  828  employees.
NASA’s  approach  to  addressing  the  problem  is  to  reassign  work  to  those  centers
with the most significant uncovered capacity and to retrain workers for exploration-
related tasks. The union asserted that NASA’s uncovered capacity problem had little
to do with workforce and much to do with full cost accounting. Dr. Lee Stone testi-
fied  that  NASA  managers  were  diverting  labor  funds  to  support  hardware  procure-
ments, thus creating the problem in uncovered capacity.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

Competency Management System (CMS)

The IFPTE union called attention to the deficiencies in NASA’s CMS system. The
system was originally intended to include several databases but so far only includes
one. The database in use only captures primary competencies and cannot reflect an
employee’s  secondary  skills.  In  addition,  competencies  have  not  been  assessed  and
translated into specific positions.

Balance of In-House Civil Servants and Contractors

The Subcommittee also examined the process for making decisions on NASA’s use
of in-house civil servants versus contractors and the balance between these elements
of  its  workforce.  Ms.  Dawsey  noted  that  the  Agency  was  seeking  guidance  on  this
issue from the National Academy of Public Administration. Dr. Black suggested that
NASA  look  beyond  itself  and  consider  the  question  with  the  broader  aerospace  and
research community. Dr. Lee Stone referred to the Columbia Accident Investigation
Board  (CAIB)  report  and  its  cautioning  on  NASA’s  reliance  on  contractors  for  tech-
nical  support,  use  of  experienced  managers  for  contract  oversight  rather  than  tech-
nical leadership, and use of inexperienced engineers for management roles.

A Funding Crisis, Not a Workforce Crisis

Members and witnesses alike referred to the fact that NASA’s expanding respon-
sibilities are not being met with appropriate resources. As a result, the Agency will
lose  capabilities  in  science  programs,  especially  life  and  micro-gravity  sciences  and
astrobiology,  which  cannot  be  easily  replaced.  Insufficient  funding  to  execute
NASA’s multiple missions does not present a strong signal to graduate students and
young  workers  who  might  be  considering  NASA  or  NASA-related  work  as  a  means
to build and grow their careers.

The NASA Flexibility Act of 2004 (P.L. 108–201)

The  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  granted  a  range  of  increased  flexibilities  for
strengthening  NASA’s  workforce.  Under  the  Act,  term  appointments  could  last
longer, and conversion from term to permanent appointments was made easier. Re-
cruitment,  relocation  and  retention  bonuses  were  increased,  and  redesignation  bo-
nuses  were  added.  Authority  was  granted  for  hiring  distinguished  scholars  and  for
critical  position  hiring.  The  time  period  for  an  Intergovernmental  Personnel  Act
(IPA) assignment limit was increased. Travel and transportation reimbursement ca-
pabilities, and change of position incentives, were enlarged. Annual leave, and Sen-
ior  Executive  Service  (SES),  eligibilities  also  were  enlarged.  The  maximum  allow-
able  rate  of  pay  for  NASA-excepted  (NEX)  employees  was  increased.  A  scholarship
program was established.

The NASA Transition Act of 2007

The  NASA  Transition  Act  of  2007  proposes  to  amend  the  Space  Act  of  1958  and
the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004.  The  Transition  Act  includes  two  new  workforce
management tools:

verting to a time-limited appointment; and

• Authority  to  offer  a  permanent  employee  an  incentive  for  voluntarily  con-
• Authority  to  pay  the  government’s  share  of  the  Federal  Employees  Health
Benefits  Program  (FEHBP)  premium  for  employees  who  separate  because
their positions are being eliminated or transferred out of the commuting area.
This  is  expected  to  result  in  a  greater  number  of  employees  being  willing  to
separate voluntarily.

• Specific provisions of the legislation would terminate in 2010.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Chairman UDALL. The hearing will come to order.
I  want  to  welcome  all  our  witnesses  here  today,  and  before  I
make  my  opening  remarks,  I  did  want  to  tell  everybody  who  is
gathered  that  we  have  got  a  tight  schedule  this  morning.  I  apolo-
gize  in  advance.  We  may  be  disrupted  45  or  50  minutes  into  the
hearing,  because  we  have  a  series  of  votes,  but  we  will  move  with
some dispatch, because we really do want to hear from this distin-
guished panel.

I  look  forward  to  getting  your  views  on  this  important  issue  of
how  best  to  ensure  that  NASA  will  have  the  workforce  that  it
needs  to  accomplish  its  various  challenging  missions.  It  is  obvious
that NASA’s workforce is critical to the success of its missions, and
yet,  it  should  be  equally  obvious  that  the  continued  health  and
strength of NASA’s workforce cannot be taken for granted. It needs
to be nurtured, supported, and given the tools and resources it will
need  to  carry  out  the  complex  and  challenging  mission  that  it  has
been asked to undertake in science, aeronautics, and human space
flight.

That  is  why  I  am  keenly  interested  in  hearing  the  findings  and
recommendations  of  the  two  recent  independent  assessments  of
NASA’s  workforce  needs,  as  well  as  NASA’s  response  to  them.
However, I envision today’s hearing as only the first step in a con-
tinuing examination of the health of NASA’s workforce by our sub-
committee.

In  particular,  I  hope  to  have  a  follow-on  hearing  later  this  year
to examine some of the particular civil service and contractor work-
force  challenges  that  are  associated  with  the  upcoming  retirement
of  the  Space  Shuttle,  and  in  addition,  I  would  like  the  Sub-
committee  to  review  the  proposed  legislative  provisions  that  have
been provided to Congress by NASA to address some of these work-
force challenges.

Thus, I hope that this hearing will be one in a series of hearings
on this topic. We owe it to both the highly talented NASA employ-
ees,  as  well  as  to  the  broader  aerospace  community,  to  make  sure
NASA and Congress get it right in attempting to shape NASA’s fu-
ture workforce.

As  I  have  said,  and  many  others  have  acknowledged  it,  NASA’s
civil  service  workforce  consists  of  some  of  this  nation’s  ‘‘best  and
brightest.’’ In most cases, they have made a long-term commitment
to  public  service.  I  respect  them  for  that  commitment,  and  I  think
that  whatever  workforce  strategy  NASA  develops  should  build  on
the  strengths  that  these  individuals  bring  to  the  Agency,  because
if those skills are discarded, whether for short-term budgetary rea-
sons,  or  for  some  other  reason,  we  would  find  out  at  a  later  date
that it is difficult, if not impossible to recapture skills that the Na-
tion  discovers  it  needs.  And  at  the  same  time,  NASA  must  work
to attract and properly utilize the young men and women who will
provide  the  scientific,  engineering,  and  project  management  exper-
tise  required  for  NASA’s  future  missions  decades  into  the  future.
Doing  all  of  that  would  be  a  tall  order  under  the  best  of  cir-
cumstances, and it will be doubly difficult if NASA is not provided
resources  that  are  equal  to  the  missions  that  it  has  been  asked  to
undertake.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Now,  I  am  sure  Judge  Hall  would  agree  with  me  that  money
alone  will  not  ensure  that  NASA  will  have  the  strong  and  vital
workforce  that  it  needs,  but  insufficient  funding  will  undercut
whatever workforce initiatives are put in place.

We  have  got  a  lot  to  talk  about  today,  and  I  want  to  again  wel-
come  our  witnesses,  and  I  am  at  this  time  honored  to  yield  what-
ever  time  he  deems  necessary  to  my  good  friend,  Congressman
Hall, the Ranking Member of the entire Committee.

Judge Hall.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Udall follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN MARK UDALL

Good morning.
I’d like to welcome all of our witnesses to today’s hearing.
We  have  a  distinguished  panel,  and  I  look  forward  to  getting  your  views  on  the
important  issue  of  how  best  to  ensure  that  NASA  will  have  the  workforce  it  needs
to accomplish its various challenging missions.

Before I say more, however, I’d like to take a moment to congratulate Mr. Feeney
on  his  selection  as  the  new  Ranking  Member  of  the  Subcommittee,  replacing  my
good  friend  and  colleague  Ken  Calvert,  who  has  moved  over  the  Appropriations
Committee.

Welcome  Mr.  Feeney,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  in  your  new  capacity

in the days and weeks ahead.

Now  it’s  obvious  that  NASA’s  workforce  is  critical  to  the  success  of  NASA’s  mis-

sions.

Yet it should be equally obvious that the continued health and strength of NASA’s

workforce cannot be taken for granted.

It needs to be nurtured, supported, and given the tools and resources it will need
to  carry  out  the  complex  and  challenging  missions  it  has  been  asked  to  undertake
in science, aeronautics, and human space flight and exploration.

That is why I am keenly interested in hearing the findings and recommendations
of  the  two  recent  independent  assessments  of  NASA’s  workforce  needs,  as  well  as
NASA’s response to them.

However,  I  envision  today’s  hearing  as  only  the  first  step  in  a  continuing  exam-

ination of the health of NASA’s workforce by this subcommittee.

In  particular,  I  hope  to  have  a  follow-on  hearing  later  this  year  to  examine  some
of  the  particular  civil  service  and  contractor  workforce  challenges  that  are  associ-
ated with the upcoming retirement of the Space Shuttle.

In addition, I would like the Subcommittee to review the proposed legislative pro-
visions  that  have  been  provided  to  Congress  by  NASA  to  address  some  of  those
workforce challenges.

Thus,  I  hope  that  this  hearing  will  just  be  one  in  a  series  of  hearings  on  this
topic—we  owe  it  both  to  the  highly  talented  NASA  employees  as  well  as  to  the
broader aerospace community to make sure NASA and Congress ‘‘get it right’’ in at-
tempting to shape NASA’s future workforce.

As I have said in the past, NASA’s civil service workforce consists of some of this

nation’s ‘‘best and brightest.’’

In most cases, they have made a long-term commitment to public service.
I respect them for that commitment, and I think that whatever workforce strategy
NASA  develops  should  build  on  the  strengths  that  those  individuals  bring  to  the
Agency. . .

. . .Because  if  those  skills  are  discarded,  whether  for  short-term  budgetary  rea-
sons  or  for  some  other  reason,  we  could  find  out  at  a  later  date  that  it  is  difficult
if not impossible to recapture skills that the Nation discovers it needs.

At the same time, NASA must work to attract and properly utilize the young men
and women who will provide the scientific, engineering, and project management ex-
pertise required for NASA’s future missions.

Doing all that would be a tall order under the best of circumstances.
It will be doubly difficult if NASA is not provided resources that are equal to the

missions that it has been asked to undertake.

Money  alone  will  not  ensure  that  NASA  will  have  the  strong  and  vital  workforce
that  it  needs,  but  insufficient  funding  will  undercut  whatever  workforce  initiatives
are put in place.

Well, we have a lot to talk about today.
I again want to welcome our witnesses, and I look forward to your testimony.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

Mr.  HALL.  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  think  I  would  be
remiss  if  I  didn’t  say  I  was  honored  to  be  sitting  by  a  member  of
really a great American family, and one that has lived a life of pub-
lic service, and the guy is so dang handsome, I ask unanimous con-
sent if I could sit down there, I didn’t have to sit by him.

Chairman UDALL. Judge Hall, you are out of order, and——
Mr.  HALL.  All  right,  here  I  go.  And  I  do  thank  you,  Mr.  Chair-
man, for holding this meeting, because I always like to welcome the
witnesses, and thank them for coming today, because they are giv-
ing up their time. It takes time to get here. I think that I saw Mr.
Stewart  coming  in  this  morning,  and  I  thought  he  was  Norm  Au-
gustine.  I  almost  said  hello,  Norm,  how  are  you  doing.  And  Ms.
Dawsey, good to see you again, and welcome, and thank you.

NASA has a unique and interesting set of missions, and all of us
on this committee want you to successfully accomplish the missions
that  we  have  laid  out,  and  I  don’t  think  we  ought  to  give  any  on
the program that is laid out, we ought to hold what is laid out. We
shouldn’t  have  to  take  any  suggestion  that  we  are  not  in  a  good
economy, because that wouldn’t be true, and we don’t need to start
surrendering  any  of  the  gains  that  we  have  laid  out,  and  that  the
President’s vision has set out, and that we have accepted. We need
just to carry it out and to follow it.

And  the  workforce  is  so  important  in  that.  Everything  that
NASA does depends on its ability to maintain a really highly quali-
fied  and  competent  workforce,  and  developing  the  right  mix  of
skills,  and  keeping  people  engaged  in  the  challenging  work,  as
budgets and program priorities change, I think, requires just a very
continuing  commitment,  a  commitment  that  I  have  noticed  in
NASA from the time I have been here.

You  face  a  number  of  workforce  challenges  over  the  next  few
years,  including  retiring  the  Space  Shuttle  in  2010,  while  simulta-
neously completing the International Space Station, and developing
the new Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle and Ares Launch System.
NASA’s  aeronautics  program  has  been  refocused,  shifting  away
from  technology  demonstrations  and  toward  long-term  basic  re-
search.

NASA’s  vital  science  programs  have  faced  difficult  changes  as
well. Furthermore, in addition to technical, scientific, and engineer-
ing  challenges,  the  Agency  also  faces  daunting  financial  manage-
ment challenges that it has been largely unable to address, in part
because of a lack of qualified financial auditors and administrators,
I am told.

These pressures are unlikely to go away. In fact, they will almost
certainly continue in the future. Things are always changing, that’s
the  nature  of  science  and  technology,  but  the  workforce  has  to
adapt to these changes, and the Agency bears responsibility to em-
ployees  and  to  its  stakeholders  including  Congress  to  develop  a
strategy to effectively address these changes.

In  April  of  2006,  NASA  released  its  Workforce  Strategy  docu-
ment, as required by the NASA Authorization Act of 2005. The Na-
tional  Research  Council  and  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Ad-
ministration have each reviewed NASA’s strategy, and offered very
thoughtful  perspectives  on  it.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  them

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

today,  and  I  also  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  International
Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers.

Workforce is so vital to NASA’s mission, NASA has to constantly
evaluate  its  future  needs,  and  be  ready  to  take  preemptive  action
when  necessary  to  ensure  the  right  people  are  there  to  do  exciting
and  challenging  missions,  and  continue  to  accomplish  extraor-
dinary scientific discoveries.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  you  today,  from  the  witnesses,

and with that, I thank the Chairman, and yield back my time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Udall  for  holding  today’s  important  hearing.  I’d  also
like  to  welcome  the  witnesses,  and  thank  them  for  coming  before  us  today  to  help
us  better  understand  NASA’s  workforce  challenges  and  the  strategy  to  address
them.

NASA  has  a  unique  and  interesting  set  of  missions,  and  all  of  us  on  this  com-
mittee want NASA to successfully accomplish the missions that have been laid out.
Everything  that  NASA  does  depends  on  its  ability  to  maintain  a  highly-qualified
and competent workforce. Developing the right mix of skills, and keeping people en-
gaged in challenging work as budgets and program priorities change, requires a con-
tinuing commitment.

NASA  faces  a  number  of  workforce  challenges  over  the  next  few  years  including
retiring  the  Space  Shuttle  in  2010  while  simultaneously  completing  the  Inter-
national Space Station, and developing the new Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle and
Ares  launch  system.  NASA’s  Aeronautics  programs  have  been  refocused,  shifting
away from technology demonstrations and toward long-term basic research. NASA’s
vital  Science  programs  have  faced  difficult  changes  as  well.  Furthermore,  in  addi-
tion  to  technical,  scientific,  and  engineering  challenges,  the  Agency  also  faces
daunting  financial  management  challenges  that  it  has  been  largely  unable  to  ad-
dress  in  part  because  of  a  lack  of  qualified  financial  auditors  and  administrators.
These  pressures  are  unlikely  to  go  away.  In  fact  they  will  almost  certainly  con-
tinue  in  the  future.  Things  are  always  changing—that’s  the  nature  of  science  and
technology—but  the  workforce  must  adapt  to  the  changes,  and  the  Agency  bears  a
responsibility  to  employees  and  its  stakeholders,  including  Congress,  to  develop  a
strategy to effectively address the changes.

In April 2006, NASA released its Workforce Strategy document as required by the
NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2005.  The  National  Research  Council  and  the  National
Academy of Public Administration have each reviewed NASA’s strategy and offered
thoughtful  perspectives.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  them  today.  I  also  look  for-
ward to hearing from the International Federation of Professional and Technical En-
gineers.

The  workforce  is  so  vital  to  NASA’s  mission.  NASA  must  constantly  evaluate  its
future  needs,  and  be  ready  and  able  to  take  preemptive  actions  when  necessary  to
ensure  the  right  people  are  there  to  do  the  exciting  and  challenging  missions,  and
continue to accomplish extraordinary scientific discoveries.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  today’s  witnesses.  And  with  that,  I  yield  back  the

balance of my time.

Chairman UDALL. Thank you, Judge Hall.
At  this  point,  if  there  are  Members  who  wish  to  submit  addi-
tional  opening  statements,  your  statements  will  be  added  to  the
record, and without objection, so ordered.

And  at  this  time,  I  wanted  to  introduce  the  panel  of  witnesses,
and  I  will  introduce  all  of  you,  and  then  we  will  start  on  my  left
with Ms. Dawsey and her testimony, but let me welcome all of you
again, and say a little bit about each one of you.

Ms.  Toni  Dawsey  is  the  NASA  Assistant  Administrator  for
Human  Capital  Management.  Mr.  John  Stewart,  next  in  line,  is  a
Fellow at the National Academy of Public Administration, and was
a member of its NASA Multi-sector Workforce Panel.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

Dr. David Black recently co-chaired the National Research Coun-
cil’s  Committee  on  Meeting  the  Workforce  Needs  for  the  National
Vision for Space Exploration, and we have to his left Dr. Lee Stone,
the Legislative Representative from the International Federation of
Professional  and  Technical  Engineers,  who  serves  on  the  NASA
Council of IFPTE Locals.

Welcome.  I  think  most  of  you,  if  not  all  of  you,  are  professionals
at  this.  You  have  been  in  front  of  the  Committee  and  the  Sub-
committee  before,  and  you  know  you  have  five  minutes,  and  then,
we  will  turn  to  questions,  so  that  we  can  further  drill  down  into
the expertise you have in your perspective.

So, Ms. Dawsey, the floor is yours for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  TONI  DAWSEY,  ASSISTANT  ADMINIS-
TRATOR,  HUMAN  CAPITAL  MANAGEMENT;  CHIEF  HUMAN
CAPITAL  OFFICER,  NATIONAL  AERONAUTICS  AND  SPACE
ADMINISTRATION (NASA)
Ms.  DAWSEY.  Thank  you  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss
NASA’s workforce.

Implementing the Vision for Space Exploration clearly represents
a  great  management  challenge,  now  and  for  many  years  to  come.
In  particular,  the  retirement  of  the  Shuttle,  the  completion  of  the
International  Space  Station,  and  the  development  of  the  multiple
elements of the Constellation Program involve a daunting series of
transitions both programmatic and institutional.

The  NASA  Workforce  Strategy  submitted  to  Congress  in  April
2006  laid  the  foundation  for  the  actions  the  Agency  must  take  to
maintain  the  knowledgebase  of  the  current  workforce,  and  to  ac-
quire the skills necessary to accomplish NASA’s mission.

The  document  articulates  three  principles  underlying  our  work-
force  strategy:  building  and  sustaining  ten  healthy  centers,  maxi-
mizing  the  use  of  NASA’s  people,  and  evolving  to  a  more  flexible,
scalable workforce.

We  have  developed  a  comprehensive  plan  based  on  these  prin-
ciples,  with  three  primary  goals  to  implement  them.  The  first  goal
is  to  understand  mission  requirements,  both  near  and  long-term.
The second goal is to align the skills of the workforce with mission
needs,  and  the  third  goal  is  to  enable  more  effective  and  efficient
human resources operations, through the delivery of comprehensive
and authoritative workforce information.

The  first  goal,  understanding  mission  requirements,  requires  an
especially strong workforce planning capability. Recognizing that it
is  critical  that  all  levels  of  management  be  involved  in  workforce
planning. In January, the Agency established a workforce planning
governance  structure,  comprised  of  key  agency  managers,  to  iden-
tify workforce risks, and to develop joint solutions to issues as they
emerge.  We  have  also  integrated  workforce  planning  with  the  de-
velopment  of  program  and  project  budgets.  With  an  enhanced
workforce  planning  capability,  NASA  will  be  better  able  to  deter-
mine the demand for and supply of individual workforce skills.

The  second  goal,  to  align  the  workforce  with  the  mission,  re-
quires strengthening the technical and leadership excellence of our
employees, and reshaping the workforce to better serve future mis-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

sion requirements. In addition, as more of our experienced employ-
ees reach retirement eligibility, it is imperative that we attract and
develop new talent.

To strengthen technical excellence, the Agency is providing work-
force  retraining  and  skill  development  through  a  number  of  pro-
grams designed to develop program and project managers and engi-
neers to transfer knowledge across NASA, academia, industry, and
international partners, and to ensure that lessons learned are cap-
tured  for  the  next  generation.  In  order  to  build  leadership  ‘‘bench
strength,’’  NASA  has  created  a  corporate  leadership  framework
that provides succession planning and executive development.

Another  challenge  is  to  reshape  the  existing  workforce  to  better
serve  current  and  future  requirements.  The  use  of  buy-out/early
out  authority  to  encourage  voluntary  attrition  has  been  critical  to
NASA workforce reshaping. Since the start of Fiscal Year ’04, over
1,300 employees in targeted areas of surplus took buy-outs or early
outs.  This  is  over  one  third  of  the  total  attrition  of  3,500  during
this period.

We  continue  to  monitor  this  program  to  ensure  that  experienced
employees with needed and critical skills are not leaving the Agen-
cy, and that safety of the Space Shuttle or the International Space
Station  is  not  compromised.  To  replace  normal  attrition,  since
2004,  we  have  hired  nearly  2,500  employees.  Of  this  number,  700
are recent college graduates.

The  tools  provided  by  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  continue
to  be  vitally  important  to  us  as  we  reshape  our  workforce.  They
provide over a dozen tools that include enhanced recruitment, relo-
cation, and retention bonuses, expanded use of term appointments,
and benefits for new hires.

In  March,  NASA  submitted  legislative  proposals  to  provide  the
Agency  with  additional  flexibilities  that  it  needs  to  better  imple-
ment  the  transition  from  Shuttle  to  Constellation.  To  effectively
manage  change,  NASA  must  leverage  information  technology  also
to  provide  more  responsive,  reliable  information  to  support  deci-
sion-making. This is our third goal.

NASA  is  working  toward  full  integration  of  human  resources  in-
formation  across  the  Agency.  NASA  also  is  converging  business
systems,  expanding  access  throughout  the  Agency,  and  increasing
tools  and  applications.  These  efforts  will  form  a  human  capital  in-
formation environment that will provide a foundation for total busi-
ness systems integration and provide near real-time comprehensive
information to enable an informed decision-making at all levels.

The  initial  operating  capability  for  this  environment  is  planned
for  the  summer  of  2007,  with  final  implementation  during  the  fall
of 2008. In summary, in implementing the NASA Workforce Strat-
egy,  NASA  is  positioning  itself  to  deal  effectively  with  the  critical
issues  now  facing  the  Agency  on  an  integrated,  agency-wide  basis.
NASA  is  putting  in  place  approaches  that  not  only  will  alleviate
the  Agency’s  current  imbalances,  but  also  will  provide  a  structure
that  allows  such  issues  to  be  resolved  in  the  future,  as  part  of  a
deliberate, systematic process.

The  foundation  that  NASA  is  building  is  a  big  picture  view  that
will  facilitate  and  institutionalize  long-term  planning  and  agency-
level coordination.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Dawsey follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF TONI DAWSEY

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity

to appear before you today to discuss NASA’s workforce.

Implementing  the  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  clearly  represents  a
great  management  challenge,  now  and  for  many  years  to  come.  In  particular,  the
retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle,  the  completion  of  the  International  Space  Station,
and the development of the multiple elements of the Constellation Program involve
a daunting series of transitions both programmatic and institutional in nature. The
issues associated with these transitions are complex and our planning, already well
underway,  will  be  an  iterative,  evolutionary  process  featuring  tight  integration  be-
tween these efforts and NASA’s ongoing Science and Aeronautics Programs.

The NASA Workforce Strategy, submitted to the Congress in April 2006, laid the
foundation  for  the  actions  the  Agency  must  take  to  maintain  the  knowledge  base
of  the  current  workforce,  as  well  as  broaden,  reinvigorate,  and  acquire  new  skills
necessary to accomplish NASA’s Exploration, Science and Aeronautics missions. The
document  articulates  three  principles  underlying  our  workforce  strategy:  building
and  sustaining  ten  healthy  Centers;  maximizing  the  use  of  NASA’s  current  human
capital  capabilities;  and  evolving  to  a  more  flexible,  scalable  workforce.  We  remain
committed  to  these  principles  and  view  them  as  essential  to  mission  success.  Our
comprehensive plan for managing NASA’s current and future workforce is based on
these principles, and we have developed three primary goals to implement them.

• The  first  goal  is  to  understand  mission  requirements,  both  near-  and  long-
term,  to  enable  the  identification  and  matching  of  needed  skills  to  program
tasks through a robust, comprehensive workforce planning process.
• The  second  goal  is  to  align  the  skills  in  the  workforce  with  mission  needs  by
strengthening technical and leadership excellence and by reshaping the exist-
ing workforce.
• The third goal is to enable more effective and efficient human resources oper-
ations  through  the  delivery  of  comprehensive  and  authoritative  workforce  in-
formation  for  decision-making  through  integrated  human  resources,  financial
and other business support systems.

Recently,  both  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  (NAPA)  and  the
National  Research  Council  (NRC)  released  reports  of  recommendations  for  address-
ing  our  overall  workforce  challenges,  as  well  as  for  addressing  more  specific  issues
relating  to  the  aforementioned  transitions.  To  a  large  degree,  these  reports  confirm
our assessments of the challenges facing us in the workforce arena and validate the
actions that we have initiated to address the most critical and encompassing issues.
All  of  the  information,  findings  and  recommendations  contained  in  the  reports  will
continue to inform implementation of our basic workforce strategy, and will help en-
sure that we remain focused on the key issues.

Below,  I  have  highlighted  some  of  the  key  initiatives  we’ve  undertaken  over  the
past  year  in  support  of  implementing  the  Workforce  Strategy  through  the  stated
goals.
Understand the Mission Requirements
Workforce Planning

Implementation  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  requires  an  especially  strong
workforce  planning  capability—a  capability  that  will  allow  Centers  and  the  Agency
to  identify  and  assess  areas  of  workforce  risk  so  that  viable  solutions  to  mitigate
those risks can be developed and implemented.

Recognizing  that  it  is  critical  that  all  levels  of  management  be  involved  in  work-
force planning, the Agency’s first Workforce Planning Governance Structure was es-
tablished  in  January  2007.  The  Governance  Structure  comprises  key  management
officials  from  across  the  Agency  who,  in  collaboration  with  the  human  resources
community,  work  together  to  identify  Agency  workforce  risks  and  develop  solutions
to workforce issues as soon as they emerge.

We  have  also  integrated  and  synchronized  workforce  planning  with  the  develop-
ment of program and project budgets. This new approach—planning and integration
among  all  levels  of  management—helps  NASA  determine  the  best  application  of
workforce  to  projects  as  they  proceed  from  formulation  through  development  and
mission  operations.  With  an  enhanced  workforce  planning  capability,  NASA  will  be
better  able  to  determine  the  demand  for,  and  supply  of,  workforce  skills  based  on

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

current  and  projected  work  requirements  and  to  identify  areas  of  potential  risk  in
matching workforce to work. This will allow more time to develop strategies to miti-
gate  these  risks.  In  addition,  we’ve  enhanced  our  ability  to  analyze  workforce  data
necessary to support effective workforce planning. We have begun to develop meas-
ures  to  monitor  multiple  dimensions  of  workforce  capability  at  the  Centers  and  to
identify areas of strengths and weaknesses.
Shuttle Workforce Transition

With the retirement of the Shuttle in 2010, NASA will shift from the current pri-
mary  focus  on  operations  to  one  in  which  we  develop  new  systems,  with  the  capa-
bility  for  human  space  exploration  missions  to  the  Moon,  on  to  Mars  and  beyond.
These changes have significant workforce implications—for both civil servants and
contractors. The nature of the work will change as we transition from Shuttle oper-
ations to research and development-focused activities like planning, design, develop-
ment, testing and verification for Constellation systems. This presents unique chal-
lenges  to  the  Agency.  NASA  must  retain  the  skills  necessary  to  safely  execute  the
remaining Shuttle missions, manage the transition of skilled Shuttle employees into
Constellation  development,  and  retain  skills  between  FY  2010  and  FY  2015  nec-
essary to safely execute Constellation flight operations.

The National Research Council noted that ‘‘NASA has undertaken a commendable
top-down  analysis  of  current  agency  needs  and  the  skill  levels  of  its  current  work-
force that the committee believes is an excellent first step’’ (Finding 1). We acknowl-
edge that more work is needed, though. As the Constellation Systems Requirements
Reviews  are  completed  this  year,  NASA  will  gain  a  much  clearer  understanding  of
the  demand  for  future  workforce  skills,  which  will  form  the  foundation  for  making
any future decisions.

We are engaged in many initiatives to manage this transition. We are striving to
give  our  employees  opportunities  to  build  on  their  existing  skills  by  moving  appro-
priate  work  packages  across  the  Centers  to  match  resident  workforce  skills,  by
building  ‘‘virtual’’  project  teams  within  and  across  Centers,  and  by  offering  tem-
porary details. Through such initiatives, many employees will be prepared to easily
transition into new positions when the exploration systems development work comes
on-line. We are developing a mapping of current available skills among the Shuttle
workforce  with  the  skills  we  will  need  for  future  work  so  that  we  can  better  plan
and  implement  workforce  reassignments.  We  are  supporting  retraining  to  ensure
that  employees  have  the  skills  to  be  successful  in  the  new  work.  We  are  making
good  use  of  temporary  and  term  appointments  to  get  the  flexibility  to  better  align
to the time-phased workload.

As  we  work  through  this  transition,  NASA  remains  committed  to  working  with
our industry, supplier, and research partners to minimize disruption, upheaval, and
economic  impact,  while  maximizing  support  vital  for  Shuttle  missions  and  program
requirements. A Shuttle Human Capital Council convened recently to bring together
the  civil  service  and  contractor  Human  Resources  Directors  to  surface  and  address
common  workforce  issues,  share  best  practices  in  resolving  issues,  and  strengthen
the human capital network.
Workforce Flexibilities

In March 2007, NASA submitted legislative proposals to the Subcommittee to pro-
vide the Agency with additional workforce flexibilities to better implement the tran-
sition from the Space Shuttle era to the new era of exploration.

Several years ago, NASA gained important new workforce flexibilities through the
enactment  of  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004.  Those  flexibilities  have  made  a  dif-
ference  already,  and  will  be  vitally  important  to  the  Agency  over  the  coming  years
in  competing  for  top  talent  and  maintaining  the  knowledge  base  of  the  workforce.
However,  the  authorities  in  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  represent,  for  the  most  part,
tools for attracting and retaining high-quality employees. They do not address a dif-
ferent—but equally critical—human capital challenge: managing attrition in a stra-
tegic, effective, and compassionate manner. The need for attrition management tools
is particularly important to NASA as we face the challenges associated with retain-
ing  Shuttle  skills  through  completion  of  the  Program,  and  then  effectively
transitioning that workforce.

In many cases, skill misalignments can be addressed by retraining or reassigning
the  employees  whose  skills  cannot  be  utilized  effectively  in  their  current  assign-
ments.  NASA  has  been  aggressive  in  this  regard  over  the  past  several  years  with
hundreds of people now productively and enthusiastically engaged in the Constella-
tion Program. But not all skill misalignments can be resolved by retraining and re-
deployment. Furthermore, NASA historically has had an exceptionally low attrition
rate, rendering reshaping of the workforce difficult and slow.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

As such, NASA needs to manage attrition in a targeted manner to achieve better
alignment of the workforce with the mission without creating unwanted losses, skill
imbalances, and disruption in the general workforce. But that is not the only objec-
tive.  The  method  by  which  attrition  is  achieved  is  just  as  important.  NASA  must
manage  attrition  in  a  way  that  does  not  demoralize  the  workforce,  create  an  envi-
ronment  of  uncertainty,  generate  a  lack  of  trust  in  management,  or  stimulate  the
departure  of  the  workforce  the  Agency  needs  to  retain.  If  attrition  is  not  managed
in  the  right  way,  NASA’s  outstanding  image  as  a  leading  employer  of  choice  will
be eroded, resulting in a long-term negative impact on the Agency’s ability to attract
and retain the workforce it needs.

NASA has submitted proposals for two new workforce authorities in its legislative
package—a  conversion  incentive  and  temporary  continuation  of  coverage  of  health
benefits—in  order  to  manage  attrition  more  effectively  and  strategically.  The  con-
version  incentive  would  allow  the  Administrator  to  pay  a  permanent  employee  a
monetary  incentive  for  voluntarily  converting  to  a  time-limited  appointment.  The
purpose of this financial incentive is to offset the risk the employee assumes by giv-
ing up the right to continued permanent employment. The incentive may not exceed
$25,000  or  25  percent  of  the  employee’s  annual  salary,  whichever  is  less,  for  each
12-month period of service for which the incentive is paid. Unlike a buy-out, an em-
ployee  who  converts  to  a  term  appointment  and  receives  the  conversion  incentive
is  not  precluded  from  securing  full  time  federal  employment  and  retaining  the  in-
centive.

This  authority  is  particularly  tailored  to  managing  the  Shuttle  workforce.  A  con-
version  incentive  serves  as  both  an  incentive  for  the  employee  to  remain  with  the
program  to  the  date  needed  by  management  (similar  to  the  concept  of  a  retention
incentive)  while  allowing  management  to  plan  for  an  orderly  release  of  employees
on a defined date without the need to resort to involuntary actions such as a reduc-
tion-in-force.

The other workforce provision in the legislative proposals, the temporary continu-
ation  of  coverage  of  health  benefits,  would  permit  NASA  to  pay  the  government’s
share  of  the  Federal  Employees  Health  Benefits  premiums  for  certain  NASA  em-
ployees  who  elect  temporary  continuation  of  health  benefits  coverage  upon  separa-
tion  from  NASA.  Eligible  employees  would  be  those  who  are  separating  because
their  positions  are  being  eliminated.  This  provides  a  ‘‘soft  landing’’  benefit  to  em-
ployees who desire continued health coverage while they seek other employment and
are not otherwise eligible for the Federal health benefits without paying the full cost
of the premiums. We believe that this benefit will expand the pool of employees who
would be willing to resign voluntarily from the Agency.
Align the Workforce with the Mission

NASA  is  filled  with  highly  educated,  dedicated  employees  at  all  levels  who  love
what  they  do  and  are  inspired  by  the  challenging  and  exciting  environment.  Our
current  diverse  workforce  represents  a  wealth  of  skills  and  valuable  experience.  In
order  for  the  Agency  to  accomplish  its  aggressive  mission,  it  is  critical  that  this
workforce be aligned with the mission by strengthening the technical and leadership
excellence  of  our  employees  and  by  reshaping  the  workforce  to  better  serve  future
mission  requirements.  In  addition,  as  more  of  our  experienced  employees  reach  re-
tirement eligibility, it is imperative that we attract and develop the new talent that
is needed to implement the Agency’s Exploration, Science and Aeronautics missions.
To  do  so,  we  must  create,  sharpen,  and  use  all  the  tools  that  are  needed  to  enable
current and future employees to support the work of this agency.
Technical and Leadership Excellence

One  of  our  challenges  is  to  strengthen  the  technical  and  leadership  excellence  of
the  NASA  workforce.  In  so  doing,  we  have  a  number  of  tools  at  our  disposal  to  en-
sure  that  our  workforce  continues  to  excel  technically  and  that  we  are  building
‘‘bench strength’’ in both our technical disciplines as well as in our leadership roles.
To  strengthen  technical  excellence,  the  Office  of  the  Chief  Engineer  supports
NASA’s  field  centers  in  workforce  retraining  and  in  current  and  future  workforce
skill development through its Academy of Program/Project and Engineering Leader-
ship  (APPEL),  the  NASA  Engineering  Network  (NEN),  and  the  NASA  Engineering
Safety  Center  (NESC)  Academy.  These  programs  are  designed  to  both  develop  and
enhance  the  professional  knowledge  of  NASA  program/project  managers  and  engi-
neers at all career levels; to capture and transfer knowledge from seasoned program/
project  managers  and  engineers  across  NASA  as  well  as  from  industry,  academia,
and international partners; and to ensure that lessons learned are captured for the
next generation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

In order to build leadership ‘‘bench strength,’’ we have developed a corporate, inte-
grated approach to leadership development. NASA has created a leadership strategy
which  is  used  both  agency-wide  and  at  the  Centers  as  a  framework  for  designing
and  implementing  leadership  programs.  This  framework  provides  continuity
through succession planning and executive development—creating a skilled pipeline
for leadership within NASA. It includes a variety of components: workforce planning
and  analysis,  career  paths,  formal  agency-wide  leadership  development  programs,
formal  and  informal  coaching  and  mentoring  programs,  and  leadership  training.
Many  of  these  Programs  are  supplemented  by  Center-level  development  activities.
Our  formal  Agency-wide  programs  reflect  a  life  cycle  approach  to  leadership  devel-
opment with programs targeting entry, mid and senior level employees as they pre-
pare for leadership responsibilities.
Reshaping of the Workforce

Another challenge is to reshape the existing workforce to better serve current and
future requirements. This involves not only some reductions in aggregate workforce
size,  but  also  a  build  up  in  areas  of  greater  need  and  reduction  in  areas  that  are
surplus to evolving mission requirements.

The  use  of  buy-out/early  out  authority  to  encourage  voluntary  attrition  has  been
critical  to  NASA  workforce  reshaping.  Since  the  start  of  FY  2004,  over  1,300  em-
ployees  in  targeted  areas  of  surplus  took  buy-outs  or  early  outs.  This  is  over  one-
third  of  the  total  attrition  of  3,500  during  this  period.  We  continue  to  monitor  this
program  to  ensure  that  experienced  employees  with  needed  and  critical  skills  are
not leaving the Agency and that the safety of the Space Shuttle or the International
Space Station is not compromised.

To replace normal attrition and strengthen areas with increased requirements, we
have  hired  nearly  2,500  employees  with  a  range  of  experiences  and  skills.  Of  this
number,  700  are  workers  hired  either  directly  out  of  colleges  and  universities,  or
shortly  thereafter.  NASA  Centers  make  good  use  of  programs  such  as  the  student
employment  program  and  the  Federal  Career  Intern  Program  to  recruit  new  talent
into  the  Agency.  NASA  Centers  have  cooperative  education  program  (co-op)  agree-
ments  in  place  with  multiple  universities.  Across  the  Centers,  we  have  maintained
a  constant  average  of  450  students  participating  in  the  co-op  Program.  These  stu-
dents have an opportunity to get ‘‘hands-on’’ experience in their technical field, and
to  demonstrate  their  abilities  on  the  job.  The  best  of  them  are  converted  to  entry
level  engineers,  scientists  and  business  professionals  upon  graduation.  The  Federal
Career Intern Program also has allowed us to hire recent college graduates. The fact
that these interns are brought in as term appointments, with the ability to convert
them  to  permanent  positions,  provides  additional  flexibility  in  managing  our  work-
force.  Of  the  700  entry  level  hires,  400  have  been  outside  hires  and  the  other  300
are conversions from either our co-op pool or from temporary or term appointments.
We  are  also  refining  our  recruitment  strategy  by  conducting  more  targeted  re-
cruitment on mission critical occupations and with under-represented groups; work-
ing with NASA’s Office of Education to enhance and expand student programs that
can  serve  as  a  pipeline  into  our  workforce;  and  developing  partnerships  and  rela-
tionships that can be beneficial in future recruitment efforts.

The  tools  provided  by  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  continue  to  be  vitally  im-
portant  as  we  reshape  our  workforce.  They  provide  targeted  solutions  to  multiple
challenges—the  need  to  recruit  new  talent  and  the  need  to  leverage  the  talent  of
the  current  workforce.  Along  with  the  government  wide  flexibilities,  they  provide
over  a  dozen  tools  that  include  enhanced  recruitment,  relocation  and  retention  bo-
nuses,  expanded  use  of  term  appointments,  pay  authority  for  critical  positions,  and
enhanced  travel  and  annual  leave  benefits  for  new  hires.  We  make  use  of  the  full
range  of  these  flexibilities  and  find  that  combining  them  to  create  incentive  pack-
ages  tailored  to  the  needs  of  specific  candidates  has  been  a  particularly  successful
strategy.
Enable Effective and Efficient Human Resources Operations

To effectively manage change while attending to our critical resource, our people,
NASA must leverage information technology to provide more responsive, reliable in-
formation to support decision-making.
Workforce Information Systems

Our  current  human  resources  information  systems  (HRIS)  environment  is  quite
robust,  providing  automated  solutions  for  the  majority  of  our  human  capital  pro-
grams, and providing a wealth of information to managers and workforce planners.
NASA  is  working  toward  full  integration  of  the  HRIS  environment  and  improve-
ment of capabilities that will provide the full range of information required to most
effectively manage our changing environment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

Over the years, NASA has invested in a number of Agency-wide systems such as
our  Staffing  and  Recruitment  System  and  our  Competency  Management  System
(CMS). CMS enables NASA to assess the demand for, and supply of, workforce skills
based on current and projected work requirements. CMS captures the competencies
for  every  civil  service  position  and  multiple  personal  competencies  for  each  indi-
vidual  NASA  employee.  Management  of  personal  competencies  enables  the  identi-
fication  of  expertise  across  the  Agency  and  provides  the  capability  to  integrate  this
information for use in planning the workforce.

Competencies are the common thread that tie the elements of workforce manage-
ment  together.  CMS  is  a  relatively  new  system  that  we  are  continually  working  to
improve.  By  integrating  CMS  with  other  workforce  planning  tools,  we  are  able  to
not only identify the critical current and future competency gaps and surpluses, but
we  can  weave  that  competency  information  throughout  the  workforce  management
process.

Recognizing the almost limitless possibilities of information technology (IT), NASA
is converging business systems, expanding access to managers, supervisors, and em-
ployees,  and  increasing  the  capabilities  of  tools  and  applications.  These  efforts  will
form a Human Capital Information Environment (HCIE) that will provide a founda-
tion for total business systems integration, foster Agency-wide collaboration, provide
tools and information to assist our management team in their strategic planning ef-
forts,  and  provide  near  real-time  comprehensive  information  to  enable  and  inform
decision-making at all levels.

Developing an HCIE is the first step in instituting a fully integrated, strategically
focused,  business  environment  for  online,  near  real-time  access  to  reliable,  com-
prehensive information that managers need for rapid and accurate decision-making.
The HCIE will inter-operate seamlessly with NASA’s financial management authori-
tative  data  repository  (ADR),  and  provide  dependable  integrated  workforce  and  fi-
nancial  information  to  all  organizational  elements.  A  common,  robust  data  reposi-
tory  will  remove  the  need  for  redundant  systems  because  the  ADR  will  furnish  the
wealth  of  information  needed  to  meet  the  demands  of  this  mission-driven,  project-
oriented Agency.

Information will be presented through a secure, web-based workforce services por-
tal  accessible  from  the  user’s  desktop  computer,  enabling  managers  to  formulate
workforce plans and manage employees; manage and plan based on workforce indi-
cators,  including  competency,  demographic  and  trending  information;  and  conduct
analyses  and  run  reports  using  common  and  timely  information.  The  initial  oper-
ating capability for HCIE is planned for the summer of 2007 with final implementa-
tion  during  the  Fall  of  2008.  The  capabilities  of  HCIE  are  enormous,  limited  only
by  our  ingenuity  in  identifying  the  boundless  ways  in  which  information  can  be
woven together to drive decisions and enable success.
Summary

In implementing the NASA Workforce Strategy and associated workforce manage-
ment goals, NASA is positioning itself to deal effectively with the critical issues now
facing  the  Agency  on  an  integrated,  Agency-wide  basis.  NASA  is  putting  in  place
approaches  that  not  only  will  alleviate  the  Agency’s  current  imbalances,  but  also
provide  a  structure  that  allows  such  issues  to  be  resolved  in  the  future  as  part  of
a  deliberate,  systematic  process.  To  quote  the  NASA  Administrator,  ‘‘. . .it  is  clear
that an understanding of the broad issues, the big picture, is so much more influen-
tial in determining the ultimate success or failure of an enterprise than is the mas-
tery of any given technical detail. The understanding of the organizational and tech-
nical interactions in our systems, emphatically including the human beings who are
a  part  of  them,  is  the  present-day  frontier  of  both  engineering  education  and  prac-
tice.’’ The foundation that NASA is building is a big picture view that will facilitate
and  institutionalize  long-term  planning  and  Agency-level  coordination.  As  stated  in
the  NRC  report,  though,  some  of  the  issues  NASA  faces  are  ‘‘not  unique  to  NASA’’
and require ‘‘a national approach’’ to solve them. NASA plans to be in the forefront
in developing such approaches.

Last  year  NASA  presented  its  Workforce  Strategy  which  outlined  the  steps  to
manage  the  transitions  associated  with  implementing  the  Agency’s  Exploration,
Science  and  Aeronautics  missions.  Since  then,  we  have  made  significant  progress,
with specific human capital initiatives aimed at three key goals: understanding mis-
sion  requirements,  aligning  workforce  to  mission,  and  enabling  effective  and  effi-
cient human resources operations. The NRC and NAPA reports confirm the actions
we’ve initiated, and will continue to inform further implementation of the Strategy.

I would be please to respond to any questions the Subcommittee may have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Dawsey.  Mr.  Stewart,  five

minutes.

Mr.  STEWART.  I  would  be  personally  remiss,  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I
didn’t  say  how  much  I  admired  your  father,  and  had  a  chance  to
work with him on occasion back in the old days, but a truly great,
great public servant, and I am not just——

Chairman  UDALL.  On  that  note,  I  would  put  Judge  Hall  in  that
same  category,  as  a  great  public  servant,  and  somebody  who  has
roots  in  that  area,  and  Judge  Hall  has  helped  to,  in  his  own  way,
keep that spirit alive, so——

Mr. HALL. Mr. Chairman, would you yield?
Chairman  UDALL.  I  would  be  happy  to  yield  to  my  good  friend

from Texas.

Mr.  HALL.  I  knew  Mo  Udall,  and  I’m  no  Mo  Udall.  I  would  say
this,  that  I  learned  more  from  Mo,  my  first  office  was  directly
across  from  him  back  27  years  ago,  and  I  learned  more  from  him
the  first  30  days  than  I  had  learned  in  the  last  ten  years  in  the
Texas Senate.

Chairman  UDALL.  You  are  out  of  order  again  twice  in  one  day.
STATEMENT  OF  MR.  JOHN  G.  STEWART,  NATIONAL  ACADEMY
OF  PUBLIC  ADMINISTRATION  FELLOW;  MEMBER,  PANEL  ON
NASA MULTI–SECTOR WORKFORCE
Mr. STEWART. Well, anyway, I had better get going here.
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  Sally  Anne
Harper,  our  panel  chair,  very  much  wanted  to  present  this  testi-
mony.  She  is  the  Chief  Administrative  Officer  at  the  Government
Accountability  Office,  and  her  duties  there  this  morning  made  her
appearance  not  possible,  and  so  they  have  to  go  to  the  bench,  and
I am here to stand in for Sally Anne Harper.

Our panel had six major conclusions and recommendations. First,
we  said  that  NASA  should  make  greater  use  of  strategic  planning
mechanisms  to  position  itself  for  programmatic  and  scheduled
changes.  The  agency  needs  to  adopt  a  longer  range,  risk-based
planning  strategy  to  anticipate  and  respond  effectively  to  future
program  needs,  budget  shortfalls,  and  schedule  revisions  for  its
total multi-sector workforce.

Despite  declining  overall  budgets  for  aeronautics,  as  well  as  re-
ductions  in  some  scientific  programs,  NASA  has  retained  most  of
its aeronautic and scientific workforce. Although many of these in-
dividuals  can  continue  working  on  existing  aeronautics  and  sci-
entific programs, or transition to new programs, it is unrealistic to
expect that all will be able to do so. Essentially, NASA needs to de-
termine  the  number  and  type  of  employees  that  would  constitute
a  critical  mass  for  its  aeronautics  and  scientific  responsibilities,  as
well  as  a  critical  mass  to  develop  the  various  systems  needed  to
achieve the Vision for Space Exploration.

Second,  NASA  must  broaden  its  workforce  planning  to  encom-
pass  its  multi-sector  workforce.  The  process  should  inventory  the
key components and skills available for both civil servants and con-
tractor  organizations,  including  the  Jet  Propulsion  Laboratory.  In
the initial version of the NASA Workforce Plan, it dealt solely with
civil  servants,  and  we  felt  that  this  was  an  omission  that  needs  to
be acted on.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Third,  NASA  must  integrate  its  acquisition  and  human  capital
planning  processes.  This  is  really  important.  Contracts  provide
surge and long-term support capacity, as well as the ability to shift
people  and  competencies  as  the  mission  dictates.  So,  NASA  has
made  a  good  start  at  establishing  a  new  acquisition  process  that
begins  with  a  strategic  discussion  of  whether  and  how  to  contract
for  major  programs  and  projects,  but  this  should  be  further  devel-
oped. Such integration will help NASA better understand the work-
force  implications  of  contracting  decisions.  To  help  facilitate  this
process,  the  Panel  designed  two  rules  to  help  managers  focus  on
the  critical  common  factors  to  consider  in  making  civil  service
versus contractor decisions.

Fourth, NASA should strengthen its human capital function, and
use a formal process to decide when to hire a permanent civil serv-
ant  or  a  term  employee.  As  one  of  NASA’s  most  critical  internal
support  capabilities,  human  capital  needs  to  be  a  full  participant
in  all  agency  decisions,  with  important  workforce  implications,  in-
cluding  high  level  planning  for  the  total  workforce.  And  NASA  is
moving  in  that  direction,  let  me  just  interject,  which  is  good.  And
to  be  effective,  human  capital  professionals  must  have  the  ability
to  identify  skill  mismatches,  promote  the  effective  use  of  existing
flexibilities, and collaborate with others to craft other needed flexi-
bilities.  In  addition,  NASA  needs  to  be  more  strategic  in  how  to
make civil service hiring and conversion decisions, and we have de-
veloped a tool to assist NASA decision-making in these areas.

Fifth,  the  Panel  has  concerns  about  the  long-term  health  of
NASA’s  research  centers,  and  believes  that  the  Agency  should  use
a  more  comprehensive  framework  to  evaluate  them.  The  panel
found  NASA’s  approach  to  healthy  centers  to  be  people-focused,
which  to  some  degree  is  fine,  but  with  an  emphasis  on  fully  fund-
ing civil servants to assist NASA in this area, the Panel developed
a detailed 12 factor framework covering such areas as center’s mis-
sion,  program  performance,  civil  service,  contractor  workforce,  and
organizational  structure.  This  framework  should  help  NASA  bal-
ance changing mission requirements and budget constraints.

Sixth, NASA must make maximum use of existing human capital
flexibilities, while seeking new authorizations for necessary reform,
and  of  course,  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  gave  NASA  some
flexibilities. They are being used, but not as fully as they could be,
and we think there are some more that are needed.

And more controversially, and we know this is controversial, the
Panel  believes  that  Congress  should  provide  NASA  with  limited
emergency  authority  to  invoke  a  fully  eligible  individual’s  retire-
ment  to  meet  work  restructuring  needs,  if  some  or  all  of  the  fol-
lowing criteria are met, and we list those criteria, and we can talk
about  them  in  the  question  period.  And  I  want  to  emphasize  that
these  statutory  recommendations  that  we  are  making  cannot  be
implemented by NASA alone. They require action by Congress and
OPM  in  the  face  of  likely  political  resistance.  They  are  controver-
sial. And let me just say for the record, we understand that NASA
understands  the  nature  of  this  problem.  It  has  taken  some  initial
steps, and we have made some suggestions to help them move fur-
ther down the right road.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

Mr. Chairman, that concludes my prepared statement, and I will

answer questions when that time comes.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Stewart follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN G. STEWART

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity
to testify today. I represent a Panel of the National Academy of Public Administra-
tion that recently completed, a comprehensive study of the workforce challenges fac-
ing  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  That  study  was
done  at  the  request  of  the  Senate  Appropriations  Committee.  As  the  former  Staff
Director of the Senate Science, Technology, and Space Subcommittee, I recognize the
importance  this  committee  attaches  to  addressing  critical  aeronautics  and  space
issues.

Also, as a former member of the NASA Aerospace Safety Advisory Panel, I strong-
ly  believe  NASA’s  mission  to  advance  space  exploration,  scientific  discoveries,  and
aeronautics  research  is  critical  to  our  nation.  Thirty-eight  years  after  the  Apollo  11
mission, NASA remains the only organization in the world to have landed a person
on  the  Moon.  Now,  with  the  Congressionally-authorized  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration, NASA is tasked with expanding our presence in the solar system and estab-
lishing a permanent human outpost on the Moon.

Our Panel was asked to examine several critical questions:

• How  should  NASA  decide  whether  to  obtain  the  services  and  products  from

a contractor or hire a civil servant?

• If  NASA  decides  to  hire  a  civil  servant,  what  kind  of  appointment  should  it

use (tenured permanent or multi-year term)?

• What is a healthy center? How should NASA measure it?

In responding, we primarily focused on issues facing NASA as it transitions from
the  Shuttle  program  to  the  Vision.  The  Panel  had  six  major  conclusions  and  rec-
ommendations.
First,  NASA  should  make  greater  use  of  strategic  planning  mechanisms  to
position itself for programmatic and schedule changes.

The Agency needs to adopt a longer-range, risk-based planning strategy to antici-
pate  and  respond  effectively  to  future  program  needs,  budget  shortfalls,  and  sched-
ule  revisions  for  its  total  multi-sector  workforce.  Despite  declining  overall  budgets
for  aeronautics,  as  well  as  reductions  in  some  scientific  programs,  NASA  has  re-
tained most of its aeronautics and scientific workforce. Although many of these indi-
viduals can continue working on existing aeronautics and scientific programs or the
transition to new programs, it is unrealistic to expect that all will be able to do so.
Essentially, NASA needs to determine the number and type of employees that would
constitute a critical mass for its aeronautics and scientific responsibilities.
Second, NASA must broaden its workforce planning to encompass its multi-
sector workforce.

This  process  should  inventory  the  key  competencies  and  skills  available  for  both
civil servants and contractor organizations. Although contractors constitute approxi-
mately two-thirds of NASA’s total workforce of 58,000 employees, the Agency’s April
2006 Workforce Strategy focused solely on its 18,000 civil servants. Many of the con-
tractors—and  particularly  the  up  to  26,000  on-site  contractors—have  competencies
that  mirror  those  of  NASA  civil  servants.  A  broader  workforce  planning  process
would  allow  NASA  to  maximize  organizational  flexibility  and  fully  leverage  its
workforce to meet changing demands.
Third,  NASA  must  integrate  its  acquisition  and  human  capital  planning
processes.

Contracts  provide  surge  and  long-term  support  capacity  as  well  as  the  ability  to
shift people and competencies as the mission dictates. NASA has made a good start
at  establishing  a  new  acquisition  process  that  begins  with  a  strategic  discussion  of
whether  and  how  to  contract  for  major  programs  and  projects.  But,  this  should  be
further developed. NASA needs to factor in how cost, safety, facility availability, ex-
isting expertise, and scheduling will impact agency work. Such integration will help
NASA better understand the workforce implications of contracting decisions. To help
facilitate  this  process,  the  Panel  designed  tools  to  help  managers  focus  on  critical
common factors to consider in making civil service vs. contractor decisions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Fourth,  NASA  should  strengthen  its  human  capital  function  and  use  a  for-
mal process to decide when to hire a permanent civil servant or a term em-
ployee.

As one of NASA’s most critical internal support capabilities, human capital needs
to  be  a  full  participant  in  all  agency  decisions  with  important  workforce  implica-
tions,  including  high-level  planning  for  the  total  workforce.  And,  to  be  effective,
human capital professionals must have the ability to identify skill mismatches, pro-
mote  the  effective  use  of  existing  flexibilities,  and  collaborate  with  others  to  craft
other needed flexibilities.

In addition, NASA needs to be more strategic in how it makes civil service hiring
and conversion decisions. While the Agency uses many short-tenure employees, each
center  currently  has  discretion  to  make  its  own  decisions  about  which  type  of  civil
servant to hire, and conversion to permanent employment is the predominant prac-
tice  for  most  NASA  term  hires.  The  Panel  developed  a  tool  to  assist  NASA’s  deci-
sion-making in these areas.
Fifth,  the  Panel  has  concerns  about  the  long-term  health  of  NASA’s  re-
search centers and believes that the Agency should use a more comprehen-
sive framework to evaluate them.

The  Panel  found  NASA’s  approach  to  healthy  centers  to  be  people  focused  with
an emphasis on fully funding civil servants. To assist NASA in this area, the Panel
developed  a  detailed  twelve-factor  framework  covering  such  areas  as  the  center’s
mission, program performance, civil service and contractor workforce, and organiza-
tional  structure.  This  framework  should  help  NASA  balance  changing  mission  re-
quirements  and  budget  constraints.  The  Panel  believes  the  ultimate  test  of  the  ten
healthy centers approach is whether it leads to a healthy NASA.
Sixth,  NASA  must  make  maximum  use  of  existing  human  capital  flexibili-
ties while seeking new authorizations for other necessary reforms.

NASA has acknowledged that the significant programmatic changes over the past
few  years  have  created  a  major  imbalance  between  the  work  the  Agency  plans  to
do  and  the  existing  workforce.  In  the  Panel’s  view,  this  imbalance  is  NASA’s  most
serious  workforce  challenge.  While  the  Agency’s  mission  and  allocation  of  resources
have  been  changing  substantially,  the  civil  service  workforce  has  not.  The  Panel
found  that  NASA  could  be  more  proactive  in  using  currently  available  flexibilities
by  establishing  a  more  innovative  recruitment  program  and  encouraging  the  out-
placement of blocks of employees with competencies no longer needed.

Also,  the  Panel  believes  that  NASA  should  be  provided  a  package  of  additional
flexibilities.  Clearly,  Administrator  Griffin’s  recent  request  for  legislative  authority
to  pay  an  allowance  to  civil  servants  who  voluntarily  convert  to  a  time-limited  ap-
pointment  recognizes  the  significant  challenges  facing  NASA.  Among  other  things,
the Panel believes that Congress should increase the monetary cap on buy-outs and
establish  a  new  Reduction-in-Force  (RIF)  framework  for  NASA  modeled  on  the  Na-
tional Institute of Science and Technology’s Alternative Personnel Management Sys-
tem.  This  new  framework  would  allow  the  Agency  to  retain  its  highest-performing
employees  in  critical  occupations  by  enhancing  the  weight  given  to  performance,
narrowing  the  definition  of  ‘‘competitive  area,’’  and  preventing  employees  from
‘‘bumping’’ or ‘‘retreating’’ into positions for which they are poorly suited. The Panel
also believes that OPM should grant blanket authority to NASA to conduct buy-outs
over the next five years and to waive salary offsets when recruiting reemployed fed-
eral annuitants for critical areas.

More controversially, the Panel believes that Congress should provide NASA with
limited emergency authority to invoke a fully eligible individual’s retirement to meet
work restructuring needs if some or all of the following criteria are met:

• The employee’s skills are no longer required for mission accomplishment.
• The  employee’s  skills  are  outdated  or  unnecessary,  and  management  deter-
mines  that  retraining  would  not  be  practical,  or  the  employee  is  unwilling  to
update skills.

• Funding for the employee’s existing work is not available.
• The employee’s skills are not easily transferred to other work.

Retiring employees should be compensated fairly by being given severance pay in
addition to earned annuities. While NASA would not likely use this emergency stat-
utory authority on a broad basis, its availability would provide the means to secure
the  expertise  required  for  its  highly  complex  mission,  protecting  the  safety  and  in-
tegrity of the space program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

I want to emphasize that these statutory and regulatory recommendations cannot
be  implemented  by  NASA  alone.  They  require  action  by  Congress  and  OPM  in  the
face of likely political resistance. However, by providing NASA with the tools to re-
shape its workforce, Congress could more easily hold NASA accountable for meeting
program milestones in a cost-effective, timely way.

Mr. Chairman, underlying the Panel’s recommendations is the belief that NASA’s
institutional  health  depends  on  a  knowledge-based,  data-driven  approach  to  work-
force  utilization  and  management.  For  NASA  to  develop  an  optimally-sized,  appro-
priately  skilled  workforce  that  is  flexible  and  scalable,  it  will  need  to  make  human
capital decisions based on the rigorous collection and analysis of data widely shared
with  stakeholders.  From  our  work,  we  believe  that  NASA  understands  the  nature
of  this  problem.  It  has  taken  some  initial  steps,  but  more  significant  changes  are
needed. We believe NASA could adopt most of our recommendations without signifi-
cant  additional  resources.  And,  the  Panel’s  recommended  approach  would  not  only
provide  a  stronger  basis  for  internal  agency  decisions,  but  would  also  ensure  that
you, as Members of Congress, have better information decisions about annual appro-
priations  and  the  human  capital  flexibilities  needed  to  accomplish  NASA’s  mission.
Mr.  Chairman,  that  concludes  my  prepared  statement,  and  I  would  be  pleased  to

answer any questions you or the Subcommittee Members may have.

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Stewart,  and  Dr.  Black,  the

floor is yours.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  DAVID  C.  BLACK,  PRESIDENT  EMERITUS,
UNIVERSITIES  SPACE  RESEARCH  ASSOCIATION;  ADJUNCT
PROFESSOR, PHYSICS AND ASTRONOMY DEPARTMENT, RICE
UNIVERSITY; CO-CHAIR, COMMITTEE ON ISSUES AFFECTING
THE  FUTURE  OF  THE  U.S.  SPACE  SCIENCE  AND  ENGINEER-
ING  WORKFORCE,  NATIONAL  RESEARCH  COUNCIL,  THE  NA-
TIONAL ACADEMIES
Dr.  BLACK.  Chairman  Udall,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  and  Com-
mittee  Members,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you
today.  I  appear  in  my  capacity  as  Co-Chair  of  the  National  Re-
search  Council’s  Committee  on  Issues  Affecting  the  Future  of  the
U.S. Space Science and Engineering Workforce. My Co-Chair of the
NRC study, Professor Daniel Hastings, joins me today, and you can
tell which one of us drew the short straw.

Our  committee  found  it  useful  to  consider  two  distinct  time-
frames  when  evaluating  the  NASA  workforce  as  it  relates  to
NASA’s  implementation  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  Spe-
cifically, we looked at the next five years, and then, the timeframe
beyond  2012.  I  want  to  highlight  three  aspects  of  our  committee’s
conclusions.

First,  in  the  view  of  our  committee,  NASA  does  not  currently
have the expertise needed in-house, particularly in the areas of sys-
tems  engineering  and  project  management,  to  implement  the  Vi-
sion, nor do we feel that any amount of training or retraining dur-
ing this timeframe will address fully the shortage of expertise.

Second,  we  are  confident  that  a  well  thought  out  and  imple-
mented training and hiring program will allow NASA to be well po-
sitioned  in  the  post-2012  timeframe  to  implement  the  Vision.
Third, the Committee feels strongly that the issues NASA faces are
not  unique  to  NASA.  They  are  at  the  heart  of  any  assessment  of
the  Nation’s  aerospace  technical  workforce  generally,  and  as  such,
deserve consideration on a national scale.

Mr. Chairman, I would like to share a story with the Committee.
At  the  end  of  April,  after  our  committee  presented  its  report  to
NASA,  the  Agency  announced  the  winner  of  its  Astronautic  Glove

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Challenge. The winner was Mr. Peter Homer. NASA used this new
and nontraditional approach to acquire a hardware design that will
eventually  improve  the  ability  of  our  astronauts  to  work  in  space,
but  this  is  not  simply  a  story  about  new  equipment  or  an  innova-
tive approach to finding new ideas, one that our committee, in fact,
endorses. It turns out that Mr. Homer is unemployed, and actually
left  the  field  of  aerospace  engineering  many  years  ago  to  work  as
a sales manager in the computer industry.

Indeed,  this  is  a  frequent  aspect  of  the  aerospace  workforce,  if  I
could  have  the  first  figure,  please.  This  is  some  data  that  we  got
from  NSF,  and  pertains  to  the  year  2003.  As  you  can  see,  of  the
roughly  200,000  people,  that  blue  circle,  currently  working  in  the
aerospace  and  space  science  arenas,  only  40  percent  of  them  have
degrees in those areas. Oh, you can’t see it. I can see it. I am sorry
you can’t see it.

Chairman  UDALL.  Dr.  Black,  why  don’t  you  continue,  and  we

will——

Dr. BLACK. I will just continue.
Chairman UDALL. And this will be included in the record, and we

will do our best—here we go.

Dr.  BLACK.  Very  good.  Thank  you.  The  blue  area,  as  I  say,  has
roughly  200,000  people,  and  those  are  the  ones  currently  working.
Only  40  percent  of  them  actually  have  degrees  in  that  area.  An-
other  point  to  make  here  is  that  the  NASA  civil  service  workforce
comprises only 10 percent of that area.

Moreover,  fully  75  percent  of  the  people  with  degrees  in  aero-
space and space science are not currently working in this area, peo-
ple  like  Mr.  Homer.  The  point  here  is  that  one  needs  to  take  care
in interpreting the many numbers floating around, in terms of how
many  skilled  workers  truly  are  available  for  these  kinds  of  activi-
ties.

One  of  the  main  themes  of  our  report  is  the  need  for  hands-on
training  for  NASA’s  workforce,  particularly  in  the  areas  that  are
key to achieving its programs on schedule and on budget. The Com-
mittee  recognized  that  two  skill  areas  are  important  not  only  to
NASA, but to the national security space programs. These are sys-
tems  engineering  and  program  project  management.  Those  skills
cannot  simply  be  produced  in  a  classroom.  They  must  be  acquired
over  time.  Just  as  a  baseball  player  cannot  become  proficient  by
seeing  the  game  explained  on  a  blackboard,  a  systems  engineer
cannot  become  proficient  at  his  job  without  building  and  inte-
grating a spacecraft.

But also, just as baseball players do not immediately head to the
major  leagues  without  first  graduating  from  Little  Leagues,
through the farm systems, up to the majors, a systems engineer or
program  manager  must  also  start  small  and  gain  experience.  Un-
fortunately,  the  opportunities  for  gaining  this  kind  of  experience
are missing. If you look at the following figure, that shows the kind
of  opportunities  for  hands-on  experience  by  graduate  students  in
earth  and  space  sciences  over  the  years,  and  as  you  can  see,  they
have been diminishing. That shows both sounding rockets, airborne
opportunities,  balloons,  and  spacecraft,  and  in  the  aggregate,  as
well as each of the individual elements of that graph, have all been
decreasing drastically over the years.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

In  closing,  I  would  like  to  return  to  the  third  aspect  of  our  con-
clusions.  My  experience  as  a  former  NASA  employee  and  as  the
president  of  a  not-for-profit  association  of  a  hundred  universities
working with NASA is that the Agency has a tendency, has tended
to deal with problems in relative isolation of other entities, a reflec-
tion of the can-do attitude of the Apollo era, as well as a bit of the
not  invented  here  syndrome.  The  Committee  feels  that  NASA
workforce  issues  are  a  microcosm  of  a  broader  set  of  national  con-
cerns, and that solutions are best sought in the context of what the
Committee refers to as the aerospace ecosystem, shown here.

NASA  is  a  relatively  small  player  in  this  ecosystem.  As  I  said
earlier, the civil service makes up only 10 percent of the total work-
force,  and  it  therefore  seems  that  it  would  do  better  to  work  with
other  elements  in  defining  and  understanding  the  key  issues,  and
then  arriving  at  a  solution  that  is  in  everyone’s  best  interest.  In
this  way,  NASA  would  be  able  to  leverage  its  concerns  off  of  those
of the larger inhabitants of the ecosystem.

That  concludes  my  remarks,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  thank  you  for
your  interest  in  this  important  topic,  and  would  be  happy  to  an-
swer any questions you have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Black follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID C. BLACK

Mr. Chairman, Ranking Minority Member, and Committee Members: I appreciate
the opportunity to testify before you today. My name is David Black. I am President
Emeritus of the Universities Space Research Association. I am also an Adjunct Pro-
fessor in the Physics and Astronomy Department at Rice University. I appear today
largely  in  my  capacity  as  Co-Chair  of  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)’s  Com-
mittee  on  Issues  Affecting  the  Future  of  the  U.S.  Space  Science  and  Engineering
Workforce. The NRC is the operating arm of the National Academy of Sciences, Na-
tional Academy of Engineering, and the Institute of Medicine of the National Acad-
emies,  chartered  by  Congress  in  1863  to  advise  the  government  on  matters  of
science  and  technology.  The  views  expressed  in  my  testimony  today  are  primarily
those  expressed  by  the  NRC  Committee  in  its  Final  Report,  as  well  as  my  own.1
I  shall  do  my  best  to  make  clear  which  views  are  mine  and  which  are  those  of  the
Committee.  The  latter  views  are  fully  supported  by  my  co-chair  of  the  NRC  study,
Dr.  Daniel  Hastings,  Dean  for  Undergraduate  Education  and  Professor  of  Aero-
nautics and Astronautics and Engineering Systems at MIT.

Allow  me  to  address  the  specific  questions  that  you  posed  prior  to  this  hearing.

Your questions are indicated in bold type followed by my responses.
What was the scope of your recently released report on NASA’s Workforce,
and what are its major findings and recommendations?

The  NRC  Committee’s  charge  from  NASA  is  to  explore  long-range  science  and
technology  workforce  needs  to  achieve  the  Nation’s  long-term  space  exploration  vi-
sion, identify obstacles to filling those needs, and explore solutions for consideration
by  government,  academia,  and  industry.  The  specific  tasks  that  we  have  been  re-
quested to undertake are the following:

1. Assess current and projected demographics of the U.S. aerospace engineering

and space science workforce needed to accomplish the exploration vision;
2. Identify factors that impact the demographics of the affected workforces;
3. Assess  NASA’s  list  of  the  workforce  skills  that  will  be  needed  to  implement
the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  both  within  the  government  and  in  indus-
try;

4. Identify the skills needed to implement NASA’s Vision for Space Exploration

within the academic community;

5. Assess the current workforce against projected needs;

1 Issues Affecting the Future of the U.S. Space Science and Engineering Workforce—Interim Re-

port, The National Academies Press, Washington, D.C., 2006.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

6. Identify workforce gaps and analyze obstacles to responding to the workforce
needs, and in particular, analyze the proper role of academia and the obsta-
cles to achieving this proper role; and

7. Develop recommendations for specific actions by the Federal Government, in-
dustry,  and  academia  to  address  those  needs,  including  considerations  such
as organizational changes, recruiting and hiring practices, student programs,
and existing workforce training and improvement.

The NRC Committee has drawn upon input from a workshop and meetings, docu-
ments  provided  by  NASA,  and  our  own  experiences  to  arrive  at  the  following  find-
ings and associated recommendations:
Finding  1:  NASA  has  undertaken  a  commendable  top-down  (i.e.,  headquarters-di-
rected) analysis of current agency needs and the skill levels of its current workforce
that  the  committee  believes  is  an  excellent  first  step.  But  although  NASA  has  con-
sidered  workforce  needs  for  the  Agency  as  a  whole,  it  has  not  yet  projected  its  re-
quirements  for  future  hiring  in  terms  of  (1)  the  numbers  and  specific  skill  sets  of
workers  expected  to  be  needed  by  each  NASA  center  over  time  and  (2)  the  time-
frames  for  hiring  based  on  anticipated  retirements  of  the  present  workforce.  The
committee  believes  that  understanding  future  hiring  requirements  will  depend  on
an  accurate,  detailed  assessment  of  the  skills,  Vision  for  Space  Exploration-related
development capabilities, and expected attrition of the workforce for each center.
Recommendation 1: Collect detailed data on NASA workforce requirements.

The committee recommends that NASA collect detailed data on and develop accu-
rate assessments of the capabilities possessed by the current workforce and required
for  the  future  S&T  workforce.  The  issue  here  is  not  simply  ‘‘more  data,’’  but  data
that are more to the point in terms of understanding the workforce issue. Examples
of the type of data are cited below.

• Because each NASA center has unique mission requirements and the mobility
of  personnel  between  centers  is  limited,  NASA  should  complete  a  center-de-
veloped,  bottom-up  assessment  of  the  current  skills,  experience  levels,  and
projected attrition of the workforce for each individual NASA center.
• NASA  should  use  the  data  obtained  from  such  assessments  to  develop  a
model  for  projecting  future  NASA  priorities  for  Vision  for  Space  Exploration
skill development and hiring by competencies, experience levels, and centers,
as  well  as  a  model  for  the  best  mix  of  skill  development  conducted  within
NASA versus within industry.
• NASA should translate identified workforce needs from competencies and ex-
perience levels into specific positions to be implemented at individual centers
at specific points in time.
• NASA  should  assess  whether  the  skill  levels  of  in-house  scientists  at  each
field center are appropriate to fulfilling that center’s scientific leadership and
service  responsibilities  and  should  ensure  that  appropriate  efforts  are  made
to  maintain  the  scientific  competency  and  currency  of  each  center’s  scientific
workforce.
• NASA  should  ensure  that  hiring  constraints  such  as  pay  levels,  personnel
ceilings,  and  ability  to  recruit  suitable  candidates  guide  make-or-buy  deci-
sions about how staffing needs will be met.
• NASA  should  ensure  that  appropriate  workforce  strategies?including  pro-
viding training for staff (e.g., through the NASA Academy of Program/Project
and  Engineering  Leadership  program),  contracting  out  work  to  industry  and
academia, facilitating exchange programs, and hiring temporary contract and
term employees are applied at each center.

The  committee  believes  that  it  is  premature  to  recommend  a  particular  mix  of
strategies  for  obtaining  the  desired  worker  skill  mix  until  NASA  fully  defines  its
staffing  needs.  NASA  is  moving  to  collect  the  data  necessary  to  help  them  make
these capability assessments. Since NASA is in the Vision for Space Exploration for
the long-term, NASA will need to establish a systematic process for monitoring and
updating its workforce needs.
Finding 2: In the short-term, NASA has too few program and project managers and
systems  engineers  with  the  requisite  experience  in  human  space  flight  systems  de-
velopment  to  successfully  oversee  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  projects.  Given  the
lack of detailed data on NASA’s near-term workforce skills and needs as well as un-
certainties  over  NASA’s  budget,  the  committee  did  not  attempt  to  assess  the  likely
success of NASA’s planned steps to address near-term workforce problems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

Recommendation 2: Hire and retain younger workers within NASA.

The committee recommends that NASA implement a long-term strategy for hiring
a  steady  supply  of  younger  workers  and  subsequently  retaining  those  workers  as
they rise to senior management positions so that a balanced distribution of age and
skill is maintained throughout the Agency’s entire workforce.

• NASA  should  take  full  advantage  of  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004,  which
was passed to facilitate the Agency’s recruitment of employees from industry.
NASA  has  already  utilized  the  act  to  a  considerable  extent,  and  the  com-
mittee encourages the Agency to continue to do so, as well as to inform Con-
gress of any additional hiring flexibility that is required.
• NASA, working with Congress and the executive branch, should develop solu-
tions to legal problems that limit the flow of senior and highly skilled employ-
ees  from  industry  to  NASA  even  when  such  employees  are  willing  to  accept
lower salaries. Issues regarding share holding, pensions, and perceived or ac-
tual conflicts of interest severely hamper personnel exchanges between indus-
try  and  NASA.  These  problems  stem  from  policy  issues  that  cannot  be  re-
solved by NASA alone but instead require action by Congress and the execu-
tive branch working in concert with NASA.

Finding 3: NASA’s workforce requirements and challenges cannot be considered in
isolation  from  those  of  other  government  and  industry  organizations.  NASA  is  part
of an aerospace workforce ecosystem in which the health and needs of one organiza-
tion  or  sector  can  affect  another.  Thus,  NASA’s  workforce  issues  require  the  inter-
vention  and  assistance  of  higher-level  government  organizations  such  as  the  Office
of Science and Technology Policy in the Executive Office of the President.
Recommendation  3:  Ensure  a  coordinated  national  strategy  for  aerospace  workforce
development among relevant institutions.

The committee recommends that representatives from relevant government agen-
cies,  the  aerospace  industry,  including  the  emerging  private  sector,  and  the  aca-
demic community work together to develop a coordinated national strategy to ensure
an  effective  aerospace  workforce  ecosystem.  When  NASA  is  using  only  approxi-
mately  10  percent  of  the  workers  in  the  aerospace  workforce,  it  must  think  about
its needs in the context of agencies and actors who have much larger needs.
Finding 4: There is a longstanding, widely recognized requirement for more highly
skilled  program  and  project  managers  and  systems  engineers  who  have  acquired
substantial  experience  in  space  systems  development.  Although  the  need  exists
across  all  of  NASA  and  the  aerospace  industry,  it  seems  particularly  acute  for
human  space  flight  systems  because  of  the  long  periods  between  initiation  of  new
programs  (i.e.,  the  Space  Shuttle  program  in  the  1970s  and  the  Constellation  pro-
gram 30 years later). NASA training programs are addressing some of the Agency’s
requirements in this experience base, but the current requirement for a strong base
of  highly  skilled  program  and  project  management  and  systems  engineering  per-
sonnel,  and  limited  opportunities  for  junior  specialists  to  gain  hands-on  space
project  experience,  remain  impediments  to  NASA’s  ability  to  successfully  carry  out
Vision for Space Exploration programs and projects.
Recommendation 4: Provide hands-on training opportunities for NASA workers.

The committee recommends that NASA place a high priority on recruiting, train-
ing, and retaining skilled program and project managers and systems engineers and
that  it  provide  the  hands-on  training  and  development  opportunities  for  younger
and  junior  personnel  required  to  establish  and  maintain  the  necessary  capabilities
in these disciplines. Specific and immediate actions to be taken by NASA and other
parts of the Federal Government include the following:

• In  establishing  its  strategy  for  meeting  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  systems
engineering  needs,  NASA  should  determine  the  right  balance  between  in-
house and out-of-house work and contractor roles and responsibilities, includ-
ing the use of support service contractors.
• NASA  should  continue  and  also  expand  its  current  employee  training  pro-
grams such as those being conducted by the Academy of Program/Project and
Engineering  Leadership  (APPEL).  To  facilitate  the  development  of  key  sys-
tems  engineering  and  project  management  skills,  NASA  should  increase  the
number  of  opportunities  for  entry-level  employees  to  be  involved  in  hands-on
flight  and  end-to-end  development  programs.  A  variety  of  programs—includ-
ing  those  involving  balloons,  sounding  rockets,  aircraft-based  research,  small
satellites,  and  so  on—can  be  used  to  give  these  employees  critical  experience

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

relatively early in their careers and allow them to contribute as systems engi-
neers and program managers more quickly.

System Engineering is a discipline and skill that can be partially taught and also
has an important component of learning from experiences. It is much easier to learn
on  small  projects  where  mistakes  can  be  made  and  recovery  is  possible  than  from
large projects where recovery might not be possible.
Finding 5: NASA relies on a highly trained technical workforce to achieve its goals
and  has  long  accepted  a  responsibility  for  supporting  the  training  of  those  who  are
potential  employees.  In  recent  years,  however,  training  for  students  has  been  less
well supported by NASA. A robust and stable commitment to creating opportunities
at the university level for experience in hands-on flight mission development, grad-
uate  research  fellowships  for  science  and  engineering  students,  and  research  is  es-
sential for recruiting and developing the long-term supply of competent workers nec-
essary to implement NASA’s future programs.

• Faculty  research  not  only  is  fundamental  to  student  training  but  also  leads
to  the  development  of  new  technology  and  tools  for  future  applications  in
space.  Programs  supporting  critical  scientific  and  technological  expertise  are
highly desirable.

• Hands-on  experience  for  students  is  provided  by  sub-orbital  programs,  Ex-
plorer  and  other  small  spacecraft  missions,  and  design  competitions,  all  of
which rely on continuing NASA support.

• The  Graduate  Student  Researchers  Program  supports  the  education  and

training of prospective NASA employees and deserves augmented support.

• Undergraduate  and  graduate  co-op  student  programs  are  particularly  effec-
tive  in  giving  students  early  hands-on  experience  and  in  exposing  students
and NASA to each other to help enable sound career choices and hiring deci-
sions.

Recommendation 5: Support university programs and provide hands-on opportunities
at the college level.

The committee recommends that NASA make workforce-related programs such as
the  Graduate  Student  Researchers  Program  and  co-op  programs  a  high  priority
within  its  education  budget.  NASA  should  also  invest  in  the  future  workforce  by
partnering with universities to provide hands-on experiences for students and oppor-
tunities  for  fundamental  scientific  and  engineering  research  specific  to  NASA’s
needs. These experiences should include significant numbers of opportunities to par-
ticipate  in  all  aspects  of  sub-orbital  and  Explorer-class  flight  programs  and  in  re-
search fellowships and co-op student assignments.
Finding  6:  Although  NASA’s  primary  role  is  not  education  or  outreach,  improved
support  of  the  higher  education  community  and  of  young  professionals  is  critical  to
maintaining a sufficiently talented workforce. Involvement in providing development
and  educational  opportunities,  especially  hands-on  flight  and  vehicle  development
opportunities,  will  pay  future  dividends  not  only  by  encouraging  larger  numbers  of
talented  students  to  enter  the  field,  but  also  by  improving  the  abilities  of  incoming
employees.  Indeed,  a  failure  to  invest  in  today’s  students  and  young  professionals
will ultimately lead to a crisis when that generation is expected to assume the man-
tle of leadership within the U.S. aerospace community.
Recommendation 6: Support involvement in suborbital programs and nontraditional
approaches to developing skills.

The  committee  recommends  that  NASA  increase  its  investment  in  proven  pro-
grams  such  as  sounding  rocket  launches,  aircraft-based  research,  and  high-altitude
balloon  campaigns,  which  provide  ample  opportunities  for  hands-on  flight  develop-
ment  experience  at  a  relatively  low  cost  of  failure.  Rather  than  viewing  sounding
rockets, aircraft-based research, and balloon programs simply as low-cost, competed,
scientific missions, NASA should also recognize as an equal factor in the criteria for
their  selection  their  ability  to  provide  valuable  hands-on  experience  for  its  younger
workers and should investigate the possibility of funding such programs through its
education budget. In addition, NASA should take advantage of nontraditional insti-
tutions  and  approaches  both  to  inspire  and  to  train  potential  future  employees.  In-
vestment  in  programs  such  as  Centennial  Challenge  prizes  and  other  innovative
methods  has  the  potential  to  pay  benefits  many  times  greater  than  their  cost,  by
simultaneously  increasing  NASA’s  public  visibility,  training  a  new  generation  of
workers, and pushing the technology envelope.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Strategic  planning  for  workforce  issues  is  difficult  because  budget  and  program
decisions  often  have  major  impacts  on  the  workforce  that  make  strategic  planning
irrelevant.  The  committee  heard  from  industry  representatives  who  stated  that
NASA’s  ability  to  attract  junior-level  personnel  and  retain  senior  personnel  would
be  heavily  influenced  by  perceptions  about  how  compelling  and  stably  funded  the
Vision for Space Exploration is. The committee thus believes that NASA must adopt
policies that, while relatively inexpensive, can have a longer-term impact on its abil-
ity  to  obtain  the  highest-quality  personnel.  The  development  of  the  right  people  is
as  important  as  the  development  of  the  right  hardware.  NASA  policies  must  recog-
nize and reflect this attention.
Which  issues,  according  to  the  report,  present  the  most  serious  challenges
to building and maintaining a healthy and strong NASA workforce?

The major challenges identified by the Committee are a) conducting programs on
time  scales  that  are  better  matched  to  those  of  the  emerging  labor  market  and  for
the  near  future,  up  to  roughly  five  years  from  the  present,  and  b)  finding  ways  to
tap the broad and deep experience base in key job areas that currently exist outside
of the Agency. Allow me to expand on both of these points.

The  Committee  received  input  from  university  professors  who  observed  that  peo-
ple in today’s young to middle-age labor market are more focused on short-term suc-
cess  and  are  more  mobile  than  were  their  counterparts  of  the  Apollo  era.  They  are
attracted  to  careers  where  measurable  progress  of  both  a  personal  and  professional
nature takes place over five to ten years, as contrasted with decades. The vast ma-
jority of current and recent large scale and therefore highly visible NASA programs,
be they robotic or human space flight, are of the latter variety. For example, it took
nearly three decades of planning, replanning and redesigning before the remarkably
successful Spitzer telescope was launched. It has been over 23 years since President
Reagan  charged  NASA  with  building  and  operating  a  space  station,  and  the  end  of
that journey remains far in the future. These examples are typical of current NASA
programs.  Perhaps  just  as  telling  is  that  this  trend  appears  to  be  true  also  for  the
Vision. The projected availability of the two key hardware components of the Vision
is slipping for a number of reasons.

The  Committee’s  discussions  with  members  of  the  academic  community  revealed
that  most  are  unwilling  to  urge  their  best  students  to  pursue  a  career  with  NASA
or  NASA-related  programs.  Moreover,  given  the  propensity  of  younger  members  of
the aerospace workforce to seek shorter-term gratification, they are looking to other
professions such as bio-related fields, or economics, as their first choice rather than
the Nation’s space program. This represents rational choices given the potential re-
turns  and  the  perceptions  of  involvement  in  programs  that  might  take  a  long  time
to come to fruition.

The  Committee  found  that  pay  scales  for  entry  to  mid-range  professionals  at
NASA are generally comparable, or even better, than in competing job sectors. This
is  generally  not  the  case  for  the  more  senior  members  of  the  aerospace  workforce.
The  drawn  out  nature  of  NASA’s  current  programs,  coupled  with  the  pay  discrep-
ancy,  is  a  major  cause  for  the  drain  of  experienced  workers  from  the  Agency.  Addi-
tional  barriers  in  bringing  experienced  people  back  to  NASA  are  found  in  conflict
of  interest  issues  and  the  need  for  these  individuals  to  divest  themselves  of  the  fi-
nancial  returns  that  took  them  to  industry  in  the  first  place.  This  tends  to  make
these opportunities most attractive to people who are retiring from industry.
How  well  does  NASA’s  Workforce  Strategy  address  the  findings  and  rec-
ommendations contained in your report?

The  Committee  applauds  NASA’s  early  efforts  at  developing  a  strategy  for  work-
force  development,  but  feels  that  it  needs  substantial  work  on  several  fronts.  This
strategy  is  based  fundamentally  on  the  notion  of  maintaining  ten  healthy  centers.
While such an approach is understandable from a purely political perspective, I am
concerned  that  it  runs  great  risk  that  it  becomes  essentially  a  jobs  program  with
work  being  sent  to  centers  that  are  not  necessarily  staffed  to  do  the  jobs.  If  there
were  complete  mobility  in  the  civil  service  workforce,  NASA  might  be  able  to  make
this approach viable, but that mobility does not exist.

The  NASA  Workforce  Strategy  does  recognize  many  of  the  key  challenges  that
NASA  faces,  but  the  Committee  is  concerned  that  the  NASA  strategy  views  its
workforce  issues  in  isolation  of  what  the  Committee  has  dubbed  the  ‘‘aerospace
workforce ecosystem.’’ The workforce problems that NASA faces are a microcosm of
a  broader  national  problem,  one  that  faces  academia,  industry  and  other  govern-
ment  entities,  and  it  is  the  view  of  the  Committee  that  all  parties  would  be  best
served by seeking a national solution to these problems. This approach would yield
a more stable long-term solution for NASA and the Nation’s aerospace workforce as

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

a  whole.  This  may  take  a  cultural  shift  on  the  part  of  NASA  and  its  centers.  Data
provided  to  the  Committee  by  NSF  from  2003  reveals  that  fully  75  percent  of  the
workforce with a degree in aeronautics and space science-related fields does not cur-
rently  work  in  those  fields  (Figure  1).  The  workforce  is  potentially  available,  but
needs revectoring.
Given  that  NASA  is  a  multi-mission  agency,  how  de  we  ensure  that  core
competencies are maintained in each of NASA’s core missions?

The fundamental issue facing NASA in its efforts to maintain core competency in
the  short-term  is  its  shortage  of  qualified  experienced  personnel  in  key  areas  such
as  systems  engineers  and  project  managers.  The  Committee  feels  that  training  or
retraining  of  existing  staff  cannot  meet  this  shortage  in  the  near-term.  There  are
too few opportunities to gain the needed experience, particularly in the human space
flight  regime  to  provide  the  number  of  needed  experienced  staff.  Viewed  from  a
longer-term perspective, say the time frame from 2012 and beyond, a well conceived
and implemented set of training programs and opportunities could provide the nec-
essary core of skilled workforce. This may mean looking to the full aerospace work-
force ecosystem as a means to provide adequate hands-on training opportunities, not
just NASA missions.

NASA  is  a  relatively  small  player  in  the  aerospace  workforce  ecosystem  from  a
pure  numbers  perspective.  For  this  reason,  and  others,  the  Committee  encourages
NASA to look for opportunities to leverage its efforts with those of the DOD, indus-
try,  and  the  academic  community  to  identify  existing  programs  that  could  provide
opportunities,  as  well  as  work  in  a  coordinated  manner  to  develop  new  programs
to accomplish this vital training.
Which  of  the  recommendations  do  you  believe  NASA  could  readily  adopt
(i.e.,  that  do  not  require  significant  resources  or  disruption  in  business
processes), and which do you think will be the most difficult to implement?
A  strong  finding  from  the  Committee’s  work  is  that  meaningful  opportunities  for
hands-on  training,  an  end-to-end  involvement  in  doing  space  projects,  has  been  a
declining element of NASA’s portfolio for several years (see Figure 2). The programs
that  are  most  effective  in  providing  the  experience  that  is  needed  are  the  low  cost
suborbital programs, such as sounding rockets and balloon programs. Relatively low
cost space missions such as the small end of the Explorer line are also of value here,
but  they  do  not  provide  the  opportunity  to  reach  as  many  students  as  do  the  sub-
orbital  programs.  Reaching  students  and  workers  when  they  are  younger,  and  po-
tentially more open to career paths is important.

Increasing efforts in the suborbital programs, particularly if paired with other en-
tities  with  a  vested  interest  in  seeing  skilled  workers  developed,  would  cost  rel-
atively  little  and  could  begin  to  show  dividends  on  a  time  scale  that  is  short  com-
pared to other similar training opportunities. The Committee feels that use of NASA
educational  funding,  along  with  joint  funding  from  other  entities,  could  be  brought
to  bear  in  this  area.  Emphasizing  workforce  development  as  a  major  factor  in  pro-
posal competition for such programs, as distinct from a focus purely on the scientific
return is also encouraged by the Committee. This would bring an explicitly strategic
view to the funding of these opportunities.
Which  issues  related  to  NASA’s  workforce  are  least  well  understood  and
what  recommendations  does  your  report  offer  for  addressing  those  uncer-
tainties?

An  oft-used  exemplar  for  NASA’s  workforce  is  a  plot  of  the  age  distribution.  Two
aspects of this distribution are usually mentioned; that the age of the peak has been
steadily  increasing  over  the  past  several  years,  and  that  those  members  at  the
upper  end  of  the  distribution  will  soon  be  retirement  eligible.  While  it  is  the  case
that  there  has  been  an  aging  of  the  workforce  distribution,  a  comparison  with  the
other  aerospace  workforce  sectors  shows  that  NASA’s  workforce  is  not  significantly
different than the aerospace workforce generally (Figure 3).

The Committee would emphasize several points regarding this characterization of
the NASA workforce. It does not capture a key aspect of the workforce, viz., the ex-
perience  associated  with  the  bodies  that  are  represented  in  the  data,  and  as  the
Committee  has  emphasized  it  is  the  lack  of  experienced  personnel  that  lies  at  the
heart of NASA’s workforce issues. Moreover, the Committee was unable to find evi-
dence  that  NASA,  or  anyone  else  for  that  matter,  was  able  to  say  what  the  ‘‘right’’
distribution  should  be  for  an  employer  with  NASA’s  needs  and  challenges.  A  key
element  here  is  how  one  can  model  this  distribution  so  as  to  understand  the
‘‘sources  and  sinks’’  that  alter  the  distribution,  understand  the  time  scales  over
which  those  sources  and  sinks  operate  and  hence  alter  the  distribution.  The  Com-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

mittee  feels  that  any  strategic  plan  that  NASA  develops  for  workforce  development
must  include  an  effort  to  model  and  ultimately  understand  the  dynamics  of  its
workforce  age  distribution.  The  Committee  was  not  able  to  conduct  an  extensive
search  for  people  or  organizations  that  do,  or  could  do,  this  type  of  analysis,  but  it
seems clear that it lies outside of NASA, most probably in the academic community.
We  would  strongly  encourage  studies  in  this  area.  We  would  also  encourage  NASA
to  periodically  reevaluate  its  model  and  update  its  data  both  for  the  results  and  as
a way of keeping focus on these critical workforce concerns.

In  closing  my  prepared  remarks  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  reiterate  that  the  NRC
Committee feels strongly that NASA needs to look outside of itself in assessing the
nature,  scope,  and  possible  solutions  for  its  skill  mix.  NASA  has  historically  been
a ‘‘can-do’’ agency, but also one afflicted to some extent with the ‘‘not invented here’’
syndrome.  The  issues  NASA  faces  in  terms  of  workforce  are  national  in  character;
they reverberate through other government agencies involved in space-related work,
as  well  as  the  private  sector  including  universities.  NASA  should  not,  in  our  Com-
mittee’s  view,  try  to  structure  a  solution  in  isolation  from  consultation  with  the
broader  set  of  communities  noted  above.  I  believe  I  can  speak  for  many  people  in
saying  that  the  Nation’s  space  programs  would  benefit  if  the  issue  of  workforce  is
addressed  by  involving  the  representatives  of  the  workforce  ecosystem  in  both  the
assessment of the problem and the range of possible solutions.

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  share  with  your  committee  the  perspec-
tives on this important issue that the NRC Committee has developed over the past
year.

I would be happy to expand on my remarks or address additional questions should

you wish.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

BIOGRAPHY FOR DAVID C. BLACK

DAVID  C.  BLACK,  is  President  Emeritus  of  the  Universities  Space  Research  As-
sociation (USRA), a consortium of 97 different colleges and universities having grad-
uate programs in space science or engineering. He is also adjunct professor of space
physics and astronomy at Rice University. Between 1970 and 1975 Dr. Black served
in various capacities at NASA’s Ames Research Center, including chief of the Theo-
retical  Studies  Branch  and  deputy  chief  of  the  Space  Science  Division,  and  he  was
the  first  chair  of  the  Ames  Basic  Research  Council.  Dr.  Black  was  selected  as  the
first  chief  scientist  for  the  space  station  program  at  NASA  Headquarters  in  1985.
He  returned  to  NASA  Ames  in  1987  as  the  chief  scientist  for  space  research.  He
spent  an  academic  year  as  a  visiting  professor  at  the  University  of  London  (1974–
1975).  Dr.  Black  is  an  internationally  recognized  researcher  in  theoretical  astro-
physics  and  planetary  science,  specializing  in  studies  of  star  and  planetary  system
formation. He has also done pioneering experimental research involving the isotopic
composition of noble gases in meteorites, was the first to discover and correctly iden-
tify  evidence  for  non-solar  material  in  solar  system  matter,  and  was  the  first  to
show  that  the  isotopic  composition  of  solar  flare  noble  gases  differs  from  that  of
solar  wind  noble  gases.  He  is  a  leader  in  the  current  effort  to  search  for  and  study
other  planetary  systems.  He  is  past  chair  of  the  Solar  System  Exploration  Sub-
committee  and  the  Origins  Subcommittee  of  NASA’s  Space  Science  Advisory  Com-
mittee. Dr. Black also served as a member of the NRC Planetary and Lunar Explo-
ration  Task  Group  (1984–1988)  and  the  Working  Group  on  Search  for  Extra-
terrestrial Intelligence (1979–1983).

Dr.  Black  served  as  Co-Chair  with  Dr.  Daniel  Hastings  of  the  National  Research
Council (NRC)’s Committee on Issues Affecting the Future of the U.S. Space Science
and  Engineering  Workforce.  Dr.  Hastings  is  a  Professor  of  Aeronautics  and  Astro-
nautics  and  Engineering  Systems  and  Dean  for  Undergraduate  Education  at  the
Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology  (MIT).  The  other  committee  members  were:

BURT S. BARNOW, Johns Hopkins University
JOHN W. DOUGLASS, Aerospace Industries Association of America, Inc.
RAY M. HAYNES, Northrop Grumman Space Technology
MARGARET G. KIVELSON, University of California, Los Angeles
WILLIAM POMERANTZ, X PRIZE Foundation
JOSEPH H. ROTHENBERG, Universal Space Network
KATHRYN C. THORNTON, University of Virginia
Chairman UDALL. Thank you, Dr. Black, and we worked through
the audiovisual glitch, and that is important data. We will put that
in the record.

Dr. Stone, five minutes is yours, and welcome.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  LEE  STONE,  LEGISLATIVE  REPRESENTA-
TIVE,  NASA  COUNCIL  OF  IFPTE  LOCALS,  INTERNATIONAL
FEDERATION  OF  PROFESSIONAL  AND  TECHNICAL  ENGI-
NEERS
Dr.  STONE.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Udall  and  Ranking  Member
Hall for providing the International Federation of Professional and
Technical  Engineers,  NASA’s  largest  federal  employee  union,  the
opportunity to present our perspective on the workforce challenges
facing NASA today.

IFPTE’s  primary  interest  in  testifying  is  to  provide  advocacy  for
maintaining  the  technical  excellence  and  independence  of  NASA’s
civil service workforce. However, our interests extend more broadly
to  a  deep  commitment  to  NASA’s  success,  not  only  in  the  near-
term,  but  more  important,  in  the  long-term,  consistent  with  the
true spirit of the Vision for Space Exploration.

NASA  is  not  facing  a  workforce  crisis.  It  is  facing  a  fiscal  crisis.
The  President’s  Vision  outlines  a  bold  and  ambitious  set  of  mile-
stones,  yet  NASA  is  not  being  given  a  bold  and  ambitious  budget
needed  for  success.  As  long  as  the  Vision  remains  largely  an  un-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

funded  mandate,  all  of  NASA’s  missions  and  its  workforce  will  re-
main at risk, and that is the primary issue.

The  last  time  a  President  asked  NASA  to  send  humans  to  the
Moon,  NASA  had  nearly  36,000  civil  servants  onboard,  and  an  an-
nual  budget  of  more  than  $30  billion,  adjusted  for  inflation,  and
they  were  not  being  asked  to  fix  design  problems  with  the  Shuttle
or  to  build  a  Space  Station  at  the  same  time.  Yet  today,  NASA’s
civil  service  workforce  has  been  halved,  and  its  budget  reduced  by
more  than  40  percent.  Until  the  fundamental  discrepancy  between
mission  and  budget  is  corrected,  NASA’s  problems  cannot  be  prop-
erly solved.

First  slide,  please,  or  the  only  slide,  please.  A  workforce  demo-
graphic  problem  is  readily  apparent  in  Figure  2–2  of  the  NRC  re-
port.  The  real  problem  is  the  five-fold  reduction  in  the  30-  to  34-
year-old  range  between  1993  and  2005,  indicated  by  the  vertical
blue arrows on the left, a fivefold reduction. Management, however,
remains  obsessed  with  the  faux  problem  of  the  right  hand  tail  of
the  distribution  to  the  right  of  the  vertical  red  line,  which  rep-
resents only about five percent of the workforce, and has been sta-
ble for more than a decade, yet there is where they keep pounding
to reduce it.

IFPTE applauds the National Research Council for its thoughtful
analysis and recommendations on NASA’s Workforce Plan. The re-
port  recognizes  the  immediate  need  to  engage  aggressively  in  the
education, the hands-on training, and recruitment of the next gen-
eration  of  NASA  employees.  IFPTE,  however,  is  disappointed  with
the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration’s  report,  as  it  fails
to  question  management’s  assertions.  It  accepts  as  fact  uncertain
and  mistaken  premises  that  NASA’s  budget  will  not  grow,  that  its
current employee skills are seriously mismatched with NASA’s new
mission,  and  thus,  that  NASA  must  reduce  it  science,  aeronautics,
and  technology  development  activities  and  workforce.  We  fun-
damentally disagree.

IFPTE,  however,  continues  to  support  the  ten  healthy  centers
philosophy  initiated  by  Dr.  Griffin,  and  we  reject  the  criticism  of
that  plan  in  the  NAPA  report.  We  encourage  Dr.  Griffin  to  per-
severe in his efforts to decentralize the Constellation Program. Un-
fortunately,  current  policies  continue  to  severely  stress  NASA’s  re-
search  centers.  The  solutions  should  not  be,  and  cannot  be  to  con-
vert them into mini-operational centers, or to subject them to some
BRAC-like  process.  Rather,  the  revitalization  of  cutting  edge  R&D
at  the  field  centers  is  crucial  for  the  safe  and  meaningful  return
to  the  Moon,  as  well  as  for  delivering  on  our  promises  in  science
and aeronautics.

To  reinvigorate  NASA’s  workforce  in  support  of  all  of  its  mis-
sions, and to maintain America’s prestige and leadership in science
and aerospace R&D, IFPTE offers the following seven recommenda-
tions.

First,  Congress  should  fund  NASA  at  close  to  the  authorized
level  as  possible,  and  prohibit  transfer  authority  across  major  ac-
counts.  IFPTE  proposes  at  least  an  additional  $300  million  for
science, $420 million for exploration systems, $200 million for aero-
nautics, $30 million for education, and $50 million for critical facili-
ties over the President’s Fiscal Year 2008 proposal.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Second,  Congress  should  preserve  the  technical  excellence  and
independence of NASA’s civil service workforce. NASA should fund
civil  servant  salaries  directly  to  the  centers,  independent  of  pro-
grams, to allow for the effective use of matrix management, and to
end the scapegoating of civil service employees.

Third, NASA should provide stability for its current workforce, to
reassure  its  future  workforce.  The  Administrator  should  publicly
reject any use of RIFs, so that the best and the brightest young en-
gineers and science graduates can once again see NASA as a great
career move.

Fourth, IFPTE supports the NRC recommendations. NASA must
begin an aggressive campaign to recruit young employees while the
current staff is still on board to transfer its critical knowledge.

Fifth, IFPTE strongly opposes three of NAPA’s recommendations.
IFPTE  opposes  any  authorization  to  use  a  BRAC-like  process  to
close centers, any streamlining of the RIF procedures, and any au-
thority to unilaterally terminate retirement eligible employees.

Sixth,  IFPTE  supports  enhancing  voluntary  buy-out  authority.
We  support  the  post-employment  extension  of  medical  coverage,
and  an  increase  in  the  buy-out  incentive  up  to  an  individual’s  sev-
erance pay, capped at one year’s salary.

Seven,  IFPTE  strongly  opposes  any  new  authority  to  facilitate
the conversion of permanent positions to term positions, and there-
fore, we oppose the Administration’s proposed term conversion leg-
islation.

In  closing,  IFPTE  is  very  grateful  for  the  bipartisan  Congres-
sional rescue that has thus far protected NASA’s workforce from a
misguided RIF. Let us now turn from the era of workforce damage
control  to  a  more  positive  era  of  rebuilding  NASA’s  future  work-
force.

Once  again,  Chairman  Udall  and  Ranking  Member  Hall,  IFPTE
thanks  you  for  inviting  us  to  bring  these  important  issues  to  the
attention of the Subcommittee.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Stone follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF LEE STONE

Thank  you,  Chairman  Udall  and  Ranking  Member  Calvert,  for  providing  the
International  Federation  of  Professional  and  Technical  Engineers,  NASA’s  largest
Union,  this  opportunity  to  present  our  perspective  on  the  workforce  challenges  fac-
ing  NASA  today.  It  is  a  privilege  and  honor  for  me  to  speak  for  IFPTE  and  for  the
thousands of NASA employees we represent.

IFPTE’s  primary  interest  in  testifying  today  is  to  provide  advocacy  for  maintain-
ing the technical excellence and independence of NASA’s civil service workforce that
has  served  the  Agency  so  well  for  decades.  However,  our  interest  extends  more
broadly  to  a  deep  commitment  to  NASA’s  success  not  only  in  the  near  term  but,
more importantly, in the long term, consistent with the true spirit of the Vision for
Space  Exploration  (VSE).  NASA’s  rank-and-file  employees  are  not  only  the  heart
and  soul  of  the  Agency,  but  also  provide  much  of  its  brain  power.  They  are  hard
working  and  dedicated  to  mission  success,  but  see  this  success  as  including  all  of
NASA’s  critical  missions.  Indeed,  many  of  our  nation’s  best  and  brightest  came  to
NASA primarily to be part of endeavors greater and nobler than more lucrative pur-
suits  available  to  them  in  the  private  sector.  They  came  to  discover  and  to  explore
so  that  America  can  lead  mankind  in  aerospace  science,  engineering,  and  explo-
ration.  That  dream  is  in  jeopardy  today,  not  because  of  a  failure  of  technical  com-
petence or innovation, but because of a failure of political will.

NASA  is  not  facing  a  workforce  crisis;  it  is  facing  a  fiscal  crisis.  The  President’s
Vision outlines a bold and ambitious set of milestones for NASA, ultimately leading
to  permanent  human  presence  on  the  Moon  and  a  safe  manned  mission  to  Mars.
Yet  unfortunately,  the  White  House  has  thus  far  been  unwilling  to  propose  a  bold

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

and  ambitious  NASA  budget  to  match.  The  misguided  policy  decision  to  make  the
VSE  an  unfunded  mandate  is  the  driving  force  behind  all  of  NASA’s  current  woes.
IFPTE calls on Congress to redirect this policy and to fund NASA at the levels Au-
thorized less than two years ago with overwhelming bipartisan support. This course
of  action  is  essential  for  enabling  NASA’s  success,  for  maintaining  America’s  pres-
tige and leadership in aerospace R&D, and ultimately for safeguarding our national
security.

• Unless  NASA’s  budget  is  increased  significantly,  commensurate  with  its  full
set  of  responsibilities,  mission  failure  is  a  real  possibility.  Something  has  to
give.  Either  the  Constellation  schedule  will  need  to  be  significantly  slipped,
or Shuttle and Space Station activities will need to be curtailed even further,
or, as the Administration would now have it, critical Aeronautics, Science and
Technology  activities  will  be  severely  cut,  leaving  Orion  and  Ares  vehicles
with ill-defined missions and NASA’s Science and Aeronautics responsibilities
unfulfilled.  This  is  not  a  partisan  concern;  for  example,  Representative  Cal-
vert, the former Chairman (and now Ranking Member) of this subcommittee,
recently expressed concern about how cuts in NASA Aeronautics R&D impact
the  Nation’s  effort,  coordinated  by  the  newly  established  inter-agency  Joint
Program Development Office (JPDO), to develop the next generation airspace
system:
‘‘. . .Congress anticipated that the Federal Aviation Administration, as the op-
erator  of  our  nation’s  ATM  system,  and  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space
Administration, as our nation’s leading aeronautics R&D organization, would
continue to work collaboratively as they have for more than forty years: NASA
researching  and  developing  long-lead,  high  risk  technologies;  FAA  adapting
their  research  products  to  incorporate  them  into  the  national  airspace  sys-
tem. . .. The JPDO recognized NASA’s expertise early on by selecting them to
lead  the  ‘Agile  Airspace’  integrated  product  team. . ..  In  the  last  eighteen
months,  however,  and  subsequent  to  the  creation  of  the  JPDO,  NASA’s  aero-
nautics  R&D  program  has  undergone  a  major  reorganization. . .  I  remain
concerned  that  so  early  in  this  grand  endeavor  now  known  as  NextGen,  one
of  the  two  key  partners  is  changing  the  rules  of  the  game,  and  it’s  happening
at  a  time  when  R&D  roadmaps  are  being  finalized,  and  spending  for  devel-
oping and integrating new technologies is about to ramp up. I would strongly
prefer that NASA’s Airspace Management program continue to advance prom-
ising technologies to a high level. . . It is my sincere hope that NASA’s actions
don’t hinder JPDO’s efforts to develop technologies upon which NextGen is re-
liant.’’
IFPTE shares this concern and urges Congress to properly fund NASA’s Aero-
nautics  R&D  mission,  which  will  not  only  address  this  and  other  critical  na-
tional  needs,  but  will  also  greatly  reduce  the  workforce  instability  at  the
Agency.

• The  Administration’s  fiscal  policy  is  driving  the  indefinite  postponement  of
the recruitment of NASA’s next generation of scientists and engineers thereby
seriously  compromising  the  long-term  health  of  the  Agency.  At  an  All-Hands
meeting  at  Ames  Research  Center  on  February  22nd  2007,  Administrator
Griffin  responded  to  a  query  about  what  NASA  is  doing  to  recruit  young  sci-
entists and engineers by saying:
‘‘I cannot grow the Agency by bringing in even all-stars right now that I want
to  bring  in,  unless  and  until  folks  like  us  who,  as  you  said,  are  getting  older,
until and unless these folks retire.’’
While we sympathize with the Administrator, given the untenable position he
is  in  of  trying  to  meet  NASA’s  many  awesome  responsibilities  without  an
honest  budget,  we  must  stand  in  opposition  to  any  further  stalling.  This  de-
featist  statement,  coming  directly  from  the  Administrator,  reveals  that  the
current workforce plan is simply to punt, effectively sacrificing NASA’s future
to  meet  its  immediate  milestones,  leaving  his  successor  to  deal  with  an  even
more serious problem down the road.

IFPTE  applauds  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  for  its  thoughtful  report
and  recommendations  on  NASA’s  workforce  planning.  The  report  properly  recog-
nizes  the  symbiotic  relationship  between  NASA’s  in-house  scientists  and  their  aca-
demic colleagues, as well as the immediate need to engage aggressively in the edu-
cation, hands-on training, and recruitment of the next generation of NASA employ-
ees. We fully endorse their key recommendations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

• Although the NRC primary interest is in maintaining NASA’s support of aca-
demic  research  and  IFPTE  does  not  agree  with  all  of  the  statements  made
in  the  report,  nonetheless,  IFPTE  believes  that  NASA’s  entire  multi-sector
workforce would be well served by following their recommendations.
• One  concern  however  is  the  references  made  about  government  conflict-of-in-
terest  rules  hindering  the  recruitment  of  senior  program/project  managers
from  industry.  IFPTE  strongly  believes  that  these  ethics  rules  are  absolutely
essential for protecting the government and the taxpayer from the corrupting
influence of private profit motives. The influence of the aerospace industry on
NASA policies is powerful enough already, any weakening of government eth-
ics rules would be unwise.

IFPTE  is  disappointed  with  the  National  Association  of  Public  Administration
(NAPA)  report  and  strongly  objects  to  the  fact  that  it  blindly  accepts  the  Adminis-
tration’s  assertions  about  NASA’s  fiscal  and  programmatic  constraints  and  uses
them  to  bolster  their  argument  that  some  dramatic  workforce  realignment  with  a
significant reduction of civil service component is somehow required for the success
of the VSE. This simply is not the case and indeed, we believe the converse is true.
We also strongly object to their recommendations that NASA management be given
new authority for streamlined Reductions-In-Force (RIFs) and for termination based
on retirement eligibility.

• For example, the NAPA report (p. 164) makes the astounding statement that:
‘‘Most  employees  who  have  been  ‘‘uncovered’’  in  the  past  are  concentrated  in
various  legacy  programs  and  related  occupations,  such  as  engineering  and
science  support  (technicians);  . . .program/project  management;  computer
science  and  information  technology;  space  sciences;  . . .various  systems  engi-
neering  competencies;  electrical  and  electronics  systems;  . . .The  April  2006
NASA Workforce Strategy recognized this reality.’’
The above statement that NASA does not now need and is not going to need
these  ‘‘legacy’’  competencies  to  meet  its  future  missions  in  Science,  Aero-
nautics, and Human Space Flight is absurd. Yet, assertions like this are used
throughout  the  report  to  justify  a  persistent  call  to  target  CS  employees  for
layoffs. Indeed, the NRC report correctly points that NASA desperately needs
to  recruit  more  talent  in  the  areas  of  program/project  management  and  in
systems engineering (and talented Aeronautics program/project managers and
systems engineers can clearly be quickly cross-trained to support space flight
programs).  Furthermore,  the  NAPA  report’s  lack  of  objectivity  is  revealed  as
it  repeatedly  uses  the  term  ‘‘reality’’  to  describe  unchallenged  assertions  by
NASA management, while they refer to Union statements as ‘‘views.’’
• The  fatal  flaw  in  the  NAPA  report  is  that  most  of  its  recommendations  are
based  on  mistaken  or  uncertain  premises  presented  as  facts.  The  budgetary
and  the  programmatic  assertions  made  are  not  the  clear  cut  ‘‘reality’’  that
NAPA  would  have  one  believe;  for  example,  the  drastic  and  unwise  cuts  to
Science,  Aeronautics,  and  Technology  Development  in  the  President’s  pro-
posed  FY  2008  budget  will  not  become  reality  unless  Congress  agrees  to
them.  Over  the  last  few  years,  a  bipartisan  coalition  in  Congress  has  repeat-
edly shown its willingness to restore NASA funding in these areas.

IFPTE  continues  to  support  the  ‘‘ten  healthy  Centers’’  philosophy  put  forward  by
Dr.  Griffin;  we  reject  criticism  of  his  plan  within  the  NAPA  report.  Unfortunately,
the implementation has been spotty. In particular, as noted in the NAPA report (p.
57),  current  policies  have  severely  stressed  NASA’s  research  centers.  The  solution
to this problem cannot be to convert them into mini-operational centers or to subject
them  to  a  BRAC-like  process.  Rather,  the  Administration  must  recognize  that  revi-
talized  R&D  at  NASA’s  research  centers  is  crucial  for  the  success  of  the  VSE  and
NASA’s  Science  and  Aeronautics  missions.  NASA’s  research  centers  and  their  aca-
demic  partners  must  be  provided  with  the  resources  needed  for  them  to  continue
to make their contributions to NASA’s longer-term missions.

• Specifically, healthy Aeronautics and Exploration research budgets should be
fully  sequestered  from  the  manned  space  flight  operational  and  exploration
development  budgets  and  should  be  managed  by  the  research  centers.  This
is necessary to prevent continued pilfering of longer-term research projects in
support  of  shorter-term  Constellation  milestones,  and  to  make  sure  that  the
technologies  needed  to  support  productive  and  safe  long-duration  lunar  mis-
sions are available when the rockets are ready to get us there. In particular,
the  Advanced  Capabilities  programs  should  be  managed  by  research  centers
with  their  R&D  activities  primarily  at  the  research  centers.  This  will  protect

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

these vital efforts from being usurped by Constellation and will foster innova-
tion, unfettered by the constraints of current operational thinking. Constella-
tion must be kept healthy by direct funding, not by co-opting R&D funds.

• As  recommended  in  the  NRC  report  (recommendation  6),  small  scale  flight
projects  (e.g.,  small  sats,  free  flyers,  balloon  launches)  should  be  revitalized
thereby  enhancing  synergistic  links  between  academia,  the  smaller  emerging
‘‘new’’  space  industry,  and  the  research  centers.  This  not  only  has  the  poten-
tial to produce good space, Earth, life and microgravity science for less money,
but  will  also  provide  the  key  hands-on  experience  needed  to  develop  strong
in-house  program/project  managers/scientists  and  to  educate/recruit  the  next
generation of employees.

The key problem and the misguided nature of the current management approach

are readily apparent in Fig. 2–2 of the NRC report (see above).

• The  real  problem  is  the  nearly  five-fold  reduction  in  the  number  in  the  30–
34  year  old  range  between  1993  and  2005  (see  vertical  blue  arrow).  The  last
two  Administrations  share  the  blame  for  dereliction  of  their  duty  to  renew
and replenish this critical national capability.
• NASA management (and the NAPA report) is obsessed with the faux problem
of the right-hand tail of the distribution (to the right of the vertical red line),
which  represents  only  about  five  percent  of  the  workforce  and  has  dem-
onstrated  itself  to  be  stable  for  more  than  the  last  decade.  Furthermore,  this
tail  represents  the  older,  experienced  and  dedicated,  scientific  and  engineer-
ing workforce, whose retention is often critical for mission success because of
the priceless corporate memory they possess.

Matrix management and full-cost recovery of civil-service salaries:

NASA’s  peculiar  version  of  matrix  management,  in  which  programs  wield  all
budgetary  power  and  line  management  is  effectively  impotent,  is  harming  morale
and  productivity  at  most  centers  among  both  the  rank-and-file  and  line  managers.
• When NASA claimed to convert over to ‘‘full-cost accounting’’ in FY04, it actu-
ally  converted  over  to  a  full-cost  recovery  system.  This  system  unwisely  em-
powered  distant  program  managers  to  siphon  salary  and  facilities  money
away  from  field  centers.  By  giving  so  much  power  to  senior  program  man-
agers  (for  Constellation,  program  management  is  often  indistinguishable  or
closely  aligned  with  line  management  at  Johnson  Space  Center),  a  low  pri-
ority  has  been  placed  on  preserving  long-term  institutional  assets  and  capa-
bilities  at  the  less-powerful  centers.  Labor  costs  at  these  centers  can  thus  be

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

low-balled  by  pitting  competing  centers  against  each  other  and  they  have
ended  up  being  forced  to  provide  technical  support  to  programs  at  below  ac-
tual cost simply because a half FTE for full time work is better than nothing.
This has created the artificially inflated ‘‘uncovered capacity’’ that is being ex-
aggerated by anti-CS proponents to justify layoffs.
• The Administration has only recently begun to pay adequate attention to the
agency-wide consequences of full-cost recovery on core technical competencies
and  facilities.  There  is  little  incentive  within  program  management  (which
controls nearly all of NASA funds and is under terrible pressure to meet cur-
rent  fiscal-year  milestones)  to  be  interested  in  any  long-term  agency-wide
workforce planning.
• Matrix  management  coupled  with  full-cost  recovery  is  seriously  undermining
line/center  management  authority  and  morale.  For  matrix  management  to
work  properly,  line  and  program  management  must  have  equal,  complemen-
tary authorities. Line managers should control CS labor and travel costs (pro-
vided  directly  to  each  center);  while  program  managers  should  control  pro-
curement and contractor labor costs. This more equitable balance would then
force  greater  cooperation  between  line  and  program  management  to  the  ben-
efit of the Agency, its programs, and all of its employees.

Abuse of term hiring:

NASA  management  has  been  systematically  abusing  its  authority  to  create  term
civil-servant positions with strict quotas on hiring permanent positions, thus forcing
centers to make improper term hires to fill long-term technical needs more properly
served by a permanent hire.

2000 to 0.4 in FY 2006.

decreased more than 9-fold between FY 2000 and FY 2006.

• The  percentage  of  NASA’s  civil  service  workforce  that  is  employed  under  a
term  contract  has  increased  more  than  7-fold  since  the  beginning  of  FY2003.
Of  the  current  term  positions,  80  percent  are  scientists  or  engineers  and
many  of  them  will  leave  the  Agency  in  two  to  six  years,  despite  NASA’s  con-
siderable investment in training them.
• The number of outside hires into permanent science and engineering positions
• The ratio of permanent to non-permanent outside hires shifted from 1.3 in FY
• As  noted  in  the  NAPA  report  (p.  160),  ‘‘NASA  has  used  term  employment  as
a  vehicle  to  extend  the  typical  one-year  probationary  period.’’  Even  if  this  is
meant  to  be  benevolent,  this  common  rationale  for  using  a  term  hire  instead
of  a  permanent  hire  improperly  circumvents  the  intent  of  Title  5  and  the
Flexibility Act.
• IFPTE agrees with the NAPA recommendation that the decision to offer term
or permanent status should be based on a careful analysis of the job require-
ments  and  of  the  long-term  need  for  the  relevant  skills.  NASA  must  develop
transparent,  consistent,  and  compelling  criteria  for  denying  full  civil-service
rights  to  any  new  hire.  However,  IFPTE  is  troubled  by  the  conclusion  of
Chapter VI of the NAPA report that asserts that
‘‘Term  employment  may  be  preferable  to  permanent  employment  options  given
the great deal of budget and programmatic uncertainty.’’
This  statement  openly  advocates  for  the  improper  use  of  term  positions  to
compensate for political instability at the Agency. Every year, NASA’s budget
and  programs  are  uncertain,  so  this  cannot  be  used  as  a  criterion  for  deter-
mining  whether  a  position  is  best  filled  by  a  permanent  or  term  hire.  That
decision should be based on the position’s skill requirements and the long- vs.
short-term need for the specific competency being hired.
• The exploding use of term positions is threatening the quality and independ-
ence of our technical staff. The best and brightest new scientist and engineer-
ing  graduates  are  being  wooed  by  MIT,  Johns  Hopkins,  Carnegie  Mellon,
Stanford, Cal Tech, UC–Berkeley and many other high-caliber academic insti-
tutions.  Premier  academic  institutions  offer  tenure.  In  the  past,  NASA  has
been  able  to  get  its  fair  share  of  these  candidates  because  it  offered  tenure,
better  benefits,  and  a  similarly  excellent  intellectual  environment.  The  NRC
report (p. 41) notes that the reduction in federal pension benefits made under
the Reagan Administration is hindering NASA’s ability to recruit senior staff
away  from  more  lucrative  private-sector  positions  with  better  benefits  than
the  government.  Any  diminution  of  tenure  rights  will  only  make  recruitment

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

even more difficult as it will make cold cash the only usable currency to com-
pete for top talent and the government is not in a good position to win based
on  that  criterion.  More  critically,  tenure  provides  technical  employees  with
the security they need to speak truth to power.
• A  more  extensive  analysis  of  the  crucial  value  of  civil-service  tenure  can  be

found in IFPTE’s testimony to this Subcommittee on June 13th, 2006.

Balancing the public and private workforce components:

IFPTE reiterates its prior testimony stating that NASA benefits greatly from the
synergy  generated  by  its  combined  federal  and  private-sector  workforce.  However,
we  also  believe  that  NASA  has  achieved  the  minimum  healthy  balance  between  its
current 18,020 civil servants on duty (16,299 full-time permanent) and its dedicated
contractor  workforce  of  around  40,000.  The  latest  CS  number  represents  a  nearly
a  two-fold  change  from  the  35,860  civil  servants  on  board  in  FY1967,  the  last  time
NASA  was  working  to  send  Americans  to  the  moon  and  back  safely.  Any  further
decrease  in  the  civil-service  component  would  appear  unwarranted  and  would  put
mission success at increased risk.

IFPTE  is  concerned  that  neither  the  NRC  nor  the  NAPA  report  emphasized  the
many important reasons for maintaining a strong civil-service component to NASA’s
workforce  especially  when  facing  budgetary  and  schedule  pressures.  A  few  of  these
reasons are:

a fair price.

oversight of NASA’s contractor and academic efforts.

• Civil  servants  serve  as  smart  buyers  so  the  taxpayer  buys  good  products  at
• Civil servants are needed to provide proper technical monitoring and financial
• Civil servants are needed to balance out private-sector profit motives in order
to  maintain  safety.  The  Columbia  Accident  Investigations  Board  (p.  198)  in-
deed  pointed  out  that  increases  in  the  industry  workforce  together  with  re-
ductions in the CS workforce contributed to the disaster and that, over time,
NASA management tends to forget this.
Prior  to  Challenger,  Shuttle  Program  structure  had  hindered  information
flows,  leading  the  Rogers  Commission  to  conclude  that  critical  information
about  technical  problems  was  not  conveyed  effectively  through  the  hierarchy.
The  Space  Shuttle  Program  had  altered  its  structure  by  outsourcing  to  con-
tractors,  which  added  to  communication  problems.  The  Commission  rec-
ommended  many  changes  to  remedy  these  problems,  and  NASA  made  many
of  them.  However,  the  Board  found  that  those  post-Challenger  changes  were
undone  over  time  by  management  actions.  NASA  administrators,  reacting  to
government  pressures,  transferred  more  functions  and  responsibilities  to  the
private  sector.  The  change  was  cost-efficient,  but  personnel  cuts  reduced  over-
sight  of  contractors  at  the  same  time  that  the  Agency’s  dependence  upon  con-
tractor engineering judgment increased.

The Agency also needs to engage more scientists, engineers, and technicians, and
fewer  managers,  deputy  managers,  associate  managers,  and  assistant  managers.
NASA’s  dedicated  technical  workforce  at  all  of  its  centers,  both  civil  servant  and
contractor,  stands  ready,  willing,  and  able  to  support  all  of  NASA’s  missions  and
there  is  more  than  enough  technical  work  to  go  around.  NASA  headquarters  needs
to  reduce  the  load  of  self-generated  program-reporting  busy  work  that  it  dumps  on
its  front-line  managers,  which  then  reduces  real  productivity  and  drives  the  ‘‘need’’
for excess management.

Decentralizing the Constellation program:

Administrator  Griffin  deserves  considerable  praise  for  realizing  that  all  of  NASA
Centers  should  share  in  the  work  opportunities  (and  responsibilities)  provided  by
the  Constellation  program,  according  to  their  capabilities  and  facilities.  This  idea,
however, has been difficult to implement fully and is not a long-term solution.

• Constellation  program  management  is  too  closely  allied  with  Johnson  Space
Center  management  and  has  therefore  been  very  reluctant  to  comply  fully
with the decentralization process. As stated in the minutes of the NASA Stra-
tegic Management Council’s February 21st 2007 meeting:
‘‘. . .flight  centers  seem  reluctant  to  place  development  work  at  research  cen-
ters. . .’’
Indeed,  when  Constellation  work-packages  have  been  transferred  to  other
centers,  JSC  has  only  minimally  complied  by  transferring  the  CS  Full  Time

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Equivalent  (FTE)  portion  of  the  funds,  while  retaining  the  procurement  dol-
lars and contractor work-year equivalent (WYE) funds, thereby making it im-
possible  for  other  centers  to  match  JSC’s  apparent  productivity.  JSC  con-
tinues  to  prefer  hiring  within  their  local  JSC  contractor  teams  and  to  resist
transferring  the  full  budget  associated  with  Constellation  work-packages  to
CS-contractor-academic teams at other centers.

• IFPTE  concurs  with  the  NRC  report  finding  that  rigorous  requirement  man-
agement  is  a  critical  factor  in  mission  success  (Box  4.1).  It  would  therefore
appear troubling that Constellation and JSC management have chosen to use
employees of the Orion prime contractor to help define the development, vali-
dation,  and  verification  of  Orion’s  requirements;  this  creates  an  obvious  con-
flict  of  interest  as  these  requirements  impact  the  profitability  of  the  prime
contract.  To  protect  the  taxpayer,  civil-service  ethics  rules  would  disqualify
any  civil-servant  employee  from  working  on  a  NASA  project  in  which  they
had a direct financial interest. Furthermore, this questionable out-sourcing is
particularly  harmful  when  the  expertise  contracted  out  already  exists  in-
house at another NASA center.

• The  Constellation  work  is  largely  short-term  technical  oversight  tasks  of
hardware-software  development  programs,  with  the  lion’s  share  of  the  real
work  ultimately  performed  by  the  Orion  prime  and  sub-contractors.  These
work  assignments  are  generally  not  full-time  and  do  not  generally  cover
NASA’s world-class scientists and technology developers, whose innovative re-
search is critical for the long-term health of the Agency and the ultimate suc-
cess  of  the  VSE.  The  only  sustainable  long-term  solution  is  to  revitalize
NASA’s  Aeronautics,  Exploration  Research  and  Technology,  and  Science  pro-
grams.

The Administration’s proposed new flexibilities:

IFPTE  supports  NASA’s  efforts  to  obtain  enhanced  voluntary  buy-out  authority.
However,  we  strongly  opposed  the  effort  to  obtain  legislation  to  enhance  their  au-
thority  to  convert  permanent  positions  to  term  positions  as  this  would  only  exacer-
bate the current abuse of term hiring.

Recommendations:

In order for NASA to move forward towards reinvigorating its workforce to better

support all of its missions, IFPTE offers the following recommendations:

1. Congress  should  fund  NASA  as  close  to  the  authorized  level  as  pos-

sible and prohibit executive transfer authority.
• In  its  endorsement  of  the  VSE,  Congress  authorized  $18.7  billion  for
FY08, yet the President has proposed only $17.3 billion. This $1.4 billion
shortfall is at the core of all of NASA’s problems.
• None of the National Research Council recommendations on NASA work-
force  revitalization  can  come  to  fruition  without  adequate  Appropriation.
• Congress’  direction  will  not  have  the  intended  impact  unless  all  major
Appropriations  accounts  are  unambiguously  specified,  with  executive
transfer  authority  limited  to  moving  funds  within  these  major  accounts
(e.g., Education funds should be specifically appropriated with transfer to
other activities prohibited).
• IFPTE  proposes  an  additional  $300  million  for  Science  above  that  in  the
President’s budget (including increased funding for the Research & Anal-
ysis  activities  called  for  by  the  NRC  to  support  both  in-house  and  aca-
demic research), an additional $120 million for Exploration Advanced Ca-
pabilities  (to  support  the  longer-term  R&D  needed  to  maintain  healthy
and strong technology development both in-house and externally), an ad-
ditional  $30  million  for  Education  (to  encourage  our  youth  to  devote
themselves to a technical education leading to a career in aerospace), and
an additional $200 million for Aeronautics (to support NASA’s traditional
forte  in  Aeronautics  R&D  as  well  as  its  traditional  relationship  with  the
aviation  industry  and  its  new  commitments  to  the  JPDO).  In  addition  to
fully  supporting  NASA’s  key  missions,  these  specific  Appropriations  pro-
posals  also  form  the  basis  of  an  implementation  plan  for  workforce  re-
newal, consistent with the NRC report.

2. Congress  should  preserve  and  protect  the  technical  integrity  and

independence of NASA’s civil-service workforce.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

of sustained recruitment of NASA’s new generation of employees.

• All  talk  of  downsizing  should  cease  immediately  and  be  replaced  by  talk
• Congress  should  prohibit  the  disruptive  and  misguided  policy  of  full-cost
recovery of civil-service salaries, thereby re-empowering rank-and-file em-
ployees and their line management with the flexibility to assign and per-
form  work  as  needed  within  a  balanced  partnership  with  program  man-
agement.
• Congress should require NASA to fund CS salaries and travel directly to
the centers, independent of programs, to allow for more balanced and ef-
fective  matrix  management.  This  would  put  an  end  to  the  scapegoating
of the CS workforce for NASA’s overall budgetary shortfall.
• Congress  should  ask  the  Government  Accountability  Office  to  audit
• Although  Congress  has  temporarily  prohibited  layoffs,  as  seen  in  the  re-
cent  NAPA  report,  some  within  NASA  management  continue  to  promul-
gate  anti-civil  service  rhetoric.  Without  adequate  factual  justification,
NAPA  has  endorsed  a  plan  to  consider  downsizing  NASA’s  CS  workforce
(i.e.,  they  want  to  put  RIFs  back  on  the  table  with  weaker  safeguards,
with management’s latest target being 2,000 Shuttle employees primarily
at JSC and KSC as we near 2010). Clearly, most of these employees can
be  retrained  to  work  on  Constellation  or  they  will  simply  retire,  yet
NASA is asking for legislation to go after them.

NASA’s use of term positions.

3. NASA management should provide visible and sustained stability for
its current workforce to support the inspiration then recruitment of
its future workforce.
• The  best  and  brightest  young  engineering  and  science  graduates  need
once  again  to  see  aerospace  as  a  stable  career  option  in  general  and
NASA as a great career move in particular, comparable to accepting a job
at a premier academic or private-sector research institution (e.g., MIT or
Google or Lockheed Martin). They need to feel confident of stable job op-
portunities  at  NASA  early  in  their  education  to  inspire  them  to  embark
on  the  demanding  educational  paths  of  science,  engineering,  and  math.
• NASA  should  re-embrace  its  Aeronautics,  Science,  and  Technology  mis-
sions as these activities are a major component of the attraction to NASA
for the best and brightest young minds.

4. IFPTE supports the NRC recommendations, especially #2, #4, and #6.
• NASA  must  begin  an  aggressive  campaign  to  recruit  young  employees
while  the  current  senior  staff  is  still  on  board  to  transfer  its  knowledge.
• NASA  must  aggressively  establish  hands-on  training  programs  and  re-
search opportunities for both current employees and students (aka future
employees) to help forge a strong future workforce.
• NASA  must  maintain  a  portfolio  of  smaller  flight  programs  to  both  pro-
vide  valuable,  yet  less  expensive,  scientific  return  (especially  given  that
the Shuttle is no longer available to support Life or Microgravity Science)
and  to  train  young  project  managers/scientists  within  more  modest
projects.

5. IFPTE strongly opposes three NAPA recommendations.

• The NAPA report is deeply flawed as it accepts, unchallenged, erroneous
premises  associated  with  the  Administration’s  policies.  In  particular,  the
argument  that  NASA’s  mission  is  changing  dramatically  thereby  requir-
ing  a  smaller  CS  workforce  is  fallacious.  NASA’s  mission  has  been  and
will  continue  to  be  to  perform  aerospace-related  scientific  research  &  en-
gineering development. The current transient emphasis on spacecraft de-
sign and development will pass and should not be the pretext for a mas-
sive  downsizing  of  NASA’s  civil  service  workforce.  The  crisis  is  artificial;
without adequate funds for Constellation, the Administrator has resorted
to cannibalizing the Science and Aeronautics budgets and their associated
employees. Rather than advocating for a fictitious realignment, the NAPA
report  should  have  performed  a  more  neutral  and  vigorous  examination
of the budgetary and programmatic premises provided to them by the Ad-
ministration.
• The recommendation that NASA should contemplate a BRAC-like process
to  consider  the  closure  of  one  or  more  of  its  research  centers  completely

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

misses  the  mark.  BRAC  was  a  unique  response  to  America  winning  the
cold war. The US therefore needed to dramatically transition its military
posture  to  be  more  appropriate  for  the  completely  different  post-cold-war
world. NASA, on the other hand, is preparing to re-invigorate its human
space  flight  mission  in  response  to  the  VSE.  It  is  moving  back  to  the  fu-
ture  to  re-invent  Apollo,  while  also  maintaining  its  traditional  portfolio
of  Aeronautics  and  Science.  The  VSE  does  not  represent  a  dramatic
change  in  NASA’s  mission  but  rather  only  a  transient  re-emphasis  on
spacecraft  design  and  development.  Furthermore,  NASA’s  research  cen-
ters  function  as  a  lifeline  to  academia  and  are  absolutely  essential  if
NASA is going to solve the very real technology development obstacles on
the  critical  path  to  lunar  outpost  and  Mars.  NASA’s  highly-respected  re-
search centers need to be rescued from the Administration’s current mis-
guided policies, not sacrificed to meet short-term budgetary shortfalls.
• The  recommendation  that  NASA  management  be  allowed  to  streamline
its RIF procedures fails completely to acknowledge the fundamental prin-
ciples behind the creation of the civil service. Hiring and firing employees
nearly  at  will,  as  is  sometimes  done  in  the  private  sector,  may  provide
management with the flexibility it craves, but it does not work well when
management  is  playing  with  the  taxpayers’  money.  The  usual  market-
force  feedback  is  not  present  and  thus  very  stringent  regulations  are  ab-
solutely necessary to prevent patronage, cronyism, and other forms of cor-
ruption. Furthermore, given that Chapter IV of the NAPA report laments
that  NASA  management  currently  is  not  properly  following  existing  fed-
eral  law  related  to  contractor  employees,  it  would  seem  imprudent  to  re-
ward  NASA  management  with  greater  authority  to  fire  CS  employees.
Again, NASA’s primary workforce challenge, as repeatedly highlighted in
the  NRC  report,  is  to  recruit  and  build  its  future  workforce.  The  obses-
sion  with  layoffs  is  misplaced,  is  wasting  taxpayer  dollars,  and  harming
morale and productivity.
• The  recommendation  that  NASA  management  be  allowed  to  declare  an
emergency  and  terminate  its  older  annuity-eligible  employees  is  not  only
wrong-headed,  it  is  overtly  discriminatory.  Retirement  eligibility  (which
correlates  strongly  with  age)  should  never  be  used  as  a  criterion  for  ter-
mination or any other adverse employment action. When all other criteria
are  the  same,  using  retirement  eligibility  to  decide  who  stays  and  who
is fired is unconscionable. IFPTE is simply shocked that the NAPA would
openly  advocate  for  age  discrimination.  NASA  employees  generally  be-
come annuity eligible at 50 years young; IFPTE believes that rather than
considering  employees  over  50  as  liabilities,  NASA  management  should
acknowledge  that  the  maturity,  wisdom,  and  hands-on  experience  that
our older scientists and engineers provide are critical for mission success.

6. IFPTE supports enhancing NASA’s voluntary buy-out authority.

• Congress should consider legislation to allow enhanced buy-out authority
for  NASA.  We  therefore  support  the  temporary  continuation  of  medical
coverage  in  Section  102  of  the  Administration’s  proposed  flexibility  legis-
lation.
• Many  non-critical  employees  would  like  to  retire  immediately,  but  need
to stay on a few additional years for financial reasons. A more reasonable
compensation  package  would  greatly  help  NASA  persuade  these  employ-
ees to retire without impacting morale and would ultimately save the tax-
payer a lot of money.
• The  NAPA  recommendation  that  NASA  management  be  allowed  to  in-
crease  its  voluntary  buy-out  cap  from  $25,000  to  $35,000  is  simply  inad-
equate  to  effectively  enhance  this  incentive.  The  high-tech  industry
standard  is  generally  one  year’s  pay,  which  is  much  more  than  NASA’s
current $25,000 or the proposed $35,000.
• IFPTE proposes a more realistic incentive, in line with those available to
many  untenured  private-sector  employees,  with  the  buy-out  calculation
equal  to  the  individual’s  severance  pay  (regardless  of  annuity  eligibility)
capped at one-year’s salary.

7. IFPTE  strongly  opposes  any  new  authority  to  facilitate  the  conver-

sion of permanent positions to term positions.
• NASA management is already abusing its current expanded term author-
ity  and  should  not  be  given  additional  authority  to  undermine  civil-serv-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

ice  independence.  We  therefore  oppose  Section  101  of  the  Administra-
tion’s proposed flexibility legislation.

In conclusion, IFPTE is encouraged by the recent effort to distribute Constellation
work  more  fairly  and  intelligently  across  the  centers,  and  is  very  grateful  for  the
bipartisan Congressional rescue that protected NASA’s workforce from the Adminis-
tration’s  reckless  RIF  plan.  We  must  now  turn  from  the  era  of  workforce  damage
control  to  the  more  positive  task  of  re-building  NASA’s  future  multi-sector  work-
force.  We  hope  that  the  Subcommittee  will  seriously  consider  our  recommendations
above, as well as those of the NRC panel.

Once  again,  Chairman  Udall  and  Ranking  Member  Calvert,  IFPTE  thanks  you
very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  bring  these  important  issues  to  the  attention  of
the Subcommittee.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

DISCUSSION

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Stone.  At  this  point,  let  us
open  up  our  first  round  of  questions,  and  the  chair  will  recognize
himself for five minutes.

I am going to direct my first round of questions to Dr. Black and
Mr.  Stewart.  Ms.  Dawsey’s  testimony  notes  that  to  a  large  degree,
these  reports,  and  that  is  the  National  Academies’  and  the  NAPA
reports, confirm our assessments of the challenges facing us in the
workforce arena, and validate the actions that we have initiated to
address the most critical and encompassing issues.

Do  you  agree  with  NASA’s  response  to  the  findings  and  rec-
ommendations  of  these  reports,  and  if  not,  which  of  your  rec-
ommendations do you think need the most attention by NASA?

Dr.  Stone,  let  us  start  with  you,  and  then,  we  will  move  to  Mr.
Stewart, and then, if Ms. Dawsey has—if there is time left, we will
give you a chance to share your point of view. So, Dr. Stone.

Dr.  STONE.  So,  your  question  is  what  do  I  think  of  NASA’s  re-

sponse to these reports?

OPINIONS ON NASA’S RESPONSE TO NATIONAL ACADEMIES’

AND NAPA’S REPORTS

Chairman  UDALL.  Yes,  yeah,  and  if  you  don’t  agree  with  all  of
them or most of them, or some of them, which of your recommenda-
tions do you think need most attention by NASA?

Dr.  STONE.  Okay.  I  would  say  that  NASA  has,  indeed,  basically,
except  for  the  most  extreme  proposals  at  the  end  of  the  NAPA  re-
port, that I would like to address separately. The NAPA report ba-
sically  is  just  a  rubber  stamping  of  the  approach  that  NASA  has
been  taking,  of  trying  to  realign  its  workforce  through  a  process
that  largely  involves  the  flexibility  to  enhance  attrition,  and  to  re-
duce  the  civil  service  complement,  and  I  think  there  is  a  strange
mixture in the goals of NASA’s management, between trying to ad-
just  to  the  real  goal  of  the  Vision,  and  trying  to  implement  a  civil
service reshaping that involves a reduction of several thousand em-
ployees.

And  I  think  the  latter  is  a  political  decision  that  isn’t  linked  to
any  reality  to  the  Vision,  and  so,  there  is  some  schizophrenia  to
their  response,  in  that  some  of  it  is  addressing  real  issues,  and
some  of  it  is  really  just  addressing  that,  what  seems  to  be  a  pre-
determined goal to reduce the civil service complement.

As  far  as  the  NRC  report,  I  don’t  see  much  of  a  response  at  all
to  what  they  have  suggested,  and  indeed,  they  seem  to  be  con-
tinuing  to  shrink  their  education  budget,  continuing  to  reduce  ef-
forts  to  bring  in  young  people,  and  in  my  longer  testimony,  there
is a quote from the Administrator on this that I think is really tell-
ing.  And  there  was  a  question  asked  at  an  all  hands  meeting  at
Ames a few months ago by a very prominent scientist, and the sci-
entist asked: ‘‘What is NASA doing to recruit young people?’’ which
is the largest effort in the NRC recommendations, and the Admin-
istrator’s  response  was:  ‘‘I  cannot  grow  the  Agency  by  bringing  in
even  all  stars  right  now,  that  I  want  to  bring  in,  unless  and  until
folks  like  us,  who  as  you  said,  are  getting  older,  until  and  unless
these  folks  retire.’’  And  indeed,  I  don’t  think  this  is  official  policy,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

but  I  think  there  is  a  quota  of  three  to  one,  where  centers  are  not
allowed, the research centers are not allowed to hire someone until
three people retire.

And so, I think that there is a fundamental resistance from man-
agement  to  actually  seriously  take  on  the  question  of  solving  that
fivefold reduction in the younger employees, and on one side, I find
that  reprehensible,  and  on  the  other  side,  it  is  understandable.  It
comes  back  to  the  point  that  I  said  at  the  beginning.  There  isn’t
enough  money  for  Dr.  Griffin  to  meet  all  the  challenging  needs  of
Constellation,  and  also,  rebuild  the  workforce.  And  he  is  choosing
to  meet  the  short-term  milestones  of  Constellation,  and  leave  the
workforce  rebuilding  problem  to  his  successor,  and  he  is  doing  so,
I  believe,  not  because  he  wants  to,  but  because  he  is  not  being
given adequate budget to do it right.

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Stone.  I  am  going  to  try  and
give  Dr.  Black  a  minute  or  so  here  to  respond,  and  then,  we  will,
in  the  next  round,  I  will  give  Mr.  Stewart  and  Ms.  Dawsey  a
chance as well.

Dr. BLACK. Thank you, Chairman.
The  problem  of  the  workforce  is  a  daunting  one,  and  I  think
NASA  has  made  at  least  good  initial  strides  in  trying  to  deal  with
this.  As  has  been  pointed  out  by  Dr.  Stone,  our  committee’s  con-
cerns  as  regards  young  people  and  fresh  hires,  I  think  that  they
have not yet done all that well there.

One  of  the  things  to  understand  is  this  is  a  very,  very  difficult
problem.  If  you  look  at  the  kind  of  curve  that  Dr.  Stone  showed,
one of the things that I think NASA has not done is to characterize
its people both by the true level of their experience, their expertise,
they  count  belly  buttons  in  bins  by  job  categorization,  but  not
whether they really have the skills necessary.

And  the  other  thing  that  is  really  crucial  in  the  strategic  sense
is to understand the dynamics of that curve. What are the sources
and  sinks?  How  do  you  adjust?  Over  what  time  scales?  Different
things  have  different  timescales.  Graduate  students  have  certain
timescales,  industry  has  timescales.  So,  I  think  they  really  need
somebody,  and  I  don’t  believe  this  expertise  exists  in  the  Agency.
We  did  a  modest  search.  We  were  unable  to  find  things,  but  I  am
sure  somebody  in  the  university  community  knows  how  to  do  this,
to really understand what are the forces that shape and evolve that
curve that Dr. Stone showed. And I think essentially, you are going
to have to have that, if you are going to truly have a strategic plan
to deal with workforce issues.

Thank  you,  Dr.  Black,  and  at  this  time,  I  will  recognize  the

Ranking Member, Mr. Hall, for five minutes.

Mr.  HALL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Ms.  Dawsey,  it  seems  to
me  that  we  all  agree  that  NASA’s  workforce  is  likely  to  face  some
changes—we  expect  that—that  is  given—in  order  to  meet  new
goals  that  we  have  in  exploration,  science,  and  aeronautics,  and
NASA sent us a Workforce Strategy over a year ago, and I presume
that  you  have  been  busy  over  the  past  year  trying  to  implement
some of this strategy. I think that is a good presumption.

Would  you  please  give  me  some  specifics  about  what  NASA  is
doing to bring its workforce into appropriate alignment to meet our

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

exploration, science, and aero goals, and specifically, to answer the
in-house problems, as set out by Dr. Black?

HOW NASA IS ACHIEVING WORKFORCE GOALS

Ms. DAWSEY. Yes, sir. We have been working very hard over the
past  year  to  implement  the  Workforce  Strategy.  The  Workforce
Strategy  is  still  current.  What  we  have  done  is  we  have  developed
a  comprehensive  implementation  plan,  and  that  implementation
plan,  as  I  said,  is  worked  around  three  goals,  and  one  of  them  is
workforce planning.

Over the past year, we have set up a governance structure which
includes human capital as, I believe, Mr. Stewart recommended, in
all of the workforce planning decisions, aligned with other key offi-
cials  in  the  Agency.  We  have  also  set  up  in  that  governance  struc-
ture  a  standing  workforce  planning  team,  technical  team,  that  in-
cludes human capital and workforce planning, workforce transition,
staff from around the Agency, and we have specific sub-teams that
will  address  specific  issues,  for  example,  for  any  skill  mix  issues,
or the Shuttle transition. We have a team set up to do the mapping
of Shuttle employees from Shuttle to Constellation.

In  terms  of  alignment,  we  have  redesigned  our  leadership  devel-
opment  programs.  Basically,  what  we  are  working  on  is  while  our
entry level pipeline is getting some criticism here this morning, we
do  have  that  pipeline.  We  have  students,  co-op  students  at  NASA.
We  have  about  400  of  them  at  any  given  time.  We  also  have  over
400 graduate students working on NASA projects.

The other part of the alignment, though, is to make sure, as also
was  suggested  this  morning,  that  we  have  program  managers,
project  managers,  senior  technical,  and  senior  executive  service
pipelines,  and  so,  we  are  building  career  paths  and  training  pro-
grams  that  start  fairly  early  in  our  employees’  career,  and  give
them  experience  as  needed,  not  only  to  build  within  their  own  ca-
reer,  but  to  understand  NASA  as  a  whole,  both  the  program  side
of the house and the institution side of the house.

And finally, we have taken our systems that have been operating
pretty much independently of one another, the systems that would
inform  our  leadership,  and  we  are  integrating  them,  so  that  they
have  all  the  workforce  data  they  need,  all  the  demographic  data
they need, to make decisions for the workforce.

Mr.  HALL.  I  thank  you  for  that.  So,  the  NASA  Workforce  Strat-
egy,  the  ten  healthy  centers,  I  think  the  Administrator  pretty  well
put that to bed.

Ms. DAWSEY. Yes.
Mr.  HALL.  That  there  was  talk  of  closing  them  at  one  time,  and
maybe  some  others  on  here  think  that  might  be  the  thing  to  do,
but I think he has taken a pretty firm position on that, and I think
a lot of us up here recognize how very capable he is.

The  second  one  is  to  maximize  the  existing  workforce,  as  you
have  pointed  out,  and  I  think  we  have  to  do  that,  and  third,  then,
you said three goals, and is the third one to evolve to a more flexi-
ble  civil  service,  by—in  your  workforce,  you  pointed  out  the  tem-
porary people that you were using, and how many different univer-
sities  they  were  from.  Does  that  kind  of  summarize  what—the
three that you have said, or have I left out something?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

Ms. DAWSEY. No, those are the three.
Mr.  HALL.  All  right.  I  think  my  time  is  almost  up,  and  I  yield

back, and I do thank all four of you. Thank you, Dr. Black.

Chairman UDALL. Thank you, Judge Hall, and at this point, yield
five  minutes,  to  recognize  for  five  minutes  the  gentleman  from
California, Mr. Rohrabacher.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  well,  first  of  all,
let  me  ask  Dr.  Stone.  You  made  suggestions  about  spending  large
amounts of money. Could you suggest to us where that money will
be coming from?

SUGGESTED RESOURCES FOR FUNDING NASA

Dr.  STONE.  First  of  all,  I  don’t  think  they  are  large  amounts  of

money that we are talking about, asking for——

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Anytime  you  talk  about  over  $100  million,  it

is a lot of money.

Dr. STONE. Okay. But——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Where is it supposed to come from? You want
to  take  it  from  the  military?  You  want  to  take  it  from  health  re-
search?  To  be  taken  seriously,  when  someone  testifies  here  now-
adays,  you  can’t  just  come  up  and  say  you  want  hundreds  of  mil-
lions  of  more  dollars  here,  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  more
there,  and  just  expect  we  are  going  to  come  up  with  it  like  the
Tooth Fairy is going to deliver it. If you want to be taken seriously,
it is like any engineer, you have to know that you can’t build some-
thing out of nothing. So, where do you want to get that money?

Dr. STONE. With all due respect——
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  I  am  asking  a  specific  question.  You  can——
Dr.  STONE.  The  numbers  that  we  quoted  there  were  right  out  of
the  Authorization  Bill.  The  Authorization  Bill  was  passed  almost
unanimously by both sides of Congress.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Well, fine.
Dr. STONE. And so I didn’t invent——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Fine.
Dr. STONE. But secondly——
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Well,  I  will  have  to  tell  you  that  I  disagree
with—quite  often,  when  this  Congress  irresponsibly  authorizes
money,  and  doesn’t  say  where  it  is  coming  from.  You  are  an  engi-
neer, where do you want us to take it from?

Dr.  STONE.  Well,  you  mentioned  the  military.  The  military  has

well over $22 billion——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay.
Dr.  STONE.—for  its  space  research  program.  A  lot  of  the  Con-

stellation efforts——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay.
Dr.  STONE.—are  efforts  that  could  be  leveraged  by  the  military.
Indeed, when the Shuttle is gone, satellites are going to need to be
repaired in different ways, and I would think that a lot of the tech-
nology  that  would  be  developed  under  the  Constellation  program
would be dual use, and so, it would not be unfair to leverage some
of those funds.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  All  right.  That  is  a  good  answer.  That  is
what  I  was  looking  for.  So,  you  think  that  we  can  actually  find
more  funds  by  finding,  by  looking  into  what  is  now  in  the  DOD

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

budget,  and  either  rechanneling  them,  or  leveraging  them,  and
making sure that they pick up some of the costs for what you want
to do on the NASA side. Is that what you are talking about?

Dr. STONE. That was one suggestion. The bottom line question is,
though,  if  you  ask  NASA  to  do  something,  then  you  have  to  pay
for it, so if you are not going to give us the billion dollars, then you
have to decide what we are not going to do.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. And I agree with that as well, but let us just
note  that  when  people  are  advocating  that  we  are  going  to  end  up
spending so much more money, it has got to come from somewhere,
and almost, you know, in my 18 years here, at least the Democrats
now  are  suggesting  that  we  have  pay  go,  you  have  got  to  know
where  the  money  is  coming  from  in  order  to  advocate  something,
and I think to be taken seriously, and the suggestion you just gave,
I think, is a good suggestion.

Dr. STONE. Thank you.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. All right. Let me note that when we are talk-
ing  about  the  workforce  and  future  workforce,  which  you  also
stressed,  we  should  be,  I  think  NASA  should  be  focusing  more,  al-
though  we  just  heard  the  testimony  that  there  are  400,  was  it  in-
terns?

NASA.

Ms.  DAWSEY.  There  are  400  cooperative  program  interns  at

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Right. It would seem to me that there should
be  more  than  that.  That  is  a  very  cost-effective  program.  We  have
passed scholarship concepts here, which I have pushed for over the
years, to try to target those people who are getting their education,
and may not be able to afford it, unless we help them. The scholar-
ships  and  the  internships  and  apprentice  programs,  these  are  all
things that I think are very cost-effective that should address some
of  the  concerns  of  Dr.  Stone  and  others  that  have  testified  today.
Let  me  note  that  for  a  long  time,  I  have  been  on  this  committee
now  for  19  years,  and  for  at  least  15  of  those  years,  we  were  beg-
ging for a space strategy, and no President gave it to us except this
President, and I have my differences with this President on a num-
ber  of  issues,  but  I  will  suggest  that  he  did  give  us  a  space  strat-
egy. He wants us to focus on the Moon, he puts that forward, back
to the Moon is the primary mission, and if we now know that that
is  the  space  strategy,  and  we  all  were  begging  for  one,  shouldn’t
NASA be restructured so that it meets that strategy as its primary
goal?

And  you  are  not  going  to  do  it  by  keeping  NASA  exactly  the
same number of, you know, of employees, exactly the same number
of centers. There has to be a prioritization in order to meet a goal.
We  finally  have  somebody  set  a  goal,  and  I  would  suggest  that  we
are  going  to  have,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  suggest  that  we  are
going to have to do some serious reform if we are to suggest to the
people that we are serious. Now, I just asked Dr. Stone to be seri-
ous about it, give us an example, we have got to prioritize as well,
and  we  have  accepted  the  space  strategy,  let  us  get  to  work  on  it,
and  I  am  very,  very  pleased  that  Mr.  Feeney  is  going  to  be  the
Ranking Member, and working with you, Chairman Udall, and you
can  count  on  my  active  support  to  try  to  make  sure  we  reach  that
goal  of  back  to  the  Moon,  set  that  strategy,  as  the  President  has,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

and  do  the  things  that  are  necessary  to  responsibly  reach  those
goals. Other goals have to be secondary, and it might mean closing
some  of  the  centers  and  letting  some  of  the  people  go,  mainly  be-
cause  you  can’t,  as  you  say,  you  have  got  to  spend  money.  The
money  hasn’t  been  allocated,  so  let  us  spend  the  money  that  we
have got wisely, to achieve the specific goals that have been set by
the President. And I might say, approved by Congress.
With that said, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Congressman  Rohrabacher,  for
your spirited interchange with the Panel. I would acknowledge and
point  out  that  all  of  us  on  the  Committee  know  that  we  have  to
find some additional resources, and we are working in a bipartisan
way to do so. At this point, I want to yield to——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Mr. Chairman, could—just one note.
Chairman UDALL. Yes.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  It  is  finding  additional  resources  or  making

the system more efficient.

Chairman  UDALL.  My  opinion  would  be  we  need  to  both.  Thank
you  for  that  question,  Congressman  Rohrabacher.  At  this  point,  I
want to yield to Judge Hall, we want to start the clock for a special
announcement and acknowledgment. Judge Hall.

INTRODUCTION OF MR. FEENEY AS RANKING MEMBER

Mr. HALL. Mr. Chairman and Members on both sides of the dock-
et,  I  am  honored  to  say  that  when  Ken  Calvert  was  moved  to  Ap-
propriations,  it  meant  that  we  selected  from  among  our  group  one
to be ranking with you, Mr. Chairman, here, and the selection has
been made. It is Mr. Feeney. He represents the Kennedy area, and
is  a  very  great  supporter  and  very  knowledgeable  about  space  and
aeronautics,  and  I  think  to  demonstrate  that  I  recognize  him,  that
I  will  abandon  this  area,  and  let  him  come  on  and  take  my  place,
and  I  will  go  about  looking  for  another  job  or  something.  Yield
back.

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Congressman  Hall,  and  as  Con-
gressman Feeney moves over here, I will filibuster for a minute or
so  before  I  recognize  Congressman  Feeney.  I  would  tell  you  that,
as  Judge  Hall  mentioned,  Congressman  Calvert  has  taken  an  im-
portant  position  on  the  Appropriations  Committee.  He  has,  I  am
sure,  committed  to  all  of  us  that  we  will  take  this  particular  com-
mittee’s  interests  to  heart  on  the  Appropriations  Committee,  but  I
feel like we have actually generated a dual benefit, because as Con-
gressman Calvert moves to the Appropriations Committee, we now
have  a  new  Ranking  Member,  Mr.  Feeney  from  Florida,  who  rep-
resents the Kennedy Space Center, and I know will be a strong ad-
vocate for all things NASA.

I  had  a  chance  to  get  to  know  Congressman  Feeney  a  little  bit
better  when  we  traveled  together  last  summer  to  see  the  new  se-
ries  of  Shuttle  launches.  We,  as  we  often  do,  as  Members  of  Con-
gress,  jinxed  the  launch  for  that  particular  day,  but  those  of  you
remember  the  narrative,  the  Shuttle  was  launched  on  the  4th  of
July, which was very appropriate, and I know Mr. Feeney was one
of the proud observers that day.

So,  Congressman  Feeney,  I  am  looking  forward  to  working  with
you. Welcome, as the new Ranking Member of the Committee, and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

the  floor  is  yours  to  provide  questions  to  the  Panel,  and  to  make
any comments you would like to make.

Mr.  FEENEY.  Well,  thank  you,  chairman.  I  am  really  honored.  I
am  especially  honored  that  my  friend,  Ralph  Hall,  would  ask  me
to  take  this  position.  In  the  interest  of  full  disclosure,  you  know,
I am a real estate lawyer by background. I don’t know much about
science  or  space.  I  have  got  a  lot  of  people  in  my  district  that  do,
including my wife, who spent about two decades as an engineer for
a major contractor at Kennedy Space Center, and I like to point out
that my political adversaries regularly say I am no rocket scientist,
and  that  is  true,  but  I  am  married  to  one,  or  she  is  pretty  close,
anyway,  and  that  is  about  the  best  I  can  do,  but  having  said  that,
I  appreciate  the  chairman’s  leadership,  and  I  agree  with  him  that
we  are  going  to  need  both  more  resources  and  more  efficient  use
of  our  resources,  and  I  think  that  is  an  attitude  that  the  both  of
us  share,  and  I  am  very  excited  about  pursuing  ways  to  do  that.
I am particularly interested in some of the criticism of the strat-
egy  that  Ms.  Dawsey  has  laid  out  today,  and  I  think  there  is  a  lot
of  good  things  in  it,  but  some  of  the  criticism  focuses,  and  I  think
Congressman Rohrabacher mentioned it, on a lack of an aggressive
enough  plan  for  young  people.  And  I  should  share  with  you  that
along  with  Mark  Kirk  and  Rick  Larsen,  I  was  the  first  American
allowed  to  see  the  Chinese  civil  space  launch  facility  in  Jiuquan,
and  that  was  a  year  and  a  half  ago,  and  one  of  the  remarkable
things  about  what  the  Chinese  are  doing  is  that  they  are  having
young people develop a next generation rocket. What they admitted
to us, and of course, all of their program is in their military budget,
and they intentionally obfuscate what they are doing, but they ad-
mitted  that  they  have  over  100  university  centers  working  on
things involved in future space issues, whether it is creating robots
to  explore  the  Moon.  Whether  it  is  different  types  of  technology.
And one of my concerns is, and I think Dr. Black had a great anal-
ogy, no matter how talented you are, you can’t walk onto a baseball
field.  I  mean,  try  explaining  the  rules  of  baseball  to  a  foreigner.  It
is almost impossible, and it takes time to understand the rules, let
alone  develop  the  specific  skills.  And  I  am  concerned,  Dr.  Stone,  I
think,  pointed  out  with  the  retirement  that  we  are  facing,  I  am
very  concerned  that  we  do  not  have  the  long-term  plan  in  place  to
attract  the  young  people  that  we  are  going  to  need  to  maintain
space predominance, and failure to maintain space predominance is
simply  not  an  option.  We  don’t  know  what  the  Chinese  long-term
intentions  are,  for  example,  but  we  cannot  permit  space  predomi-
nance,  anybody  other  that  even  potentially  could  be  hostile  to
peaceful interests, and I think it is very important.

Dr.  Black,  would  you  elaborate,  because  you  talk  about  the  fact
that  we  ought  to  visualize  the  workforce  as  more  than  just  the
80,000  people  that  are  working  directly  in  aerospace  and  also
trained  in  aerospace,  but  we  have  got  a  much  larger  pool,  DOD,
aerospace industries, can you give us some idea how we can better
use  the  available  pool  today,  but  also,  develop  a  larger  pool  for  to-
morrow, of young people?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

SUGGESTIONS FOR UTILIZING THE CURRENT POOL OF WORK-

ERS AND DEVELOPING A WORKFORCE FOR THE FUTURE

Dr.  BLACK.  Well,  there  actually  is,  as  you  are  well  aware,  I  am
sure,  there  is  an  Interagency  Aerospace  Workforce  Revitalization
Taskforce  Act,  which  you  have  been  involved  with,  and  that  is,  I
believe,  a  term  thing  that  is  involved,  focuses  strictly  on  govern-
ment  entities.  One  thing  I  would  encourage  you  to  do  is  try  and
broaden  that.  The  ecosystem  that  we  talk  about  includes  not  only
the  government,  but  also,  the  university  community,  as  well,  and
the  private  sector  of  the  contractors,  and  it  is  in  that  context  that
I  think  the  solution  must  be  sought,  in  terms  of  how  to  balance,
move, have flexibility for the overall aerospace workforce.

I  would  say  that  if  you  take  your  point  on  China,  I  think  China
now is much like it was when I was a kid, at the beginning of the
Apollo, I am giving my age away here. It is——

Mr. FEENEY. You mean, much like we were.
Much like—right. And as, I think that it is one thing to maintain
existing space capabilities. It is another thing to have young people
actually develop new——

Dr. BLACK. Well, that is right. And I think the enthusiasm, what
the Chinese youth are probably seeing now is much what the youth
of America saw in the late ’50s and early ’60s.

Mr.  FEENEY.  I  can  tell  you,  their  taikonauts  are  heroes  over

there. We are——

Dr. BLACK. Oh, you bet. You bet. And so, and I think that is one
of the things we have lost, if you—as we listen to various witnesses
that  came  before  us  and  our  committee,  one  of  the  things  that
emerged  is  that  NASA  is  no  longer  the  place,  necessarily,  where
the people in universities are recommending their best students go,
and  in  fact,  many  of  the  best  students  no  longer  do  go  there.  And
one of the reasons for that is programs take so much longer. If you
look at what has happened with—I was the first chief scientist for
the  Space  Station  Program.  I  came  here  in  1985  for  that  function,
and  left  in  ’87.  I  don’t  have  to  tell  you  where  we  are  on  that  right
now.

So,  that  is  the  kind  of  thing  that  if  you  are  today’s  youth,  and
by  the  way,  today’s  youth,  I  think,  as  a  professor  at  Rice  Univer-
sity,  are—my  experience  and  my  colleagues’  experiences  are  that
they are much more oriented toward quick return. They are not as
career-oriented as many of us were, so I think the ability to attract
young people is a much more difficult challenge, and to keep them
in the workforce, than it was when we were growing up.

But I think it is important to do that, and Ms. Dawsey points out
the 400 kids working. The problem is, many of those are associated
with what is truly the sort of crown jewel of NASA, the science pro-
grams.  They  are  very  excited,  and  they  come  over,  and  that  is
great,  and  I  don’t  think  that  should  be  discouraged,  but  the  short-
age that the Committee noticed was more in the systems engineer-
ing, project and program management, and there are very few pro-
grams that NASA has to bring youth in those areas. They are very
strong  in  the  science  areas,  but  not  so  strong  in  those  areas,  so  I
think  if  they  are  going  to  truly  address  the  shortages  that  they
have, they need to pay more attention to that aspect, as well.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Congressman  Feeney.  Thank  you,
Dr. Black. I wanted to acknowledge that a contributing and a very
engaged  Member  of  the  Committee  has  joined  us,  Mr.  Melancon
from Louisiana. I know at this time, he doesn’t have any questions
and wants to learn from the panel, so at this time, I will recognize
the Member from Alabama, Mr. Bonner, and we all envy Alabama’s
delegation,  and  its  commitment  to  aerospace  and  aeronautics,  and
the  tremendous  set  of  facilities  and  operations  they  have  down
there. So, Congressman Bonner.

Mr.  BONNER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thanks  to  each  of

the panel members.

I  am  going  to  give  you  an  unscripted  question,  because  a  lot  of
times,  we  get  questions  given  to  us  that  we  think  we  need  to  put
on  the  record.  As  a  nation,  we  have  often  looked  to  our  President
or  to  the  head  of  NASA,  or  other  leaders  in  the  field  to  set  out  a
vision, and I think it is safe to say that each of the four of you have
a  passion  for  NASA,  and  have  a  passion  for  the  mission  of  NASA.
But as President Kennedy in the 1960s, and as other Presidents in
more  recent  years  have  done,  in  describing  their  vision  of  where
they  would  like  NASA  to  be  in  the  10,  15,  20  years  in  front  of  us,
where would you like to see NASA be? If you differ from what Con-
gressman  Rohrabacher  indicated  President  Bush’s  mission  of  tak-
ing us back to the Moon, and possibly on to Mars, where would you
like, and this is not a loaded question.

I would just like to know from your experience, where would you
like to see NASA go in the next 20, 30 years? And it is open to all
four of you.

FUTURE VISION FOR NASA

Mr.  STEWART.  Well,  I  think  in  fact,  I  think  that  the  Vision  that
President  Bush  set  out  is  a  pretty  good  one,  and  it  is  a  very  chal-
lenging one. I mean, we have been talking this morning as though
this is going to be a piece of cake. Well, I mean, given the realities
of the budget situation that the Congress faces, and given the reali-
ties  of  the  existing  NASA  workforce,  and  given  the  fact  that  one
of  the  first  things  that  Administrator  Griffin  mentioned  when  he
took  responsibility  for  that  position  was  that  he  wanted  to  bring
the core responsibilities back into NASA. He wanted NASA to have
the  expertise  and  the  experience  to  take  charge  of  developing  the
various elements that are going to be needed to achieve the Vision.
And  that  was  exactly  the  right  thing  to  say.  I  mean,  that  was
precisely on target, but it laid out a very daunting agenda, because
the fact is, and I think both our reports indicate that, the expertise
and  the  technical  expertise  that  is  needed  to  do  that  does  not  cur-
rently exist in NASA to the degree that it needs to if they are going
to  accomplish  it.  So,  that  is  why  this  workforce  thing  is  so  impor-
tant.

And so, it is a challenging Vision that the President has set out,
and  it  is  one  that  I  think  has  it,  I  mean,  you  know,  the  Shuttle
has  been,  in  many  ways,  a  real  triumph,  in  many  ways,  a  great
tragedy,  but  because  it  never  really  went  anywhere,  you  know,  it
just  went  around  in  circles,  so  to  speak,  it  didn’t  have  quite  the
same excitement associated with the Apollo Program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Well, that is going to change now. And I think when we are actu-
ally  another  couple  of  years  down  the  road,  and  the  young  people
of  this  country  see,  in  fact,  that  we  are  going  to  go  back  to  the
Moon,  I  think  there  is  going  to  be  a  lot  of  them  who  are  going  to
get very excited about that, as they did before, and I certainly hope
that that is what happens. I think it will, and that is—if we could
achieve  that,  I  would  think  we  would  be—and  don’t  forget,  the  Vi-
sion  includes  not  stopping  at  the  Moon.  And  so,  if  you  really  take
that seriously, you have really got yourself an agenda.

Ms.  DAWSEY.  Congressman,  I  agree  with  Mr.  Stewart.  I  think
that  the  Vision  set  before  us  is  an  exciting  Vision,  and  it  is  where
NASA should go.

I would like to say that our Administrator, Mike Griffin, is doing
his  best  to  carry  out  that  Vision.  He  has  reorganized  NASA  back
to the, almost to look like the organization under, during the Apollo
era,  and  we  are  all  tasked,  Mike  Griffin  has  spoken  very  directly,
as  many  of  you  may  know,  he  is  a  very  open,  direct  person,  and
he has told us what he expects of us. And yes, it is a daunting chal-
lenge,  but  I  really  feel  convinced  that  NASA  is  doing  everything  it
can,  given  what  people  are  calling  challenges  in  terms  of  budget
and  FTEs,  but  what  we  have  done  in  the  past  year  is  remarkable.
In terms of workforce planning, for example, I have talked about
a  governance  structure,  but  we  took  75  separate  systems  just  in
HR  that  didn’t  talk  to  one  another,  and  we  pulled  them  together,
to give the leadership an idea of who is working on what, and when
and  where.  We  have  a  competency  management  system  that  now
is  loaded  with  personal  competencies,  as  well  as  position  com-
petencies,  and  they  are  validated  by  supervisors  or  expert  panels.
That  system  is  married  now  with  the  Workforce  Information  Man-
agement  System,  to  show,  the  CMS  shows  supply,  the  Workforce
Information  Management  System  shows  demand,  and  together,
they are showing us where our gaps and surpluses are, so that we
can start building recruitment programs around those.

The  other  thing  that  we  are  doing,  in  terms  of  setting,  making
sure  we  are  moving  quickly  enough  and  in  the  right  direction,  is
we  have  mapping  plans  of  Shuttle  to  Constellation,  so  again,  we
are  watching  that  workforce,  and  where  we  don’t  have,  we  have
ceiling restrictions, when I mentioned that we had 400 cooperative
education  students  in  NASA,  they  are  across  all  centers.  They  are
in  science  and  engineering,  and  where  most  of  the  science  funds
are going are to the graduate students, and yes, most of the money
for the graduate student program is science.

The other part of the problem is we do have a workforce that has
been  at  NASA  a  long  time.  People  love  NASA.  It  is  an  exciting
place to work. They come to work there, and it is their career. They
are not looking to move on. The newer generation might be, but our
experience  so  far  is  they  want  to  be  there.  So,  we  are  putting  in
place  really  serious  retraining  programs.  We  are  developing  pro-
gram project management training programs. We have engineering
programs going. We are sending people to colleges and universities,
as  well  as  doing  internal  training.  We  have  realized  that  we  used
to  be  ten  centers,  and  we  realized  that  we  need  to  be  one  NASA,
and  Mike  Griffin  is  really  pushing  that.  So,  when  we  look  at  the
exploration program, if work can be done at other centers, the work

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

goes  there.  And  NASA  has  educated,  intelligent  engineers  and  sci-
entists in all ten of those centers, and so, we have been really, real-
ly successful.

Two years ago, we had over 2,000 unfunded FTEs, we have that
down to 200 now, because we have moved work judiciously, and we
have reassigned people. We have offered buy-outs and early outs to
allow  us  to  recruit,  and  over  1,300  people  have  left,  because  we
have  that  flexibility.  It  is  very  difficult  to  explain  how  all  of  this
is  coming  together.  We  are  working  very  hard  on  the  institution
side  of  the  house  to  support  the  program  side  of  the  house,  and
there  are  a  lot  of  exciting  activities  going  on.  And  we  also  have
updated——

Chairman  UDALL.  Ms.  Dawsey,  if  I  might,  the  gentleman’s  time
has  expired,  and  I  appreciate  your  passion  for  the  subject,  and  if
the  other  witnesses  would  like  to  comment  for  the  record  on  the
question  that  Mr.  Bonner  directed,  we  would  be  happy  to  accept
those comments.

I want to make a comment and make an acknowledgment before
we recognize Dr. Wu. Congressman Bonner talked about unscripted
remarks.  He  is  now  in  a  very  exclusive  group,  because  Congress-
man Rohrabacher never makes scripted remarks, to his great cred-
it.

I  did  want  to  acknowledge  we  were  talking  about  heroes  in  the
Chinese  society,  and  we  have  just  been  joined  by  a  true  American
hero, and that is Buzz Aldrin is here, sitting on the front row, and
we want to acknowledge the great Buzz Aldrin. Thank you. Thank
you for your service and your example, and we are honored to have
you here, sir.

I would be honored to yield five minutes to Congressman Wu.

AGE DEMOGRAPHICS OF THE NASA WORKFORCE

Mr.  WU.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thanks  for
making  me  a  doctor.  I  have  really  disappointed  my  parents  by  not
going  down,  further  down  that  road.  But  I  am  making  up  for  it
today.

Ms.  Dawsey,  perhaps  I  will  give  you  an  opportunity  to  follow  up
on  the  answer  that  you  were  making,  and  I  am  asking  this  ques-
tion  just  based  on  anecdotal  evidence,  personal  experience  of  vis-
iting three or four NASA centers, and attending several lectures of
folks  who  were  with  the  Mercury,  Gemini,  and  Apollo  Programs,
and  these  were  active  participants.  If  you  did  the  arithmetic,  you
sort  of  thought  oh  my  gosh,  you  know,  these  are  folks  who  were
in  their  early  to  mid  30s  when  they  were  in  charge  of  major  parts
of the program.

That  is  one  information  set,  if  you  will,  and  then,  during  my
walkthroughs,  and  this  could  be  anecdotal  and  not  accurate,  it
could be because of the people I was with, and what I was looking
at,  but  it  sure  seemed  to  me  like,  and  I  hate  to  use  the  term  old,
because  these  were  folks  about  my  age,  maybe  slightly  older,
maybe slightly younger, but there were a whole bunch of folks who
were sort of longer in the tooth, like me, than coming to the young-
er age groups, there seem to be precipitous dive-downs statistically,
and then, as you get to the youngest of the professional groups, or
out  in  the  assembly  areas,  there  might  be  a  little  blip  of  younger

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

people. But there seem to be a real collection of people at the older
end  of  the  spectrum,  and  then,  at  least  as  a  significant  valley  of
people  in  the  in  between  range,  and  a  shortage  of  younger  people.
And  I  just,  when  I  observe  that,  and  this  was,  you  know,  over
a  period  of  a  few  years,  and  I  have  not  been  back  in  the  last  12
months  or  so,  at  least,  I  have  a  concern  in  the  back  of  my  head
about  whether  we  have  the  right,  whether  we  will  have  the  right
personnel  mix  to  accomplish  the  missions  that  have  been  set  out
for us, and it is not that you don’t learn a lot, get better at things,
as one hopes, also, as one gets older, but I am just wondering about
the  age  distribution  of  the  workforce  that  we  have  today,  as  com-
pared  to  the  early  exploration  phases  that  NASA  engaged  in,
whether  that  has  something  to  do  with  NASA  budgets,  whether
that  has  something  to  do  with  the  competitive  arena  that  you  all
are  engaged  in,  with  the  private  sector  or  others,  and  I  would  like
to just turn it over to you and the rest of the panel to address that
as best you can.

Ms.  DAWSEY.  I  will  try  to  keep  my  response  shorter.  One  of  the
reasons that what you observed is true is NASA has always worked
hard not to conduct reductions in force, and in the ’90s, when there
was  major  downsizing  across  government,  NASA,  attrited  through
natural  attrition,  and  did  not  conduct  reductions  in  force  when
most  other  government  agencies  did.  So,  that  is  why  you  see  that
gap in the middle.

As  I  said,  when  we  are  able  to  hire,  we  are  trying  to  hire  to  fill
that,  to  do  the  succession  management  kind  of  hiring,  so  that  we
have  people  who  are  filling  in  the  middle  group,  and  bringing  in
younger  students.  We  recognize  we  do  have  an  issue,  and  we  are
working to address it.

One of the ways we are addressing it is we are having different—
Constellation  is  relatively  new,  and  we  are  just  finishing  the  sys-
tems  requirements,  and  the  systems  requirements  reviews  this
month, and we are going to do a program baseline synchronization
following that, and that will show, give us a better idea of what the
new  requirements  are  for  Constellation  and  where  we  need  to  di-
rect  our  recruiting,  and  so,  that  is  another  effort  to  know  what
kinds  of  skills  and  when  we  can  start  hiring  to  fill  those  skills,
those skill needs.

Mr.  WU.  Thank  you.  Would  any  of  the  other  panelists  like  to

make a comment?

Mr. STEWART. You are right about the age distribution and so on.
It  is  very  striking,  and  a  good  part  of  this  is  due  to  the  fact  that
in  the  ’90s,  there  was  a  job  freeze  in  most  areas  of  NASA,  and  it
was  very  difficult  to  deal  with  that,  and  there  weren’t  any  fresh
outs  coming  in  in  several  of  those  years.  And  I  was  on  the  Aero-
space  Safety  Advisory  Panel  in  those  years,  and  we  wrote  specific
reports on the safety implications of not having adequate workforce
dealing  with  the  Space  Shuttle,  and  it  got  to  be  2000,  2001,  those
restrictions  were  relaxed,  and  we  could  begin  to  hire  young  people
and so on.

But  there  are  going  on  in  NASA  today,  and  we  talk  about  it  in
our  report,  various  experiments,  which  are  very  encouraging—let
me see if I can get the right title on it—the Contracting Intern Pro-
gram—which has been done in the Office of Procurement, to go out

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

and  find  young  people,  bring  them  in,  circulate  them  around
through  the  centers,  so  they  don’t  get  a  headquarters  mentality,
has been very successful.

There are a number of examples in other federal agencies, which
we  talk  about  in  our  report,  that  I  think  NASA  could  usefully
adopt,  and  not  at  any  great  additional  funding,  none  of  these  are
going to cost more money, but there are examples, and I think the
panel  agrees,  I  don’t  agree  with  much  of  what  Dr.  Stone  said,  let
me  say,  but  I  do  agree  that  we  have  got  to  get  more  young  people
in.

Chairman UDALL. Mr. Stewart, thank you. The gentleman’s time
has  expired.  We  have  just  had  a  series  of  votes  called,  but  I  think
we will try and get another round from the Chairman and from the
Ranking Member, if you all would be willing to stay, and then, we
will have to adjourn the hearing.

WORKFORCE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN

Ms. Dawsey, you stated that NASA has a Workforce Implementa-
tion  Plan  to  accompany  the  Workforce  Strategy.  Does  that  plan
have  specific  objective,  steps  to  achieve  those  objectives,  specific
milestones  and  resources  requirements,  and  if  not,  why  not,  and
would  you  please  either  way,  provide  the  Implementation  Plan  to
the Subcommittee?

Ms. DAWSEY. Yes, I think it is on, the Implementation Plan is on
its  way  to  the  Subcommittee,  if  you  don’t  already  have  it.  It  was
requested on Monday, so you may have it by now.

The  Workforce  Implementation  Plan  is  very  comprehensive.  I
mentioned the three goals that we had, and each of those goals has
three  objectives,  but  the  total  is  150  tasks  to  implement  the  strat-
egy.

Chairman UDALL. Does it have timetables and milestones?
Ms. DAWSEY. Yes, it has timetables and milestones, and we have
an  automatic  tracking  system,  and  the  automatic  tracking  system
shows  the  milestones,  the  metrics,  timetables,  and  the  leads.  And
it  is  agency-wide,  we  have—some  of  our  centers  are  some  of  the
leads on the projects, on the tasks.

Chairman  UDALL.  Thank  you,  and  we  look  forward  to  reviewing

that plan when you send it over to us. Thank you.

Dr. Black, the National Academies report notes that it is critical
to  maintain  in-house  scientific  competence  to  provide  leadership
and  to  maintain  expertise  in  specialty  areas  that  are  not  broadly
practiced in universities and industry. Would you elaborate on that
point?

IMPORTANCE OF IN-HOUSE SCIENTISTS AT NASA

Dr.  BLACK.  You  know,  the  in-house  scientists  at  NASA  play  a
very special role. They provide the linkage with the project and the
science  objectives  of  the  missions.  They  help  translate  the  require-
ments.  They  are,  in  a  sense,  the  guardians  of  the  sciences,  as  the
trades need to be made, and as the mission goes forward.

And  these  are  the  kinds  of  activities  that  typically  university
people  do  not  have  the  time  or  the  inclination  to  stay  involved
with. So, it is very important that NASA maintain a core scientific

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

expertise  with  people  who  have  the  ability  to  work  with  the
projects,  work  with  the  engineers,  to  make  sure  that  the  projects
are being done in a way that really realizes the scientific objectives
that  are  set  out.  And  so,  these  are  the  kinds  of  skills,  if  I  under-
stand your question, that we think that it is important to maintain
inside the Agency.

We  did  remark  in  our  report  that  it  would  probably  be  worth-
while  at  least  doing  a  head  count,  and  see  whether,  in  fact,  all  of
the  scientists  associated  with  NASA  need  to  still  be  involved  that
way, but that is a separate issue.

Chairman  UDALL.  In  the  couple  of  minutes  I  have  remaining,
anybody  else  on  the  panel  want  to  comment  on  that  particular
question? Mr. Stewart.

Mr. STEWART. Well, somewhere before the hearing is over, I want
to  just  say  clearly  for  the  record,  that  I  think  Dr.  Stone  has  seri-
ously mischaracterized the NAPA report, and I take real exception
to  some  of  the  things  that  he  said.  I  just  want  to  get  that  on  the
record. For example, nowhere in our report do we talk about BRAC
commission. It just isn’t there. I mean, we talk about the fact that
there  ought  to  be  a  systematic  methodology  for  looking  at  the  cen-
ters,  for  matching  the  responsibilities  of  the  centers  to  the  work-
force that they have, and providing the flexibility and tools that are
necessary  to  get  the  right  people  to  the  right  place  at  the  right
time.

The Senate Appropriations Committee, when they asked us to do
this  report,  I  don’t  think  anticipated  that  we  were  going  to  come
back  to  them  and  say  well,  you  know  what,  folks,  what  you  need
to do is appropriate more money. I don’t think that was what they
had in mind when they gave us that assignment. We didn’t get into
the  issue  of  what  the  NASA  budget  ought  to  be.  That  was  not  our
assignment. Our assignment was how do you make a flexible, scal-
able  workforce  a  reality  in  NASA,  given  the  tasks  that  they  have
to  accomplish,  and  the  budget  restraints  that  are  part  of  their
world, and we have attempted to do that.

And if one reads the report carefully, you will see we are saying
you  need  data,  you  need  data  at  the  right  places,  you  need  data
that  is  integrated.  You  need  mechanisms,  and  we  have  provided
several,  that  will  help  you  make  sense  out  of  that  data,  and  then,
you  need  the  tools  that  you  can  then  act  on  that  data.  That  is  es-
sentially what the report is all about.

Chairman UDALL. Thank you, Mr. Stewart, and you can certainly

submit additional testimony on that line of thinking.

Mr. STEWART. I think we will.
Chairman UDALL. Dr. Stone, you want the last 38 seconds?
Dr.  STONE.  Just  check  the  PDF  file  and  do  a  search  for  BRAC.

You will find it.

Chairman  UDALL.  Let  me  turn,  at  this  time,  to  the  gentleman

from Florida for the final round of questioning. Mr. Feeney.

Mr.  FEENEY.  Well,  thank  you.  Again,  I  want  to  thank  Chairman
Udall,  and  we  have  to  run  off,  and  we  have  got  a  series  of  about
eight  votes,  so  this  will  probably  be  the  end,  so  that  you  guys  can
go to lunch, and we can get about our business.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

RATIO OF PERMANENT AND NONPERMANENT CIVIL

SERVANTS

I  focused  earlier  on  the  need  to  recruit  youth,  whether  directly
in  NASA,  or  DOD,  or  the  aerospace  community,  that  are  excited
about  this,  and  now,  I  want  to  address  a  question  that  Dr.  Stone
has raised and Mr. Stewart has raised, and that is the question of
what the proper balance is, being the strategy that Ms. Dawsey de-
scribed,  talks  about  a  more  appropriate  blend  of  permanent  and
nonpermanent civil servants.

And I guess I would like very briefly, because we only have a few
minutes,  I  think  I  know  Dr.  Stone’s  answer  here,  but  I  would  like
to  have  the,  maybe  he  can  address  this  very  quickly,  but  then  the
others.  What  is  the  proper  ratio?  How  do  we  determine  that,  and
for  Ms.  Dawsey,  who  I  guess  we  will  let  finish  up,  how  is  NASA
going  to  make  these  judgments  and  decisions  about  who  ought  to
be  permanent,  as  opposed—who  ought  to  be  nonpermanent  civil
servants.

Dr. Stone, you want to start?
Dr. STONE. Just briefly. As I said in the beginning of my opening
statement,  there  were  36,000  NASA  civil  servant  employees  the
last  time  we  went  to  the  Moon,  and  we  went  there  successfully.
And  now,  we  have  only  16,300  permanent,  full-time  civil  servants
left.

And  rather  than  give  a  long  answer  right  now,  I  would  just  en-
courage the Subcommittee Members to take a look at the Columbia
Accident  Investigation  Board  and  their  advice  on  this  topic,  be-
cause  I  think  there  is  a  detailed  analysis  done  by  an  objective
panel about the role of over-outsourcing technical responsibilities to
the private sector, and undermining the internal technical abilities
of  the  agencies,  and  that  contribution  to  the  Columbia  disaster,
and  I  think  that  analysis  is  thorough,  and  that  would  give  you  an
idea of what our concerns are. I can’t give you a magic number, but
I  think  when  you  look  at  the  situation  today,  and  you  look  at  the
graph  that  I  showed  you  up  there,  the  biggest  problem  facing
NASA today is not to reduce its civil service workforce, and so, the
obsession  with  this  is  a  little  bit  troubling,  considering  that  is  not
what the big problem is.

And secondly, in one of the responses made earlier by Mr. Stew-
art,  he  said  that  the  problem  of  recruiting  young  people  was  only
in the ’90s, but if you take a look at the graph, half of that fivefold
reduction  in  the  employees  between  30  and  35  was  between  1993
and 2000, and the other half of it was between 2000 and 2005. So,
all  I  am  saying  is  we  are  not  hiring  young  civil  servants,  and  the
few young civil servants that we are hiring, we are hiring into term
positions,  which  are  much  less  attractive  than  the  positions  that
were open to young people when I was looking at the Agency.

Mr. FEENEY. We are running out of time very quickly. Dr. Black

and Mr. Stewart.

sitting between these two.

Dr.  BLACK.  I  just  want  to  know  if  I  get  hazardous  duty  pay  for

No,  I  don’t  really  have  that  much  to  add.  I  think  it  is,  the  only
thing I would say here is that, do not fall into the trap of just look-
ing  at  a  simple  curve  or  two,  and  listening  to  numbers  about  how

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

many  are  in  this  bin  or  in  that  bin.  This  is  a  far  more  complex
issue than that, and to look at the dynamics of how you get people
in,  as  I  said  earlier,  to  look  at  the  differing  timescales  for  the
sources  and  sinks  of  these  people,  understanding  the  evolution  of
this  workforce  is  a  very,  very  daunting  problem,  and  I  don’t  think
we have our arms anywhere near yet around how to do that.

Mr. FEENEY. Mr. Stewart.
Mr.  STEWART.  You  can’t  give  a  precise  ratio  off  the  top  of  your
head. It is a position by position decision that the hiring authority
has to make, and it is the nature of the position, the nature of the
responsibilities  that  person  would  hold,  along  with  a  number  of
other  factors,  and  we  have  a  very  precise  decision  guide  in  our  re-
port that will help managers make that decision in a coherent, ra-
tional way.

In  some  cases,  a  term  employee  fits  the  position  very  well.  In
other  cases,  the  term  employee  would  not  be  a  good  decision,  but
you have to make that in a kind of rational way, and not just sort
of grab something out of the air, and what we have tried to do here
is to provide a mechanism for doing that in a rational and coherent
way,  and  if  that  is  done,  we  think  that  the  actual  ratio  will  take
care of itself.

Mr. FEENEY. Ms. Dawsey, you have got about 10, 20 seconds.
Ms.  DAWSEY.  Okay,  first  of  all,  using  term  appointments  is  not
for  the  purpose  of  attriting  civil  servants.  The  purpose  of  the  term
appointment  is  to  look  at  work  that  is  changing  over  the  next  20
years, and making sure, as Mr. Stewart said, that the position dic-
tates  the  type  of  appointment.  Term  appointments  are  for  two
years  initially,  but  can  be  extended  up  to  six  years,  and  with  our
new term flexibility, we can convert without further competition to
permanent  if  we,  in  fact,  still  need  the  skills.  Right  now,  we  have
a  skills  mix  issue  that  using  term  appointments  will  help  us  pre-
vent in the future.

Chairman UDALL. Thank you. We are in a bit of a hurry, so you
will  understand  as  we  depart  quickly,  but  I  want  to  thank  the
panel particularly, and for the very forthright and impassioned con-
versation  we  have  had.  And  Dr.  Black,  you  can  apply  for  hazard
pay at the site office. But I think that as a service we all care deep-
ly about NASA. We have a passion for its future, and we also have
great  pride  in  what  it  has  accomplished,  and  that  is  the  point  of
the hearing, and the point of your all’s appearance.

If there is no objection, the record will remain open for additional
statements  from  the  Members,  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up
questions  the  Subcommittee  may  ask  of  you  all,  the  witnesses.
Without objection, so ordered.

The hearing is now adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 11:30 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(69)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Toni  Dawsey,  Assistant  Administrator,  Human  Capital  Management;
Chief  Human  Capital  Officer,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration
(NASA)

Questions submitted by Chairman Mark Udall
Q1. What are the critical milestones for NASA’s workforce planning over the next few

years, and do you anticipate any difficulties in reaching those milestones?

A1. The single most critical milestone for NASA’s workforce planning over the next
few years is the end of the Shuttle Program in 2010. As the new Constellation Pro-
gram begins, NASA is shifting from a primary mode of operating and sustaining two
major legacy systems, to a period of concurrent development of several new systems,
and then to a period of transitioning from exploration back to operations. Operations
personnel will be critical elements of developmental design, testing, and verification
activities  for  Orion  and  Ares  I  initially.  Once  operational,  the  next  developmental
iteration of Ares V, the Earth Departure Stage, and the Lunar Surface Access Mod-
ule  will  begin,  thereby  concurrently  driving  the  need  for  a  substantial  develop-
mental  workforce.  Thus,  the  NASA  paradigm  must  shift  more  than  once  over  the
next few years. First, toward our new focus on development, and then to operations
cycles  that  allow  the  Vision  laid  out  in  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2005  to  be
fully  executed  on  the  schedule  and  funding  profile  outlined  by  the  President  and
Congress.  NASA’s  overarching  goal  is  to  preserve  its  critical  skill  base,  ensure  the
viability  of  its  core  competencies,  and  execute  the  bold  missions  assigned  to  the
Agency—this  will  be  challenging,  dynamic,  and  evolutionary.  The  major  milestones
for workforce planning related to transition are tied to the design milestones for the
Constellation  program  (including  initial  operational  capability  for  the  Orion/Crew
Exploration Vehicle currently planned for March 2015) as well as the retirement of
the Shuttle program in 2010. NASA will evaluate these milestones, and revise them
as  appropriate,  as  part  of  the  annual  Planning,  Programming,  Budget  and  Execu-
tion process.

Workforce and critical skills must be retained for safe execution of the remaining
Shuttle  missions,  managed  appropriately  during  the  transition  to  ensure  that  the
new  developmental  program  workforce  requirements  are  met,  and  engaged  during
the period following Shuttle retirement in 2010 prior to initial operational capability
of  the  Orion/Crew  Exploration  Vehicle.  For  those  elements  of  our  new  spacecraft
systems that are based upon heritage Shuttle hardware or existing designs, the skill
set  requirements  will  be  directly  transferable  to  the  new  programs.  In  other  cases,
some  of  our  workforce  will  have  to  shift  roles,  jobs,  and  possibly  duty  locations  as
the  needs  of  the  new  programs  require.  The  inherently  more  efficient  design  of  the
new  systems  will  result  in  a  need  for  fewer  direct  operations,  support,  and  proc-
essing  skills.  Thus,  some  of  the  operations-focused  workforce  will  be  leveraged  and
shifted to more development-focused activities such as planning, design, testing and
verification,  and  integration  in  order  to  build  a  workforce  capacity  that  enables  fu-
ture  developmental  cycles  spanning  the  transition  from  initial  Ares  I/Crew  Launch
Vehicle  and  Orion  capability,  to  development  and  fielding  of  Ares  V,  Earth  Depar-
ture Stage, Lunar Surface Access Module, Lunar Outpost, and then to systems that
will take America to Mars.

NASA plans to maintain this vital workforce and experience through final fly out
of  the  Shuttle  through:  applying  some  of  the  new  processes  required  for  the  new
Ares  and  Orion  vehicles  to  Space  Shuttle  processing  in  order  to  give  workers  the
skills  and  hands-on  experience  they  need  to  qualify  for  future  work;  non-monetary
award  based  strategies;  financial  incentives  when  necessary;  conversion  to  tem-
porary  and  term  appointments;  and  solid  leadership.  In  addition,  NASA  is  devel-
oping  integrated  workforce  requirements  across  the  Shuttle,  International  Space
Station  and  Constellation  programs.  This  will  help  with  scenario  planning,  identi-
fication  of  gaps  and  overlaps  in  skills  availability,  and  further  refinement  of  the
workforce  profile.  All  of  these  steps  will  ensure  we  maintain  the  proper  workforce
for continued safe operations.
Q2. Your  testimony  notes  that  ‘‘with  an  enhanced  workforce  planning  capability,
NASA  will  be  able  to  determine  the  demand  for,  and  supply  of  workforce  skills
based  on  current  and  projected  work  requirements.’’  What  is  the  timetable  for
having  the  enhanced  workforce  planning  capability,  and  how  are  decisions  on
workforce being made in the meantime?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

A2. NASA’s  workforce  planning  capability  is  being  enhanced  in  two  key  areas:  (1)
the Planning, Programming, Budget and Execution (PPBE) process; and, (2) the im-
provement  of  the  quality  of  planning  data  used  to  determine  gaps  between  work-
force supply and demand.

As  explained  more  fully  in  the  response  to  Question  for  the  Record  number  nine
below,  workforce  planning  at  NASA  is  programmatically  driven  through  the  PPBE
process. Formulation of the FY 2009 budget is the first time that NASA is fully inte-
grating  workforce  planning  into  the  PPBE  process.  FY  2009  budget  formulation  is
currently  in  process,  and  the  impact  of  enhanced  workforce  planning  integration  is
already  being  seen  as  workforce  analysis  drives  Agency  mission  and  work  distribu-
tion  planning.  In  addition  to  the  normal  PPBE  data  collection,  the  Agency  is  using
the NASA Workforce Integrated Management System to improve its ability to track
and  manage  the  Available  for  New  Work  pool  (uncovered  capacity;  i.e.,  civil  service
employees at NASA that are not currently assigned or supporting Agency programs)
through new data collection formats.

NASA  plans  to  complete  several  efforts  to  improve  the  quality  of  workforce  plan-
ning data for use outside of the budget process by the end of the calendar year. One
important initiative is the development of a Strategic Workforce Management Model
which  will  be  an  Agency-wide  ‘‘FTE  demand’’  (i.e.,  the  anticipated  long-term  need
for  workforce  FTE,  to  accomplish  funded  programs  and  projects)  model  to  be  used
in  workforce  planning  activities.  In  addition,  NASA  is  holding  Agency-wide  capa-
bility  assessment  forums  to  further  refine  the  Agency’s  workforce  planning  picture.
Finally,  the  Agency  is  now  evaluating  several  modeling,  simulation  and  analytical
tools in an effort to better capture system dynamics and requirements-driven work-
force and skill-mix forecasting.
Q3. The  National  Academies  report  recommends  that  NASA  increase  opportunities
for  younger  workers  to  obtain  hands-on  flight  development  experience  through
NASA’s  sub-orbital  programs.  The  report  also  suggests  that  NASA  fund  these
hands-on training opportunities through the Education Office. Does NASA have
any  plans  for  adopting  this  recommendation  and  has  it  been  discussed  with
NASA’s Education Office?

A3. Experience  has  shown  that  exciting  and  compelling  NASA  missions  truly  can
inspire  the  next  generation  of  explorers,  innovators,  and  leaders.  NASA’s  unique
program  content,  people,  and  facilities  can  be  leveraged  to  spark  interest,  capture
imaginations,  and  guide  students  toward  careers  in  STEM  fields  while  increasing
their scientific and technologic literacy to the benefit of the Nation.

A  top  priority  for  the  new  management  of  NASA’s  Science  Mission  Directorate
(SMD) is to provide greater hands-on development and flight opportunities as a way
to prepare undergraduate and graduate students in science and engineering to lead
larger  missions  in  the  future.  Through  NASA’s  suborbital  sounding  rocket,  balloon,
and  aircraft  research  programs,  as  well  as  flight  projects,  SMD  is  currently  con-
ducting  a  comprehensive  study  of  student  hands-on  opportunities  to  better  prepare
new scientists and engineers in the scientific exploration of space through a Student
Collaboration  Definition  Team.  This  team  was  established  to:  1)  explore  best  prac-
tices  in  project-based  learning  exemplifying  the  nature  of  NASA’s  scientific  explo-
ration  in  space;  2)  explore  additional  learning  opportunities  of  a  similar  character
that  is  not  part  of  a  flight  missions;  and,  3)  provide  opportunities  for  input  from
the  community  engaged  with  SMD.  This  team  held  its  first  meeting  in  early  May
2007. A white paper is under development and a community workshop will be held
at  the  end  of  2007  or  early  2008.  The  sub-orbital  research  programs  continue  their
involvement  of  students  in  relevant  authentic  research  opportunities.  In  addition,
four  new  sounding  rocket  payloads  were  recently  selected  for  flight,  with  research
launches planned between 2008 and 2010.

NASA’s Office of Education in collaboration with the Agency’s four Mission Direc-
torates  provides  additional  opportunities  for  students  to  engage  in  NASA  mission
related experiences. For example, within SMD, a broad spectrum of education activi-
ties  are  sponsored  ranging  from  kindergarten  to  postgraduate  levels.  All  of  NASA’s
science  missions  and  programs  are  required  to  have  an  education  and  public  out-
reach  component.  Through  a  competitive,  peer-review  selection  process,  NASA  pro-
vides funding dedicated to education and public outreach to researchers. NASA also
sponsors graduate and post-doctoral fellowship opportunities. In addition, the Agen-
cy  is  looking  for  new  ways  to  provide  increased  opportunities  for  students  to  gain
greater  experience  developing  and  launching  their  own  science  instruments,  either
in  conjunction  with  science  missions  or  through  its  sub-orbital  rocket  and  balloon
programs.

Examples of successful collaborations include:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

• Launched in January 2006 as part of the New Horizons Mission, the Student
Dust Counter is the first student-built instrument selected by NASA to fly on
a planetary mission. Built by students at the University of Colorado at Boul-
der,  the  counter  will  monitor  the  density  of  dust  grains  in  space.  This  data
is  of  particular  interest  to  researchers.  Given  the  nine-year  travel  time,  dis-
coveries from this mission will engage today’s elementary school student until
college when this spacecraft encounters Pluto.

• Aeronomy of Ice in the Mesosphere (AIM) began its two-year mission on April
25, 2007, after a flawless ride to Earth orbit aboard an Orbital Sciences Peg-
asus XL rocket. AIM is the first mission dedicated to exploring mysterious ice
clouds that dot the edge of space in Earth’s Polar Regions. With AIM, Hamp-
ton University in Virginia has become the first Historically Black College and
University  to  lead  a  NASA  satellite  mission.  Undergraduate  and  graduate
students  from  various  STEM  disciplines  will  have  an  opportunity  to  join  fac-
ulty researchers in the analysis of collected data.

• On  February  17,  2007,  NASA  launched  five  Time  History  of  Events  and
Macroscale Interactions during Substorms (THEMIS) micro-satellites to study
the Earth’s magnetosphere. THEMIS will help scientists understand how and
why space storms create havoc on satellites, power grids, and communication
systems.  Students  will  work  with  scientists  to  unravel  a  variety  of  scientific
mysteries.

• Between the International Space Station, the Space Shuttle, sounding rockets
and  high  altitude  balloons,  NASA’s  Education  Flight  Projects  provide  hands-
on experiences to inspire and motivate students to pursue studies and careers
in STEM through participation in NASA research applications. NASA is using
its  unique  assets  like  the  C–9  better  known  as  ‘‘The  Vomit  Comet’’  to  allow
students to study microgravity. The Agency is launching student experiments
more  than  25  miles  above  the  Earth  on  sounding  rockets.  And  NASA  astro-
nauts make phone calls from 240 miles above Earth’s atmosphere to students
to  involve  them  in  current  research  aboard  the  International  Space  Station.
All  these  opportunities  take  advantage  of  NASA’s  flight  hardware  projects
provide real, hands-on experiences to inspire the minds, imaginations, and ca-
reer ambitions of America’s young people.

• NASA’s  support  of  higher  education  students  is  embodied  by  the  National
Space Grant College and Fellowship Program, which continues to provide fel-
lowships  and  scholarships  to  students  across  the  country.  Recent  statistics
show  that,  of  the  pool  of  students  who  completed  their  degrees,  31  percent
were employed in STEM careers and 48 percent continued their education to
the Master’s, Ph.D., or postdoctoral levels. Many consortia have implemented
hands-on,  university  student-led  projects  in  aeronautics,  rocketry,  scientific
ballooning,  rocketry,  and  nano-  and  micro-satellite  development.  These  types
of  projects  provide  the  professional  training  that  enable  students  to  be  fully
prepared to enter the STEM workforce.

• NASA,  in  collaborations  with  the  International  Space  Education  Board
(ISEB),  is  increasing  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  lit-
eracy  and  enhancing  future  workforce  needs  with  the  development  of  Global
Education Ground Station Network. The network will serve the interest of all
universities  wishing  to  launch  small  satellites,  by  providing  near  continuous
ground  station  coverage  for  all  educational  satellites.  NASA  is  funding  Cali-
fornia Polytechnic University (Cal Poly) to collaboratively develop software in
support of the Global Educational Ground Station Network. The software will
schedule  passes  autonomously,  monitor  for  errors,  perform  error  correction,
prioritize utilization, etc. The network is to be developed by students for stu-
dents.

• The Office of Education is sponsoring one Science, Engineering, Mathematics
and  Aerospace  Academy  (SEMAA)  team  to  participate  in  ARLISS  (A  Rocket
Launch  for  International  Student  Satellites).  ARLISS  is  designed  to  provide
an educational experience to students in the design, flight, and data analysis
of  a  space  experiment  (an  experiment  housed  in  a  coke  can).  This  program
is  to  prepare  students  for  an  exciting,  technical  challenge  that  may  lead  to
launching  space  experiments  into  low-Earth  orbits  and  beyond.  University
aeronautics/astronautics  students,  high  school  students,  robotic  clubs,  and
hobbyists  get  together  each  year  to  fly  their  satellite  projects  in  rockets  sup-
plied  by  Aero-pac.  Stanford  University  and  others  around  the  world  sponsor
this project.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

Q4. According  to  the  list  of  NASA  workforce  competencies  provided  in  the  National
Academies  report,  there  are  106  NASA  workers  with  competency  in  astronomy
and astrophysics, eight with competency in hydrological science, 36 in air traffic
systems,  and  so  on.  How  is  NASA  making  decisions  about  how  many  individ-
uals are needed to maintain core competencies in science and aeronautics areas?
A4. The NASA centers use the Agency’s Workforce Integrated Management System
(WIMS) to plan the individuals and competencies required for future work elements.
WIMS  aggregates  the  numerical  data  expressing  workforce  requirements  for  each
center.  Center  management  reviews  this  planning  data  and  makes  adjustments  as
necessary, including adjustments to the size of specific workforce components. Each
center  is  the  focus  for  specific  key  capabilities  required  for  the  overall  NASA  mis-
sion,  including  space  flight,  aeronautics  and  science  capabilities.  Through  the  an-
nual  budget  process,  centers  work  with  Headquarters  in  making  decisions  that  af-
fect the workforce strength available in the future to provide key capabilities.
Q5a. With  respect  to  the  ‘‘Ten  Healthy  Centers’’  component  of  NASA’s  Workforce
strategy,  Dr.  Black  questions  whether  the  Centers  will  have  the  appropriate
staff  to  handle  work  that  is  sent  to  the  Centers.  Mr.  Stewart  raises  concerns
about how NASA plans to measure the health of its Centers. What are NASA’s
current plans for implementing the ‘‘Ten Healthy Centers’’ approach?

A5a. NASA  has  implemented  and  intends  to  maintain  the  ‘‘Ten  Healthy  Centers’’
approach.
Q5b. What criteria is NASA using to evaluate the health of its Centers?
A5b. An  essential  attribute  of  a  healthy  center  is  a  skilled  and  flexible  blended
workforce with sufficient depth and breadth to meet the Agency’s challenges. Recog-
nizing that NASA must be able to assess the capability (or ‘‘health’’) of its workforce
to meet mission goals, the Agency recently developed six measures of workforce ca-
pability  that  are  being  used  to  monitor  multiple  dimensions  of  workforce  health  at
the  centers  and  identify  areas  of  misalignment.  These  measures  are:  scalability,
skill availability and access, performance and proficiency, sufficiency, sustainability,
and utilization. They are defined below.

competencies at an acceptable quality level for range of anticipated work.

• Scalability:  Extent  to  which  a  center  is  able  to  adjust  the  number  of  FTE
(civil  service  employees)  and  WYE  (contractor  employees)  of  different  types
quickly  enough  to  meet  changes  in  workforce  demand  within  an  anticipated
range of future work.
• Skill  Availability  and  Access:  Extent  to  which  a  center  has  access  to  needed
• Performance and Proficiency: Extent to which civil service and contractor per-
formance  is  (or  is  anticipated  to  be)  reliable  for  range  of  work—particularly
with  work  that  is  new,  high  risk  or  inflexible  in  terms  of  schedule  or  cost.
• Sufficiency: Degree to which a center has sufficient capacity, appropriate skill
mix, and competence within the civil service workforce to fulfill management
and oversight responsibilities.
• Sustainability:  Extent  to  which  a  center  has  sufficient  ‘‘bench  strength’’  over
time  to  sustain  appropriate  level  of  internal  capacity  in  key  business,  tech-
nical, and managerial positions to grow in-house skills and replace workforce
as they move up or out.
• Utilization:  Degree  to  which  civil  service  workforce  is  used  efficiently  to  per-
form  the  work  of  the  center,  in  terms  of  ‘‘coverage’’  of  workforce  by  budgeted
FTE dollars as well as efficient and effective use of staff to funded work.

Associated  with  each  measure  are  qualitative  and/or  quantitative  indicators  (in-
cluding  demographic  patterns,  refresh  rates,  attrition  patterns,  career  development
paths)  that  each  center  uses  to  assess  its  workforce  relative  to  that  measure.  The
measures  can  be  used  individually  to  describe  specific  areas  of  misalignment,  but
are  intended  to  operate  as  a  set  to  demonstrate  the  overall  ‘‘health’’  (or  capability)
of  a  center’s  workforce  and  indicate  potential  tradeoffs  that  may  be  necessary  to
meet particular workforce objectives.

It  is  important  for  the  Agency  to  identify  potential  misalignments  sufficiently
early that there is adequate lead time to develop and implement effective strategies
to  correct  the  misalignments.  For  that  reason,  we  have  integrated  this  assessment
process with the annual Planning, Programming, Budgeting, and Execution process.
The objective is to have centers provide information to the Agency regarding the ca-
pability  of  their  workforce  over  the  budget  planning  horizon  using  a  consistent  and
systematic approach.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

Q6. How  are  decisions  currently  being  made  on  whether  NASA  projects  should  be

conducted by in-house civil servants or by contractors?

A6. NASA  has  a  policy  directive  in  place  to  address  distinguishing  between  con-
tractor  and  civil  service  functions.  NASA  also  has  identified  specific  activities  that
it  has  determined  to  be  vital  to  keep  in  house.  These  include:  strategic  guidance,
oversight,  fundamental  decision-making,  sustaining  program  momentum,  retention
of  institutional  memory,  decisions  about  cost  trade-offs,  and  architectural  under-
standing. Decisions regarding whether projects should be conducted by in-house civil
servants  or  by  contractors  are  made  within  the  framework  of  the  NASA  Strategic
Acquisition  Approach.  During  acquisition  strategy  planning,  leadership  considers
issues  such  as  alignment  with  the  Agency  Strategic  Plan  and  the  NASA  Ten
Healthy Centers policy. Prior to acquisition or to partnership commitments, Acquisi-
tion  Strategy  Meetings  are  held  to  validate  make-buy  rationales  and  to  make  final
make-buy decisions.
Q6a. How  does  NASA  determine  whether  it  has  the  right  level  of  in-house  expertise

to make ‘‘smart-buyer’’ decisions?

A6a. Assuring  ‘‘smart-buyer’’  capability  is  inherent  in  Agency  and  center  leader-
ship’s  responsibility  to  manage  NASA’s  multi-sector  workforce.  It  is  inextricably
linked with responsible institutional and technical management practiced at NASA.
Several  major  Agency-level  processes  come  together  to  ensure  that  NASA  has  the
right level of in-house expertise to make ‘‘smart-buyer’’ decisions. Within the acqui-
sition  process,  NASA  leadership  at  both  the  Agency  and  center  level  work  together
in the Strategic Acquisition Approach to make sure that all pertinent considerations
(such  as  key  activities  and  Agency  strategy  and  policy  described  above)  are  taken
into  account  in  determining  which  work  to  contract  out  and  which  to  perform  in-
house. Within the budget process, the Agency makes decisions about the assignment
of  work  to  centers  such  that  risk  to  the  long  term  viability  of  centers  and  their
‘‘smartbuyer’’ capability is minimized and center health assured. Within the human
capital  process,  recruitment,  staffing  and  development  actions  are  undertaken  con-
tinually to improve NASA’s ‘‘smart-buyer’’ capability.
Q6b. Does NASA plan to use the tools for decisions about the mix of contractors and

civil servants in NASA projects provided in the NAPA report?

A6b. It  is  important  to  note  that  NAPA’s  eight  major  categories  of  critical  impor-
tance in deciding whether to hire a civil servant or use a contractor are not concep-
tually  new  to  NASA.  Considerations  of  Function,  Resources,  Workload,  Labor  Mar-
ket,  Accountability,  Risk,  Quality/Service  Level,  and  Employment/Flexibility  are  al-
ready part of NASA’s decision-making. What is new about NAPA’s NASA Civil Serv-
ant-Contractor Decision-Making Guide is its quantitative approach to using the scor-
ing  and  rating  of  multiple  criteria  within  each  category  to  drive  Agency  make-buy
decisions.  NASA  is  currently  in  the  process  of  coordinating  analysis  and  evaluation
of NAPA’s Guide to determine how it may be incorporated into Agency practice.
Q7. Your testimony refers to the creation of a Workforce Planning Governance Struc-
ture.  How  often  does  this  group  meet  and  could  you  please  provide  some  exam-
ples of the types of decisions that they are making?

A7. The  Workforce  Planning  Governance  Structure,  established  to  strengthen
NASA’s  human  capital  strategic  planning  capability,  has  representation  from  the
Agency’s  human  resources  community,  mission  directorates,  other  mission  support
offices,  and  the  NASA  centers.  The  governance  process  will  be  used  to  align  the
Agency’s  resources  in  a  manner  that  ensures  the  effective  utilization  of  the  work-
force  and  the  skills  needed  to  accomplish  the  Agency’s  mission.  The  focus  will  be
on  increasing  the  level  of  integration  and  collaboration  across  workforce  planning
functions,  improving  the  quality  of  information  used  to  make  decisions,  and  bal-
ancing short- and long-term planning needs.

There  are  three  main  components  of  the  Governance  Structure:  the  Agency  Gov-
ernance  Group,  a  Workforce  Planning  Technical  Team,  and  other  issue-specific  ad
hoc technical teams that are formed as needed.

The  Agency  Governance  Group  is  responsible  for  surfacing  high-risk  issues  and
recommendations  to  senior  management,  evaluating  the  results  of  planning  activi-
ties,  monitoring  the  progress  of  the  operational  groups,  and  developing  workforce
planning capabilities.

The Workforce Planning Technical Team is a standing, on-going group that imple-
ments  workforce  planning  guidance  and  policies;  helps  develop  and  implement  cen-
ter workforce planning capabilities; and assists in collecting data in support of work-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

force activities undertaken by the team. It is the hub of workforce planning informa-
tion collection, distribution, analysis, and reporting across NASA.

The ad hoc technical teams are formed to deal with specific issues. Their purpose
is  limited  to  the  issue  they  are  tasked  with  solving,  with  a  defined  scope  and
timeline.

The  Workforce  Planning  Technical  Team  is  the  element  that  meets  regularly  to
address  important  workforce  issues  facing  the  Agency  and  to  develop  strategies  to
address the issues. It is not the group that makes the key decisions for the Agency;
instead,  it  functions  as  a  working,  representative  team  that  studies  significant
workforce  issues  and  provides  information,  data,  and  recommendations  to  Agency
senior  management  to  consider.  This  team  held  its  first  meeting  in  mid-February
and  meets  (via  telecon)  every  two  weeks.  This  group  has  focused  on  a  number  of
significant workforce planning initiatives over the past four months, including:

• establishing  a  greatly  improved  process  for  identifying  the  Available  for  New
Work (uncovered capacity) segment of the workforce to facilitate finding solu-
tions to mitigate the problem; and,
• ensuring  that  centers  understand  the  new  ‘‘Measures  of  Workforce  Capa-
bility’’  adopted  by  the  Agency  to  assess  workforce  health  at  the  centers  so
that  the  information  centers  provide  will  generate  valuable  insights  into  the
workforce challenges they face, enabling Agency leadership to identify the ac-
tions needed to strengthen and sustain workforce health.

Q8a. At  the  June  13,  2006,  Subcommittee  hearing,  you  testified  that  NASA  had  re-
duced  its  uncovered  capacity  through  retraining,  job  fairs,  and  buy-outs,
among other measures. What is the current status of NASA’s uncovered capac-
ity and how does NASA track who is uncovered and by how much?

A8a. As  stated  in  the  NASA  response  to  Questions  for  the  Record  number  two
above  and  number  nine  below  the  Agency  plans  individuals  to  programs  and
projects at one tenth of an FTE level by program and project at the work breakdown
(WBS)  level  by  name  in  the  current  year  and  next  two  years  in  the  Agency  Work-
force  Integrated  Management  System  (WIMS).  WIMS  identifies  which  of  the  work-
force is not fully assigned to a WBS and by how much.

NASA’s  level  of  Available  for  New  Work  has  been  reduced  to  less  than  100  FTE
in  FY  2008,  an  amount  that  is  historically  manageable  as  it  is  owed  primarily  to
normal starting and stopping of tasks or projects. The success in reducing the level
of  uncovered  capacity  is  due  primarily  to  assigning  Constellation  Program  work  to
every  NASA  center  so  that  all  centers  are  vested  in  the  space  exploration  mission.
While  NASA  still  has  skill  mix  imbalances  at  the  centers  the  Agency  continues  to
address those through early out/buy-out measures.
Q8b. At  last  year’s  hearing,  you  noted  that  NASA  had  established  retraining  pro-
grams  lasting  several  months  at  research  Centers  to  allow  staff  to  develop  the
skills needed to handle new work sent to the Centers. What is the result of those
training  programs  and  how  are  you  assessing  the  effectiveness  of  those  pro-
grams?

A8b. Many  NASA  centers  have  initiatives  in  place  to  ensure  they  have  employees
in  place  with  the  skills  necessary  to  take  on  Constellation  work.  The  retraining  ef-
forts  predominantly  focus  on  program  and  project  management  and  systems  engi-
neering.  Many  of  these  initiatives  are  in  their  infancy,  with  identified  employees
still  working  on  competency  and  skills  development.  NASA’s  Academy  for  Program
Project and Engineering Leadership, which provides the bulk of this type of training
within  the  Agency,  conducted  over  1,600  instances  of  related  training  in  FY  2006.
Training instances in FY 2007 will exceed last year’s number.

NASA’s  Langley  Research  Center  (LaRC)  in  Virginia  has  begun  a  program  of  re-
training  that  includes  technicians.  LaRC  has  also  offered  open  enrollment  courses
on  program  management.  In  addition,  LaRC  has  begun  a  series  on  program  man-
agement  and  exploration  which  consists  of  courses,  mentoring,  projects,  and  details
to  other  centers.  To  date,  the  participants  have  completed  all  the  course  work  and
are  scheduling  other  aspects  of  the  curriculum.  NASA’s  Glenn  Research  Center  in
Ohio  has  recently  begun  its  second  class  of  systems  engineering.  They  are  con-
ducting a mid-point evaluation of the first class and will make needed adjustments.
Program  effectiveness  will  eventually  be  assessed  by  engineering  and  project  man-
agement feedback.

In addition, other centers have transition teams in place to manage retraining ef-
forts. NASA’s Johnson Space Center in Texas has established an Engineering Acad-
emy  designed  to  provide  a  comprehensive  training  program  for  the  next  generation
of  engineers.  This  effort  will  prove  especially  useful  to  those  engineers  currently

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

supporting the Space Shuttle Program, as they gain knowledge & training in design
and  development  competencies.  NASA’s  Kennedy  Space  Center  in  Florida  central-
ized all day-to-day engineering functions into a new Engineering Directorate in Oc-
tober  2006.  The  realignment  effort  will  enable  them  to  more  efficiently  and  effec-
tively utilize current engineering skills and resources as well as position themselves
to be prepared for meeting Constellation workforce and skills requirements. NASA’s
Marshall  Space  Flight  Center  in  Alabama  has  created  a  Shuttle  Transition  Team
that is heavily engaged with human resources staff to define skill gaps, recruitment
and retraining strategies.

Not  all  of  the  research  centers  have  been  conducting  retraining.  NASA’s  Dryden
Flight  Research  Center  in  California,  for  example,  was  able  to  hire  within  the  past
year.  Individuals  were  selected  with  the  needed  skill  set  to  support  the  Center’s
Constellation work.

The centers are working to ensure that they have the necessary competencies and
skill  sets  to  support  the  Vision  for  Exploration.  They  have  positioned  themselves
well as the workforce plan more sharply focuses on the competencies needed for the
Agency’s future.
Q9a. Your  testimony  states  that  NASA  has  ‘‘integrated  and  synchronized  workforce
planning  with  the  development  of  program  and  project  budgets.’’  Could  you
please  describe  in  concrete  terms  how  workforce  planning  is  integrated  with
programs and with project budgets?

A9a. NASA  utilizes  the  Planning,  Programming,  Budget  and  Execution  (PPBE)
process  as  an  Agency-wide  methodology  for  aligning  resources  in  a  comprehensive,
top-down  approach  that  supports  the  Agency’s  vision  and  mission.  It  focuses  on
translating  Agency  strategy,  priorities  and  planned  outcomes  into  actionable  pro-
grams. Workforce planning at NASA is programmatically driven through this budg-
et  process.  The  preparation  of  the  FY  2009  budget  is  the  first  year  that  we  have
fully integrated workforce planning into the PPBE process through all phases.

Several  of  the  annual  PPBE  process  milestones  incorporate  workforce  planning:
(1)  Both  the  Strategic  Program  Guidance  and  the  Program  and  Resource  Guidance
incorporate  workforce  planning  policy  guidance;  (2)  Interim  snapshots  of  workforce
distribution  data  inform  all  of  the  milestones  within  the  programming  phase  of
PPBE; (3) The Institutional Infrastructure Analysis includes the evaluation of quali-
tative  Workforce  Measures  of  Capability  (e.g.,  sustainability,  scalability,  etc.)  and
quantitative workforce planning data focused on areas of concern collected from the
NASA  centers;  (4)  Workforce  data  and  analysis  informs  make-buy  decisions  made
under  NASA’s  new  Strategic  Acquisition  Approach,  as  well  as  final  Programming
decisions;  and,  (5)  Outputs  of  the  PPBE  Programming  phase  include  a  comprehen-
sive  plan  for  work  and  workforce  distribution  for  the  current  and  next  five  fiscal
years.

Data  collection,  tracking  and  reporting  for  PPBE  workforce  planning  is  managed
through  the  NASA  Workforce  Integrated  Management  System  (WIMS).  Within
WIMS, the supply of current and planned civil servants is aligned with planned pro-
gram-based  work  demand  and  funding  sources.  WIMS  outputs  include  a  workforce
plan that ties each employee (to the 1/10 of an FTE level) to a specific project work
breakdown structure (WBS) element for the current and next two years. For the fol-
lowing three years, FTE-competencies are planned by WBS. Because of these plans,
each  NASA  center  understands  how  many  FTEs  and  what  type  of  FTE  is  funded
for  the  various  projects  assigned  to  it,  and  it  can  plan  its  human  capital  programs
accordingly.
Q9b. Prior  to  this  integration,  how  were  workforce  decisions  made  with  respect  to

program developments and project budgets?

A9b. Prior  to  the  implementation  of  the  Planning,  Programming,  Budget  and  Exe-
cution (PPBE) process, there was a greater separation between budget planning and
workforce  planning.  The  processes  were  more  sequential,  with  workforce  planning
being secondary. Budget decisions were made first, and these drove workforce plan-
ning.  In  recent  years,  key  aspects  of  budget  planning  and  workforce  planning  take
place concurrently. NASA’s implementation of full cost accounting has shed light on
the  workforce  impacts  of  what  previously  might  have  been  understood  as  primarily
budget  decisions.  Currently,  analysis  of  the  workforce  frequently  influences  and
even  drives  budget  and  mission  planning  decisions;  for  example,  in  determining  at
what NASA center work packages will be directed.
Q10a. Your  testimony  notes  that  ‘‘Competencies  are  the  common  thread  that  tie  the
elements  of  workforce  management  together.  CMS  is  a  relatively  new  system
that  we  are  continually  working  to  improve.  By  integrating  CMS  with  other

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

workforce planning tools, we are able to not only identify, the critical current
and future competency gaps and surpluses, but we can weave that competency
information throughout the workforce management process.’’ Could you please
describe  the  history  of  the  CMS  development  along  with  milestones  for  im-
provements that are being made or are planned to be made.

A10a. The  Competency  Management  System  (CMS)  is  managed  and  operated  by
the  Office  of  Human  Capital  Management  at  NASA  Headquarters,  working  with
mission directorates, mission support offices and the NASA centers. The primary ob-
jectives of CMS are to maintain a listing of workforce competencies across the Agen-
cy, align the expertise of the workforce to the mission via the budget planning proc-
ess,  and  enable  the  Agency  to  build  the  level  of  expertise  in  targeted  knowledge
areas.

The CMS was deployed in multiple phases as it grew in scope and operations. The
goal  was  to  try  and  minimize  the  impact  and  work  at  the  centers,  so  early  deploy-
ment was limited to a small audience at each of the centers. This also allowed great-
er  flexibility  with  the  design  by  allowing  the  team  to  incorporate  lessons  learned
from one phase into the next.

Since the start of the program, the Agency has undergone several major strategic
and operational changes. Therefore, the CMS must, and does continue, to adjust and
adapt to the changing business environment in order to maintain its relevancy and
usefulness to the Agency’s mission.
The  history  of  CMS  development  along  with  milestones  for  improvements:
Development/Center Implementation Pilot Phase (2000–2001)

ess)

• Developed the competency model (concepts, data structure and business proc-
• Developed  a  Competency  Dictionary  at  one  center  (content  from  subject  mat-
• Collected competency data from all 1,800 employees at the center over a three
• Supervisors  and  peer  reviewers  conducted  validation  of  employee  com-

month period

ter experts)

petencies over a five month period

Agency Implementation Pilot Phase (2001–2003)

Classification Codes)

subject matter experts from the centers)

• Developed  the  Competency  Dictionary  for  the  entire  Agency  (consensus  by
• Generated  an  initial  Position  Level  Competency  Inventory  (based  on  NASA
• Centers refined the position inventory
• Performed  FY  2005  interim  budget  assessment  of  workforce  FTE  needs  in
• Performed first GAP analysis and identification of critical competencies

terms of competencies

Agency Implementation Deployment Phase (2004–2006)

ence to include functional offices at the corporate level)

• Performed FY 2006 budget assessment of workforce FTE needs
• Conducted  revision  5  of  the  Competency  Dictionary  (increased  review  audi-
• Requested competency data from all employees in the Agency
• Supervisors performed validation of employee competencies
• Planned deployment of additional functionality (2007–2008)
• Integrated  with  the  employee  development  process  and  the  Agency’s  new
• Modified  the  Agency  workforce  gap  analysis  process  to  adapt  to  changes  of

Learning Management System

the Agency budget planning process
Operational & Maintenance Phase (2008–)

cy budget submittal

• Perform  annual  review  and  revision  of  the  workforce  competency  dictionary
• Perform annual Agency workforce gap analysis in conjunction with the Agen-
• Supervisors  and  human  resource  specialists  maintain  accurate  and  updated
• Employees  and  supervisors  develop  and  implement  individual  learning  plans

competency requirements for job positions

to build and maintain employee’s expertise

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

Q10b. What  are  the  other  workforce  planning  tools  being  integrated  with  CMS  and

what is the plan for that integration process?

A10b. Competency  Management  System  (CMS)  data,  plus  a  comprehensive  set  of
other workforce data currently available, are already providing good definition of the
current  workforce.  The  Workforce  Information  Management  System,  in  conjunction
CMS, provides the Agency with good information about current workforce gaps and
surpluses.  Additionally,  the  Agency  has  a  business  intelligence  tool  populated  with
current and historical workforce data. This business intelligence tool enables multi-
dimensional analysis of workforce trends and forecasts future retirements in specific
organizational, occupational and skills areas. Forecasting of retirements enables the
Agency  to  do  one  aspect  of  advanced  planning  for  the  workforce,  determining  if
there  are  workforce  components  which  are  at  increased  risk  due  to  future  losses.
Q10c. When  will  NASA  be  in  a  position  to  identify  current  and  future  competency

gaps and surpluses using workforce-planning tools such as CMS?

A10c. Currently,  NASA  is  planning  to  utilize  CMS  in  the  fall  of  2007  to  perform
workforce competency gap analysis based on the proposed FY 2009 budget. This in-
formation  will  show  trends  in  planned  competency  needs  over  the  next  five  years
and the forecasted ability of the workforce to meet those needs. From this analysis,
areas of potential competency shortages and surpluses should be identified.

The  second  aspect  of  workforce  planning  requires  effective  processes  for  getting
good  definition  of  future  work  requirements.  This  is  directly  related  to  program
planning and budget formulation, and, for the first time, NASA is integrating work-
force  planning  with  the  budget  process  for  the  FY  2009  budget.  NASA  anticipates
successful identification of potential workforce gaps and surpluses. The Agency also
anticipates  it  will  have  learned  important  lessons  to  apply  to  the  FY  2010  budget
and workforce planning processes.
Q11a. Your  testimony  states  that  ‘‘The  capabilities  of  HCIE  (Human  Capital  Infor-
mation  Environment)  are  enormous,  limited  only  by  our  ingenuity  in  identi-
fying the boundless ways in which information can be woven together to drive
decisions and enable success.’’ Could you please describe the requirements for
the development of the HCIE?

A11a. Developing  the  Human  Capital  Information  Environment  (HCIE)  is  the  first
step in creating a fully integrated, strategically focused, business management envi-
ronment  for  online,  near-real-time  access  to  comprehensive  information  needed  for
rapid  and  accurate  decision-making.  The  basic  requirement  for  HCIE  development
is inter-operability and close integration with NASA’s financial management system
through  a  shared  database  to  provide  dependable  human  capital  information,  inte-
grated with information from other business areas, such as finance, for all organiza-
tional elements. This common, robust data source will eliminate the need for stand
alone, non-integrated systems, which often offer redundant capabilities. The author-
itative data repository, HCIE, will furnish a wealth of information in support of the
demands  of  this  mission-driven,  project-oriented  Agency.  HCIE  supports  the  Presi-
dent’s  Management  Agenda  (PMA),  implementation  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration,  and  our  NASA  Workforce  Transformation;  and  aligns  with  our  Information
Resource  Management  Strategy  and  the  HR  Lines,  Business,  and  EGov  require-
ments.  Finally,  HCIE  has  been  developed  using  a  service-oriented  architecture
which  provides  point  integration  and  inter-operability  with  our  non-human  capital
applications  such  as  identify  management,  safety,  security,  legal,  facilities,  and  fi-
nancial management.
Q11b. What is the relationship of the CMS and other workforce planning tools to the

HCIE?

A11b. The  HCIE  is  the  vehicle  to  enable  integration  of  all  human  capital  tools,  in-
cluding  CMS  and  the  other  workforce  planning  tools.  NASA  has  already  integrated
information  from  CMS,  WIMS  (workforce  planning  tool),  the  Agency’s  Labor  Dis-
tribution  System  and  the  Agency’s  budget  system  with  the  HCIE  data  warehouse.
By  integrating  authoritative  data  from  each  of  NASA’s  workforce  planning  and  fi-
nancial systems within a single data warehouse, the Agency enables the generation
of  complex  queries,  analysis  and  reporting  of  information  most  useful  to  project
managers, program managers and workforce planners.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  John  G.  Stewart,  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  Fellow;

Member, Panel on NASA Multi-sector Workforce

Questions submitted by Chairman Mark Udall
Q1. Both the NAPA and the National Academies reports call for more detailed infor-
mation on the workforce at NASA’s Centers. Could you please discuss in specific
terms  what  information  the  Agency  needs  in  order  to  support  long-term  work-
force planning?

A1. The  Panel  believes  that  NASA’s  workforce  planning  processes  and  data  collec-
tion  should  address  the  total  workforce,  including  the  work  for  which  it  will  hire
staff as well as for the work it will buy. While the Panel acknowledges the key dif-
ferences in NASA’s relationship with its contractors and noted that NASA is not re-
sponsible  for  managing  contractor  personnel  on  a  daily  basis,  the  Agency  should
nonetheless do a competency analysis for this group that comprises two-thirds of the
Agency’s  multi-sector  workforce.  The  contractor  competency  assessment  should  be
done on an aggregate basis, focusing on cost effectiveness, timeliness of deliverables,
and  return  on  investment.  In  addition  to  detailed  information  about  needed  com-
petencies  across  programs,  NASA  needs  information  on  its  required  skills,  certifi-
cations, and programmatic/project assignments.

For the contracting organizations, NASA needs such information as:

• Appropriate  roles  of  contractors—for  example,  the  Agency  should  specifically
identify  work  that  is  not  inherently  governmental,  is  located  off-site,  is  not
a  NASA  core  competency,  is  not  needed  long-term,  requires  a  unique  exper-
tise,  or  results  in  a  distinct  product  appropriately  delivered  by  a  contractor.

• Contract duration and flexibilities for surge capacity.
• Penalties associated with early termination.
• Cost-effectiveness.
• Return-on-investment.

In terms of its current workforce, NASA will need to identify competing demands
across  programs  and  projects.  It  will  need  to  fully  understand  the  current
workforce’s availability and competencies and project future workforce requirements
across  the  organization  in  the  short-term,  intermediate-term,  and  longer-term  time
horizons.

While  gathering  information  on  the  current  civil  service  workforce,  NASA  should
consider  the  extent  to  which  current  recruiting  sources  and  programs,  as  well  as
current  training  and  development  programs,  are  meeting  its  needs.  In  addition  to
the standard information typically collected in workforce planning processes, NASA
particularly needs information that allows it to track skill mismatches by individual
employees and field centers. It particularly needs information such as:

• Existing competencies, especially for key occupations
• Potential desirability of retraining or redirecting competencies and the cost of
• Occupational mix

retraining, if needed and feasible

This  information  should  be  collected  by  center  and  aggregated  for  the  Agency  as

In order to project future work requirements, NASA needs to collect data in such

a whole.

areas as:

and longer-term

• Specific  program  demand  changes  over  the  short-term,  intermediate-term,
• Competencies needed during these time frames based on business projections
• Nature  of  the  work  to  be  done,  including  volume,  location,  duration,  and  ap-
propriate  component  of  the  multi-sector  workforce  (tenured  or  limited  dura-
tion civil servant, contractor, grantee, university, military, etc.)

As part of this analysis, NASA should consider several key questions:

lying job functions, need to change to meet these demands?

• How will the structure of the work and its organization, as well as the under-
• How will technology continue to impact the way work is accomplished?
• How can the Agency respond to unexpected requirements or contingencies?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

NASA  also  needs  to  determine  the  core  workforce  required  to  maintain  com-
petencies  that  may  be  required  over  the  longer-term,  but  for  which  the  Agency  has
a  declining  current  need.  By  quantifying  core  workforce  requirements,  the  Agency
could  ensure  a  critical  mass  is  available  in  the  future  in  case  of  a  resurging  need.
To this end, the Panel urged NASA to use a methodology, such as RAND’s, to quan-
tify  the  ‘‘core’’  workforce  required  to  maintain  its  critical  aeronautics  and  scientific
competencies.  Consistent  with  the  Panel’s  emphasis  on  the  total  NASA  workforce,
the analysis should include both civil service and contractor components. The Panel
further  recommended  that  this  same  methodology  be  applied  to  the  Shuttle  transi-
tion  process  to  assist  with  long-term  scheduling  projections,  quantification  of  core
competencies and proficiencies, and analysis of overlapping mission needs.
Q2. The NAPA and National Academies reports emphasize that NASA should make
full  use  of  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004.  Did  your  committee  conclude  that
NASA was under-utilizing the Flexibility Act, and if so, why?

A2. The Panel believes that NASA could make greater use of certain key provisions
of  the  Flexibility  Act.  One  provision  that  NASA  has  made  extensive  use  of  is  the
term  appointment  authority.  In  this  area,  however,  the  dominant  practice  or  inten-
tion  at  most  centers  has  been  to  convert  successfully  performing  terms,  without  re-
gard  to  whether  the  work  they  are  performing  is  permanent.  The  major  exception
has  been  Kennedy  Space  Center,  which  has  no  plans  to  routinely  convert  terms
given the planned retirement of the Space Shuttle.

In  addition  to  the  term  appointment  authority,  the  NASA  Flexibility  Act  of  2004

provides the Agency with additional authorities in the following areas:

a critical need.

sition with NASA designated as a critical need.

positions with qualifying GPA (Distinguished Scholar program).

• Pay a ‘‘re-designation’’ bonus to a current federal employee, who accepts a po-
• Pay  a  retention  bonus  of  up  to  50  percent  of  basic  pay  if  the  position  meets
• Pay  a  salary  of  up  to  the  Vice  President’s  for  a  position  when  the  Adminis-
trator  finds  it  necessary  to  recruit  or  retain  an  exceptionally  highly  qualified
individual for a critical position (limit to 10 employees).
• Direct  hiring  authority  for  GS–7  through  GS–12  scientific  and  professional
• Ability  to  extend  Intergovernmental  Personnel  Act  assignments  beyond  the
• Travel and transportation expenses for certain new appointees.
• Annual leave enhancements for certain non-federal experiences.
• Limited  term  appointment  to  ‘‘career  reserved’’  SES  positions  to  fill  a  tem-
• Qualifications  pay  to  encourage  employees  to  accept  a  new  set  of  duties  or
• Increased maximum rate of pay for NASA–excepted (NEX) employees.

initial two-year period for up to four additional years.

porary need.

new position.

The  Panel  recommended  that  NASA  use  formal  decision  metrics  to  ensure  that
decisions about hiring or converting terms are grounded in work-based criteria. This
will  ensure  that  NASA  acts  strategically,  not  tactically,  in  filling  its  term  and  per-
manent  positions.  Regarding  conversions,  the  Panel  believes  that  they  should  occur
not  simply  because  of  a  satisfactory  performance  by  an  individual,  but  based  on  an
evaluation  of  the  nature  of  the  work—for  example,  a  core  competency  inadequately
represented  in  the  current  workforce  or  a  required  proficiency  level  best  achieved
through a permanent civil service hire.

NASA  has  made  virtually  no  use  of  the  Distinguished  Scholar  program,  relying
heavily on its long-established co-op program. The Panel believes that NASA would
be  more  effective  over  the  long-term  by  expanding  its  recruitment  strategy  to  hire
Distinguished Scholars as a way to recruit the next generation of agency scientists,
engineers,  and  administrators.  Despite  some  differences  on  how  best  to  respond  to
NASA’s  workforce  challenges,  our  Panel,  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  Com-
mittee, and the International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers all
agree that rebuilding NASA’s early and mid-career workforce is critical.

Likewise,  the  Panel  noted  that  NASA  has  made  limited  use  of  its  IPA  authority
for  external  placements,  with  no  more  than  seven  each  in  FY  2004  and  FY  2005.
For an agency with changing program needs and priorities and identified underuti-
lized  competencies,  the  IPA  program  offers  an  excellent  opportunity  to  leverage
scarce  salary  dollars  and  FTE  through  negotiated  cost-sharing  arrangements  with
universities, non-profits, State/local governments, and others that might need NASA
expertise. Such a mechanism would allow NASA employees with unfunded work, for

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

example,  to  contribute  meaningfully  to  another  institution  and  further  enhance
their skill base.
Q3. The  NAPA  report  mentions  strategic  partnerships  with  other  federal  agencies
that demand technical skills as a potential opportunity for managing NASA em-
ployees  whose  skills  do  not  align  with  current  NASA  projects.  Could  you  please
elaborate on this aspect of the NAPA report?

A3. Given  NASA’s  workforce  misalignments,  the  Panel  believes  that  the  Agency
could  make  greater  efforts  to  partner  with  other  federal  agencies.  Near  the  begin-
ning of this study, the Academy offered to broker a partnership between NASA and
the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO) to help alleviate NASA’s uncovered
capacity  problem.  Officials  at  the  highest  level  of  PTO  were  interested  in  a  block
of  NASA’s  scientific  and  technical  personnel  becoming  patent  examiners,  on  a  tem-
porary  or  preferably  permanent  basis,  to  reduce  patent  processing  backlogs.  It  was
also  interested  in  accessing  NASA  expertise  to  train  its  patent  examiners  in  state-
of-the art aeronautics, nanotechnology, and other scientific disciplines for which the
Agency typically receives patent applications. PTO was open to reimbursing NASA,
relocating  NASA  employees,  and  considering  the  use  of  NASA  employees  at  their
home centers. In response to this offer, NASA offered no official or strategic agency
encouragement  for  employees  to  participate,  but  chose  to  refer  the  offer  only  to
Ames  Research  Center,  which  posted  the  information  as  an  opportunity  for  indi-
vidual center employees to voluntarily explore on their own.

Despite  its  stated  commitment  to  a  ‘‘flexible,  scalable  workforce,’’  NASA  has  not
vigorously  pursued  other  out-placement  options  in  the  belief  that  future  work  as-
signments will require the skills of current NASA employees, and it would therefore
be imprudent to put significant effort into out-placement. In interviews, some NASA
officials expressed reluctance to directly communicate with employees, both individ-
ually  and  collectively,  about  the  need  to  manage  their  careers  and  take  advantage
of  all  available  opportunities—both  inside  and  outside  of  NASA.  Some  NASA  offi-
cials  even  said  they  were  concerned  that  being  too  forthright  with  individual  em-
ployees about their options would be construed as harassment.

In addition to PTO, the Panel identified other possible federal agencies that could

make use of NASA’s excess competencies:

in climate change and wind tunnels

• The  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  with  whom  NASA  shares  an  interest
• The  National  Institutes  of  Health,  with  whom  NASA  shares  an  interest  in
space implications for medical technology improvements and the lessons to be
learned about microgravity’s impact on health
• The Department of Energy, with whom NASA shares an interest in basic re-
• The  Department  of  Defense,  which  has  similar  need  for  project  and  program

search as well in various elaborate batteries used in space missions

managers within varied engineering disciplines

This  is  a  challenge  across  the  Federal  Government.  Some  agencies  have  excess
competencies  in  areas  that  are  critical  needs  for  other  federal  agencies.  It  may  be
useful  for  the  Federal  Government  to  have  an  informed  broker,  such  as  OPM  or
OMB,  to  identify  opportunities  for  competency  sharing  and  trading  among  federal
agencies.  The  broker  would  be  responsible  for  making  matches  between  federal
agencies with skill deficiencies, whether temporary or long-term, with agencies with
excess  capacity,  undergoing  low  attrition,  or  mission  changes.  In  today’s  environ-
ment, with such rapidly changing technology, the government’s role as financial and
human capital steward is likely to require additional adaptive mechanisms to facili-
tate the government’s effective use and development of its human capital resources.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by David C. Black, President Emeritus, Universities Space Research Asso-
ciation;  Adjunct  Professor,  Physics  and  Astronomy  Department,  Rice  University;
Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Issues  Affecting  the  Future  of  the  U.S.  Space  Science
and Engineering Workforce, National Research Council, The National Academies

Questions submitted by Chairman Mark Udall
Q1. During your oral testimony, you showed a figure that indicates that the number
of  opportunities  for  students  to  gain  hands-on  training  has  been  declining.
Could  you  please  elaborate  on  this  point  and  describe  which  opportunities  have
been declining and why?

A1. The  figure  shown  during  my  testimony  is  included  below  for  your  reference.
There are two major messages in this figure. One is that the vast majority of oppor-
tunities  for  students  to  gain  space  experience  via  involvement  in  payloads  is  found
in the suborbital programs—typically sounding rockets, balloons, and aircraft-based
research  (primarily  high-altitude  aircraft  such  as  NASA’s  WB–57  and  ER–2  air-
planes). While the Explorer and other deep space missions do have student involve-
ment,  it  is  typically  at  the  instrument  level  rather  than  the  full  spacecraft  level.
Moreover, owing to the cost of Explorer missions, relative to that of suborbital mis-
sions,  and  the  associated  longer  timescale  for  project  development,  the  deep  space
missions do not lend themselves as readily to substantial student involvement.

The  second  message  is  that  all  opportunities  for  student  involvement  have  been
in  steady  decline  over  the  past  few  decades.  This  is  most  notable  in  the  sub-orbital
program  that  includes  sounding  rockets,  balloons,  and  aircraft  (where  the  involve-
ment  is  primarily  at  the  instrument  level).  The  reasons  for  this  decline  are  varied.
One  of  the  contributors  to  the  decline  is  the  heavy  emphasis  on  science  return  as
the justification for these missions. This emphasis, while valid, places the lower cost
sub-orbital  missions  at  a  disadvantage  when  compared  with  an  Explorer  mission,
for  example.  In  general,  NASA’s  science  leadership  argues  that  the  ‘‘quality’’  of
science,  measured  in  terms  of  papers  published  or  influence  on  other  researchers,
is  less  for  a  sub-orbital  mission.  Also,  the  quantity  of  science  is  less,  as  judged  by
the amount of data returned. This emphasis on science for the lower cost, more stu-
dent-oriented  missions  ignores  one  of  the  key  aspects  of  these  missions,  workforce
development.  These  missions  give  a  cradle-to-grave  training  experience  in  project

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

management  and  systems  engineering,  both  key  skills  that  are  currently  in  short
supply at NASA. Our committee would like to see proposals for suborbital programs
be  judged  much  higher  (some  committee  members  believe  at  least  50  percent)  on
the merits of the workforce development aspect of the proposal, with the rest of the
weighting  in  the  review  process  being  the  science  that  would  be  accomplished  by
the proposed mission.

Another  factor  in  reduction  of  these  opportunities  is  a  combination  of  funding  re-
ductions as NASA managers look everywhere for funds to cover the increasing costs
of their higher profile missions, as well as a past lack of support for sub-orbital mis-
sions by senior management at NASA. One further point to note here is that launch
opportunities  in  this  country  have  diminished  over  time  making  it  harder  to  find
suitable,  that  is  low  cost  and  relatively  frequent,  rides  into  low-Earth  orbit  for  stu-
dent satellites.
Q2. Your  testimony  referred  to  the  value  of  sub-orbital  programs  in  providing  sys-
tems engineering and project management skills. Could you please explain in de-
tail how the sub-orbital programs help develop these skills?

A2. Sub-orbital  programs  typically  can  be  conducted  from  beginning  to  end  in  a
year or two, while more complex Earth orbital projects may take at least two to four
years.  Both  of  these  timescales  are  consistent  with  meaningful  involvement  of  stu-
dents.  The  shorter  timescale  is  well  matched  to  design  and  build  classes  for  under-
graduates,  or  even  high  school  students,  while  the  longer  timescale  matches  well
with  graduate  student  experiences.  In  addition  to  the  time  match  to  student  activ-
ity,  there  is  an  opportunity  in  these  projects  for  students  to  see  and  experience  all
facets  of  a  major  project.  They  see  what  happens  if  inadequate  attention  is  paid  to
interface  issues,  for  example.  They  learn  to  manage  a  project  on  a  schedule  and  a
budget. Also, they can learn from a failure as much as a success. NASA’s main mis-
sions now cost so much and have so much visibility that many more procedures and
additional  backup  systems  are  added  to  reduce  risk.  This  drives  cost  up  and  keeps
students out of meaningful career development experiences.
Q3. How much do sub-orbital programs typically cost and what is the end-to-end du-
ration  of  such  programs?  What,  if  any  recommendations  did  your  committee
make on how these programs should be funded?

A3. Since our report was issued there has been some change in NASA’s sub-orbital
programs,  particularly  the  sounding  rocket  program.  The  sounding  rocket  program
appeared to be in continuing and serious decline even as late as the issuance of our
report. However, a new NASA Associate Administrator for Science has indicated his
intention  to  revive  the  sounding  rocket  program  by  increasing  its  funding  and  re-
turning  to  a  launch  rate  of  24  flights  a  year  by  FY10.  However,  I  would  note  that
his  goal  for  this  is  to  solidify  the  sub-orbital  program’s  role  in  developing  science
and  also  producing  experienced  principal  investigators  for  science  missions.  Our
committee emphasized that sub-orbital programs are a value to the entire agency—
not  simply  science—because  they  can  provide  experience  in  program/project  man-
agement  and  systems  engineering  that  can  eventually  be  used  in  other  programs,
including human space flight.

According  to  a  presentation  made  by  NASA’s  sounding  rocket  program  office  to
the  Space  Studies  Board  in  June  2007,  after  our  report  was  completed,  NASA’s
sounding  rocket  program  has  seen  a  dramatic  drop  in  flights  over  the  past  decade.
The  program  currently  supports  about  10  principal  investigators  per  year  and  an
annual  flight  rate  of  10  to  20  flights  per  year.  In  contrast  to  promised  increased
funding following the announcement of the Vision for Space Exploration in January
2004,  NASA  made  severe  cuts  to  the  sounding  rocket  program  budget:  $4.2M  in
FY05,  $10.9M  in  FY06,  $9.4M  in  FY07,  and  $11.7M  in  FY08—a  $36M  cut  over  a
four-year  period.  Our  committee  found  that  implementing  the  Vision  will  require
precisely the kinds of skills that the sounding rocket programs provide.

Each  launch  costs  between  $2.5M–$3M  including  operating  costs,  and  a  typical
project lasts from one to three years (the actual flight times, however, are measured
in  minutes).  NASA’s  sounding  rocket  program  has  a  success  rate  of  about  98  per-
cent.  These  factors  make  sounding  rocket  programs  ideal  for  educational  uses  and
allows for students to see a project through from the beginning to the end. The com-
mittee  recommended  NASA  increase  its  investment  in  sounding  rockets  to  provide
ample-opportunities from hands-on flight development experience at a relatively low
cost of failure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

Q4. Both the NAPA and the National Academies reports call for more detailed infor-
mation on the workforce at NASA’s Centers. Could you please discuss in specific
terms  what  information  the  Agency  needs  in  order  to  support  long-term  work-
force planning?

A4. NASA is slowly coming to grips with understanding its workforce issues. In my
view and that of the NRC committee, NASA does not yet understand how to model
its  workforce  and  its  evolution.  They  need  far  better  insight  into  the  skills  that  re-
side  at  the  Agency,  a  better  understanding  of  the  flow  of  programs  and  how  that
affects the civil service workforce, and they need to look outside of NASA to under-
stand better the sources and movements of experienced as well as entry-level profes-
sional  talent  that  is  available.  This  is  a  skill  that  does  not  reside  at  NASA.  They
will  need  to  look  to  outside  expertise  to  help  them  in  both  identifying  the  type  of
information  that  is  needed  to  do  good  workforce  modeling,  and  in  constructing  the
models  to  use  the  data.  NASA,  in  my  opinion,  has  lost  track  to  some  extent  that
it is an enabler of the Nation’s civil space program. It has evolved to a point where
it sees itself as an independent entity and makes policy and other decisions, particu-
larly workforce matters, based on survival of the Agency and its centers rather than
doing the job for the country.
Q5. The NAPA and National Academies reports emphasize that NASA should make

full use of the NASA Flexibility Act of 2004.

Q5a. Did your committee conclude that NASA was underutilizing the Flexibility Act,

and if so, why?

A5a. The  committee  heard  anecdotal  information  from  a  number  of  speakers  that
although the NASA Flexibility Act had helped the Agency, it was still relatively re-
cent and therefore the Agency had not yet been able to adopt it to the fullest extent
(for instance, not all of the relevant offices were aware of the Act’s provisions). The
committee  did  not  conclude  that  there  was  resistance  to  the  Act  at  NASA,  but  did
hear some comments from NASA officials that indicated that even if the Agency was
able to make full use of it, some fine-tuning may still be necessary. This is probably
a subject that is best left to discussions directly between Congress and NASA.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Lee  Stone,  Legislative  Representative,  NASA  Council  of  IFPTE  Locals,

International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers

Questions submitted by Chairman Mark Udall

Centralized HQ Versus Decentralized Center-based Decision-making
Q1. NASA’s workforce strategy involves a transition from a more decentralized Cen-
ter-led  decision-making  process  to  an  agency-wide,  integrated  approach.  What
are  the  Centers’  and  the  IFPTE’s  perspectives  on  how  smoothly  this  transition
is occurring?

A1. The  value  of  centralized  versus  de-centralized  governance  depends  on  the  mis-
sion.  NASA  is  designing  and  preparing  to  build  one  Orion  crew  exploration  vehicle
and two Aries launch vehicles using essentially existing technologies. It is absolutely
critical  for  everyone  to  be  on  the  same  page;  the  value  of  a  single  centralized  focal
point  for  Constellation  program  planning  and  decision  making  is  self-evident.  How-
ever,  for  NASA’s  multifaceted  Science,  Aeronautics,  and  Technology  Development
missions, the value of centralized governance at Headquarters (HQ) is far from obvi-
ous.  Rigid  centralization  schemes  are  known  to  stymie  innovation  and  creativity,
which  are  generally  the  fruits  of  smaller,  more  agile,  and  independent  teams  that
can  tolerate  failure  within  a  less  rigid  schedule  and  budget  structure.  Indeed,  the
Exploration  Systems  Architecture  Study  (ESAS)  plan  is  anything  but  innovative,
born  of  the  necessity  of  meeting  an  urgent  schedule  to  replace  the  Shuttle  with  a
budget  half  that  the  last  time  NASA  was  asked  to  design  a  manned  lunar  space-
craft.  So  up  front,  it  should  be  noted  that  NASA’s  new  management  governance
model  embraced  to  support  the  Constellation  program  may  not  be  appropriate  for
NASA’s other equally important endeavors.

The  wisdom  of  NASA’s  management  plan  aside,  its  centralized,  matrix  manage-
ment  model  has  been  unevenly  applied.  At  its  essence,  matrix  management  is  de-
signed  to  split  management  into  two  equal  branches:  1)  centralized  programmatic
management  authority  is  retained  at  HQ,  and  2)  de-centralized  line  management
authority is delegated to the Centers. There are however two problems with NASA’s
current  implementation  of  matrix  management.  First,  HQ  has  delegated  line  man-
agement responsibilities, yet has not provided the necessary resources and authority
to the Centers to perform this task. NASA’s current governance model has therefore
seriously  weakened  line  management,  which  is  not  the  co-equal  partner  it  needs  to
be  for  mission  success.  This  has  resulted  in  program  management  controlling  all  of
the  financial  resources  and  micromanaging  program  implementation,  and  has  pre-
vented  line  management  from  being  able  to  function  properly  to  the  detriment  of
the  Agency,  its  Centers,  and  its  missions.  Second,  as  a  result  of  this  first  point,  in
order  to  salvage  power  for  its  line  management,  center  management  at  Johnson
Space  Center  (and  to  some  extent  at  the  other  manned  space  flight  Centers)  has
simply hijacked key program management authority and uses that power to protect
its Center from the adverse consequences of NASA’s implementation of lopsided ma-
trix  management  and  full-cost  recovery  of  salary  and  facilities  costs.  While  JSC’s
success at collapsing matrix management by combining key line and program man-
agement  nodes  is  an  understandable,  and  indeed  predictable,  reaction  to  NASA’s
flawed matrix management implementation, the sustained centralization of program
and fiscal authority for manned space programs at JSC continues to be an obstacle
to any bone fide matrix management system centralized at HQ and is a major obsta-
cle to the 10 healthy centers plan.
The governance model and Exploration:

NASA’s manned spacecraft development and manned space flight implementation
are  endeavors  so  massive  and  ambitious  that  they  benefit  from  a  more  centralized
authoritarian leadership strategy. The transition to centralized authority at HQ con-
tinues to be slow and remains incomplete. Indeed, the initial artificial uncovered ca-
pacity  crisis  of  the  last  few  years  was  generated  by  the  programmatic  transfer  of
a  large  chunk  of  NASA’s  personnel  funds  to  Constellation  by  the  Administration,
followed  by  the  refusal  by  Constellation  program  management  (largely  overlapping
with JSC line management) to share these resources appropriately across all NASA
Centers.  The  Administration’s  initial  plan  was  to  retain  funding  and  personnel  at
JSC  and  eliminate  across  the  rest  of  the  Agency,  nearly  3,000  highly  skilled  and
experienced  federal  employees,  predominately  at  the  Research  Centers,  who  were
improperly  deemed  unworthy  of  Constellation  dollars  because  of  a  fictitious  ‘‘skills-
mix’’ problem. If the House and Senate Science committees had not intervened with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

a  Reduction-In-Force  (RIF)  moratorium  (subsequently  extended  by  the  Commerce-
Justice-Science  Appropriators),  that  plan  would  have  been  fully  implemented  last
year. Indeed, the phase-one harassment and buy-out portion of the plan was imple-
mented  resulting  in  the  loss  of  more  than  a  thousand  largely  technical  employees
and  a  significant  decrease  in  morale  across  the  Research  Centers,  but  phase-two  of
the employee elimination plan was luckily averted by direct Congressional interven-
tion.  IFPTE  and  NASA’s  civil  service  workforce  remain  extremely  grateful  for  the
strong  bipartisan  leadership  shown  by  Chairman  Gordon  and  former  Chairman
Boehlert in their timely opposition to the Administration’s ill-devised plan.

In  the  summer  of  2006,  IFPTE  testified  that  NASA’s  uncovered  capacity  crisis
was a fiction created by a deeply flawed accounting process and a program manage-
ment  unwilling  to  accept  that  the  technical  staff  at  Research  Centers  should  play
a  major  role  in  Constellation.  Squeezed  by  the  RIF  moratorium,  last  fall,  Adminis-
trator  Griffin  finally  simply  directed  JSC  to  transfer  meaningful  work  packages  to
the  Research  Centers  and  the  ‘‘crisis’’  dissipated.  Indeed,  Centers  that  last  year  re-
ported hundreds of employees with skills/competencies deemed surplus have now re-
ceived  funding  to  assign  Constellation  work  to  nearly  all  of  them.  The  magical  dis-
appearance  of  the  uncovered  capacity  confirms  that  the  initial  crisis  was  a  fiction
created  by  management  failures,  and  not  by  any  skills  problem  with  the  technical
staff  across  the  Agency.  We  now  have  empirical  proof  that  employees  at  Ames,
Glenn,  JPL,  Langley,  and  Goddard  can  work  well  together  with  employees  at  JSC,
Marshall,  and  KSC  to  the  benefit  of  the  Exploration  mission,  the  Agency,  and  the
Nation. NASA’s employees, distributed across all Centers, stand ready to make Con-
stellation a success and look forward to that opportunity and challenge.

So  why  isn’t  this  the  happy  ending  of  this  scary  fairy  tale?  There  are  two  lin-
gering  clouds  that  loom  ominously.  First,  sustained  underfunding  of  the  Agency  is
still squeezing NASA’s scientists and researchers who do not fully benefit from Con-
stellation  work  packages  that  only  cover  Constellation  development  activities.  This
problem  requires  the  re-balancing  and/or  additional  appropriation  of  funds  to
Science,  Aeronautics,  and  Technology  research  activities  that  have  taken  a  dis-
proportionate  and  unwise  share  of  the  fiscal  hit  imposed  by  NASA’s  inadequate
budget.  Congress  should  act  to  force  a  modest  yet  essential  rebalancing,  which
would only involve about five percent of NASA’s budget. Second, the distribution of
work packages from JSC are still being made begrudgingly so that inadequate num-
bers of civil servant Full-Time Equivalents (FTEs) are being transferred to cover the
required work and few procurement funds are being transferred to cover associated
local  expenses.  Furthermore,  JSC  management  continues  to  co-opt  Advanced  Capa-
bilities  funds  that  should  be  used  to  cover  scientists  and  researchers  engaged  in
longer  term,  non-Constellation,  Research  and  Development  (R&D)  activities.  Ad-
vanced  Capabilities  funding  is  being  diverted  to  meet  unfunded  Constellation  re-
quirements  and  to  cover  disproportionately  JSC  personnel  and  contract  support
staff. Congress should act to prevent the diversion of the few remaining R&D funds
within  the  Exploration  Systems  Mission  to  non-R&D  activities  and  away  from  the
Research Centers.
The governance model and Science & Aeronautics:

NASA’s  broad  research  missions  in  Science  and  Aeronautics  are  less  well  served
by  a  centralized,  distant,  and  bureaucratic  leadership  at  HQ,  detached  from  the
nitty gritty R&D process and overly influenced by transient political interests. Suc-
cinctly  stated,  NASA’s  long-term  R&D  should  be  managed  by  those  most  qualified
to  manage  NASA’s  R&D  activities,  NASA’s  Research  Centers,  with  greater  inde-
pendence  from  the  vicissitudes  of  the  personalities  and  political  winds  at  HQ.  In-
deed, the director of National Institutes of Health understands that he is merely the
custodian of a distributed brain trust that needs nurturing, oversight, and advocacy,
not  intrusive  technical  direction.  The  Institutes  are  largely  autonomous,  the  Lab
Chiefs are largely autonomous, and even the individual PIs are largely autonomous.
That  more  decentralized  structure  not  only  gets  the  job  done,  it  fosters  creativity
and  innovation.  The  Associate  Administrators  for  the  Science  and  Aeronautics  Re-
search  Mission  Directorates  should  follow  that  example  and  embrace  more  muted
and humble roles. In the ideal matrix governance model, program management sets
budgets,  goals,  and  milestones,  while  line  management  assigns  the  technical  work
to  the  appropriate  personnel,  decides  on  the  needed  procurement  and  procurement
mechanisms, implements the program plan, and is accountable for meeting the mile-
stones. Unfortunately, program management has abused its near absolute fiscal au-
thority to co-opt line management’s authority to assign work, to direct local procure-
ments, to manage day-to-day activities at the performing centers, and thus to under-
mine  collective  bargaining  rights  (because  all  Union  contracts  are  with  center  line
management, which is becoming somewhat irrelevant). Any transition to a bone fide

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

matrix management model will require equalizing the balance of authority between
program and line management.
Specific recommendations:

IFPTE asks that Congress:

• Increase  NASA’s  Science,  Aeronautics,  and  Advanced  Capabilities  budgets
and  protect  them  from  being  reprogrammed  overtly  or  covertly  to  Constella-
tion.
• Direct  NASA  to  provide  civil-servant  salaries  and  non-programmatic  travel
along  with  CM&O  directly  to  the  centers,  independent  of  programs,  to  allow
for effective matrix management and to maintain Center capabilities.

• Line  management  would  then  be  empowered  (i.e.,  funded)  to  perform  its
critical  immediate  roles  of  assigning  and  supervising  work  as  well  as  its
longer  term  role  of  keeping  local  intellectual  capabilities  and  facilities
healthy.  Re-empowering  center  management  to  perform  the  latter  role  is
essential because the currently unchecked Program management funding
structure  benefits  from  exploiting  current  resources  for  near-term  mile-
stone at the expense of long-term milestones and institutional infrastruc-
ture. Program management should, however, continue to control procure-
ment funding levels and programmatic travel funds to perform its critical
role  of  setting  budgets,  goals,  and  milestones.  With  this  more  equitable
division  of  resources  and  authorities,  the  short-term  programmatic  and
longer  term  institutional  interests  can  be  properly  balanced  through  co-
operation  between  the  two  branches  of  management.  Program  manage-
ment  would  have  to  negotiate  with  Center  management  for  civil  service
labor,  yet  Center  management  would  still  need  to  align  its  workforce  to
meet  program  needs  in  order  to  acquire  procurement  and  most  travel
funds.

• Direct  NASA  to  move  program  management  of  the  research  activities  of  the
Advanced Capabilities programs to the Research Centers to prevent their sub-
jugation by Constellation or JSC management, and to allow them to maintain
crucial  independent  research  and  technology  development  capabilities  across
NASA’s research Centers.

• Inter-center  competition  and  cooperation  across  multiple  research  pro-
grams assigned evenly across co-equal research centers will prevent paro-
chial interests from dominating programmatic interests.

Abuse of Term Hiring Authority
Q2. Your testimony notes that NASA’s increasing use of ‘‘term’’ hires [hiring for work
that is expected to last between 1–6 years] rather than tenured civil service hires
is,  in  part  jeopardizing  NASA’s  ability  to  attract  the  best  and  brightest  science
and engineering staff.

Q2a. Why do you believe that the use of term hires jeopardizes NASA’s ability to at-

tract the best and brightest?

A2a. When  young  scientists  receive  their  Ph.D.  from  a  world-class  institution
(thereby  completing  20+  years  of  formal  education),  most  begin  to  plot  a  future  for
themselves whereby they can expect a stable and productive research career in their
field  of  choice.  In  some  instances,  a  one-to-three-year  postdoctoral  fellowship  is
sought  in  order  to  obtain  additional  training  to  broaden  their  skills  and  experience
under  the  mentorship  of  a  well-respected  researcher  at  another  elite  institution.
However, within a year or two of receiving their Ph.D., the best and brightest young
scientists  begin  to  seek  a  tenure  track  (hard  money)  research  professorships  at  a
prestigious  university  and  eschew  non-tenure  track  (soft  money)  adjunct  professor-
ships that are contingent on external funding sources. Young biotech scientists and
aerospace engineers have highly lucrative private-sector opportunities in addition to
this  traditional  academic  option.  In  the  past,  NASA  has  competed  successfully  for
its fair share of these individuals by offering a package of advantages that academia
cannot  match:  accelerated  tenure,  no  teaching  requirements,  and  access  to  numer-
ous  sources  of  competed  and  even  directed  Research  and  Analysis  funding  for  mis-
sion-related research projects that nonetheless are largely self-generated. NASA has
been  successful  in  the  past  in  recruiting  even  the  most  competitive  candidates  by
offering  better  job  security,  more  comprehensive  benefits,  cutting-edge  research  op-
portunities, and a very high quality of life. In particular, one of the most rewarding
aspects of a career at NASA has been the ability to remain engaged with an exciting

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

long-term project throughout its lifetime so that one is still around to see one’s tech-
nical  contribution  finally  comes  to  fruition,  as  opposed  to  being  terminated  after  a
few years of performing piece work.

In  the  early  1980’s,  the  Federal  Government  lost  some  of  its  recruiting  leverage
in the arena of benefits when they converted to a less competitive 401k-style domi-
nated  and  less  desirable  retirement  system  (i.e.,  private  sector  and  academia  now
often  offer  better  benefits).  Over  the  last  few  years,  NASA’s  recruiting  problems
have  been  exacerbated  by  three  critical  factors:  the  policy  of  improperly  using  term
offers to circumvent the federal employee tenure process and to assert greater daily
control over its technical staff, the dramatic reduction of NASA research opportuni-
ties available to in-house scientists and engineers to perform self-generated mission-
related R&D, and the full-cost recovery of employee salaries. The latter has created
a hostile and demeaning time-clock punching environment that 1) prevents our best
scientists  and  engineers  from  devoting  an  appropriate  portion  of  their  time  to  dif-
ficult longer-term technical problems (and thus improving/sustaining their technical
skills)  and  2)  forces  them  into  a  full-time  preoccupation  with  short-term  milestones
within  an  autocratic  program  management  system.  NASA’s  best  and  brightest  sci-
entists  and  engineers  have  no  problem  saluting  the  flag  and  working  diligently  to-
wards NASA’s mission goals, but they do not thrive when bossed around on a daily
basis  by  non-technical  administrative  task  masters  obsessed  with  weekly  perform-
ance  metrics,  and  when  deprived  of  nearly  all  independent  research  funding  oppor-
tunities.

As  a  result  of  these  factors,  the  current  senior  technical  workforce  can  no  longer
aggressively  recruit  the  graduating  students  of  their  academic  colleagues  because
they  cannot  say,  in  good  conscience,  that  coming  to  NASA  is  the  best  career  move
for that young student compared to tenure track options at prestigious academic in-
stitutions or lucrative stock options at cutting-edge private high-tech ventures. Word
of  mouth  recruiting  by  NASA’s  technical  staff  (not  by  HR)  is  how  NASA  has  tradi-
tionally gained access to the best and brightest technical employees before they are
even on the market, so that NASA could bring them on board as pre- and post-doc-
toral fellows to focus on NASA relevant training and then hire many of them as per-
manent  civil  servants.  That  proven  recruiting  process  is  now  breaking  down  to
NASA’s peril; as NASA’s pre- and post-doctoral fellowships and permanent S&E po-
sitions dry up, so does its future.

In brief, the best and brightest will not consider term positions at a fiscally unsta-
ble  and  programmatically  chaotic  NASA  a  promising  career  move  when  they  can
take  prestigious  positions  at  UC–Berkeley,  MIT,  Google,  or  other  elite  academic  or
private-sector institutions that will offer them greater intellectual latitude and gen-
uine  respect  often  with  more  lucrative  compensation  packages.  The  bottom  line  is
that  the  key  to  successful  recruiting  of  NASA’s  future  workforce  is  to  be  able  to
promise candidates exciting and stable careers within an intellectually open and re-
spectful  work  environment  that  values  and  features  independent  research  opportu-
nities.  Note  also  that  with  term  positions,  recruitment  becomes  a  recurring  task  as
the  Agency  must  bid  again  and  again  for  skills  as  terms  expire,  or  risk  losing  in-
creasingly  experienced  talent  in  which  it  has  already  invested  considerable  re-
sources.

Over the last four years, NASA’s management has been so overly disrespectful to
its  technical  staff  (term  hiring  being  only  one  facet  of  this  disrespect)  that  serious
harm  has  already  taken  place.  This  disrespect  has  been  part  of  a  well-orchestrated
and  ill-conceived  campaign  to  accelerate  the  attrition  of  NASA’s  senior  technical
staff, a strategy that remains ongoing, albeit tempered in recent months. The other
side of respect is loyalty. NASA employees have traditionally shown tremendous loy-
alty  that  drives  them  to  work  nights  and  weekends,  and  to  forfeit  annual  leave
without financial compensation. But loyalty is a two-way street and permanent sta-
tus  is  at  the  core  of  the  Agency’s  loyalty  to  its  staff.  NASA  employees  were  rudely
awakened  in  February  2004  to  discover  that  Administrator  O’Keefe  had  commis-
sioned a secret plan for the mass lay off of nearly 3,000 employees to cover the un-
funded  mandate  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  That  betrayal  and  the  attend-
ant  scapegoating  of  NASA’s  technical  staff  will  not  soon  be  forgotten.  Although  the
situation  has  improved  recently,  unless  the  Administration  fully  and  openly  re-em-
braces  a  policy  of  respect  for  and  loyalty  to  NASA’s  civil  service  workforce,  NASA
will  no  longer  enjoy  the  recruiting  power  it  has  relied  on  for  decades  and  unwisely
takes for granted.
Q2b. To  what  extent  are  term  hires  being  used  for  the  science  and  engineering  staff

at present?

A2b. In addition to affecting recruitment, the use of term positions also has adverse
ramifications  for  mission  success  because  a  transient  Science  and  Engineering

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

(S&E)  workforce  threatens  safety  (as  esoteric  yet  crucial  knowledge/experience
leaves the Agency when experienced staff leave at the end of their term) and squan-
ders  precious  training  resources  (as  trained  personnel  leave  the  Agency  setting  up
a  requirement  to  train  new  arrivals).  Even  more  importantly,  one  of  the  primary
reasons for according civil servants tenure is so that they can speak truth to power;
tenured  employees  can  speak  up  and  say  something  is  unsafe  without  the  fear  of
losing their jobs, but term employees know full well that the future renewal or con-
version  of  their  position  will  be  jeopardized  if  they  challenge  their  management
chain. The CAIB report warned us clearly that NASA’s schedule and budget driven
management  culture  was  a  primary  cause  of  the  Columbia  disaster;  that  manage-
ment culture is dangerously reinforced by the use of term hires who are dis-empow-
ered,  relative  to  permanent  hires,  to  speak  up  when  schedule  or  budget  is  under-
mining safety and/or mission success.

In fiscal year 1994 (FY 1994), NASA made 181 outside hires for Full-Time Perma-
nent  (FTP)  Science  &  Engineering  (S&E)  staff  and  only  four-term  S&E  hires.  The
S&E  term  percentage  (2.2  percent)  was  less  than  that  found  across  all  employees:
NASA  hired  a  total  of  337  FTP  employees  that  year  and  only  19  term  hires  (5.6
percent).

Over  the  last  three  years,  NASA’s  hiring  actions  have  shown  a  dramatically  dif-
ferent trend. FTP S&E hires numbered only 64, 53, and 36 in FY 2005, in FY 2006,
and so far in FY 2007, respectively, while term S&E hires numbered 174, 227, and
161.  So  we  have  gone  from  a  tiny  fraction  of  S&E  employees  being  hired  as  term
employees in the early 90’s to more than three quarters now.

Even more troubling is that the above term hiring trend appears to be more high-
ly focused on S&E staff. In the same three periods, FTP Professional Administrative
hires  numbered  77,  100,  and  63,  respectively,  while  term  PA  hires  numbered  154,
215, and 121 yielding a ratio closer to about two-thirds term hiring.

In  sum,  over  the  last  three  years,  NASA  has  been  hiring  about  three-quarters  of
its  new  S&E  full-time  outside  hires  under  term  contracts  (as  opposed  to  less  than
three  percent  in  1994)  and  has  been  hiring  more  than  twice  as  many  managers  as
scientists and engineers (as opposed to less than half as many in 1994).

NASA  management  has  created  the  alarming  trends  above  by  imposing  strict
quotas on the hiring of new permanent employees, thus forcing Centers to make im-
proper term hires to fill long-term technical needs more properly served by a perma-
nent  hire.  In  other  words,  one  of  the  premises  of  the  question  ‘‘that  term  hiring  is
for work expected to last between 1–6 years’’ is simply false within NASA’s current
implementation.  Term  hiring  is  performed  because  it  is  generally  the  only  hiring
permitted  by  HQ,  not  because  of  the  specifics  of  the  position.  Furthermore,  center-
based quotas of permanent hires are linked to the number of permanent employees
who leave each center. By arbitrarily linking the departure of ∼3 permanent employ-
ees  to  each  permanent  new  hire  each  Center  can  have,  HQ  is  also  increasing  its
pressure on center management to harass older employees to retire.
The  data  above  are  as  of  6/23/07  and  were  acquired 

from  http://

hqpowerplay.hq.nasa.gov/workforce/moredata.html
Specific Recommendations:
IFPTE asks Congress to:

• Commission  the  GAO  to  audit  NASA’s  use  of  term  positions  over  the  last

three years and determine to what extent that authority has been abused.

• It appears that NASA is not the only federal agency that has been using
non-permanent  S&E  hiring  strategies  that  weaken  the  independence  of
government technical experts, so perhaps this investigation should be ex-
tended  to  all  government  agencies  across  the  executive  branch  that  per-
form scientific or engineering R&D.

• Direct  NASA  to  convert  all  current  terms  positions  to  permanent  status  un-
less they can explicitly demonstrate that, for each term position, the Agency’s
need  for  the  position’s  skill/competency  has  an  unambiguous  program-
matically defined endpoint by the end of the term.

• Merely stating that future funding is unsure is not an adequate rationale

as all future federal funding is by definition uncertain.

• Require  NASA  to  return  to  a  hiring  policy  whereby  all  new  hires  default  to
permanent unless an explicit, written justification is provided explaining why
NASA’s  programmatic  need  for  that  skill/competency  clearly  ends  within  a
specified term of less than six years.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

• This exercise should be performed as proper Human Resource protocol in

the first place so this proposal should not be considered burdensome.

• Cap NASA’s use of term hires at 10 percent of outside hires annually.

In closing, IFPTE is very encouraged by recent changes in NASA’s workforce pos-
ture that appear to indicate a renewed respect for in-house talent and skills. None-
theless,  there  are  a  number  of  remaining  obstacles  in  the  road  ahead;  those  dis-
cussed above are only a few of them. The bottom line is that the National Research
Council  (NRC)  report  indicates  that  NASA  will  face  a  workforce  crisis  in  the  not-
to-distant future unless it immediately starts to educate, recruit, and train the next
generation  of  technical  employees,  who  should  apprentice  under  the  current  NASA
senior technical staff before they retire (indeed, this was the rationale for the rarely
used  retention  bonuses  in  the  Flexibility  Act).  The  Administration  is  not  heeding
that  advice  because,  as  the  Administrator  has  publicly  stated,  NASA  has  not  been
given  adequate  funds  to  do  so.  Over  the  last  decade  and  a  half,  NASA  has  steadily
lost  80  percent  of  its  35-year-old  workforce  and  nothing  is  being  done  to  stop  that
alarming  trend.  IFPTE  adds  its  voice  to  the  urgent  call  by  the  NRC  and  others  for
NASA to renew its intellectual infrastructure before the chain of knowledge and ex-
perience is broken. Congress should act to remedy this increasingly serious situation
by  appropriating  and  sequestering  adequate  funds  for  this  endeavor  and  by  direct-
ing the Administrator to begin an aggressive workforce renewal.

Once  again,  IFPTE  thanks  Chairman  Udall  and  Ranking  Member  Feeney  for
their  keen  interest  in  and  dedication  to  NASA’s  success,  and  for  the  opportunity  to
bring  the  concerns  of  the  NASA  federal  employees  we  represent  to  the  attention  of
your subcommittee.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(91)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION FOR THE RECORD

STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN STEWART,

ACADEMY FELLOW AND MEMBER OF THE
NASA MULTI-SECTOR WORKFORCE PANEL

Mr. Chairman, I appreciated the opportunity to testify before the U.S. House Sub-
committee  on  Space  and  Aeronautics  on  May  17,  2007  on  behalf  of  the  National
Academy  of  Public  Administration’s  NASA  Multi-sector  Workforce  Panel.  The  Pan-
el’s  goal  is  the  same  as  the  Subcommittee’s:  to  ensure  the  health  and  vitality  of
NASA’s  greatest  asset,  its  civil  service  and  contractor  workforce.  At  the  outset,  it
is  important  to  understand  that  the  Panel’s  recommendation  for  additional  human
capital  flexibilities  was  designed  to  provide  NASA  with  authority  to  restructure  its
workforce  to  meet  new  competency  requirements  while  maintaining  essential  em-
ployees regardless of age. The Panel’s recommendation does not authorize NASA to
arbitrarily  reduce  staff  or  to  discriminate  based  on  age.  Unlike  the  mandatory  re-
tirement of civil servants required by federal law until 1979, the proposal would pro-
tect NASA’s ability to maintain essential employees of all ages.

I  am  taking  this  opportunity  to  submit  additional  information  for  the  record  in

four major areas:

• Scope of the Academy’s project
• NASA’s budgetary context
• NASA’s need for proactive workforce management
• Proposals to overcome NASA’s existing civil service constraints

Scope of the Project

This nearly year-long study was not conducted in a vacuum. The Panel and study
team reached out to a wide range of stakeholders, traveled to eight of NASA’s field
centers, and conducted more than one hundred interviews, including meetings with
labor representatives and contractor organizations. I was pleased to serve along-side
five  other  Panel  members  who  believe  strongly  in  NASA.  I  am  a  longstanding
former member of the Aerospace Safety Advisory Panel and for two years served as
staff  director  of  the  U.S.  Senate’s  Subcommittee  on  Science,  Technology,  and  Space
(1977–1979). Three of the other Panel members were long-time NASA executives at
headquarters  and  at  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center.  All  of  us  care  about  NASA  and
want to be responsible stewards of its future.

As  explained  in  my  testimony,  the  Panel  was  asked  to  answer  some  very  specific
questions  about  NASA’s  current  workforce  and  field  structure.  Neither  the  Senate
Appropriation  Subcommittee  nor  NASA  asked  the  Panel  to  evaluate  the  sufficiency
of NASA’s current or projected level of funding. Similarly, we were not asked to con-
duct a detailed assessment of the planned timeline for phasing-out the Space Shut-
tle,  completing  the  International  Space  Station,  developing  the  next-generation
launch  vehicles,  or  establishing  a  permanent  lunar  outpost.  The  Administrator  did
not expect the Panel to make recommendations for dramatic changes to existing pro-
gram plans, timetables, or budgets. The Panel believed its responsibility was to de-
termine what kind of workforce would be required by NASA and to provide guidance
on the work-based criteria and policies needed for the Agency to achieve this desired
state.  Recognizing  that  aeronautics  and  scientific  competencies  will  be  critical  com-
ponents  of  NASA’s  future  workforce,  for  example,  the  Panel  did  recommend  that
NASA  quantify  the  core  workforce  required  to  maintain  and  nurture  these  com-
petencies  over  the  long-term.  The  Panel  cautioned,  however,  that  NASA  needs  to
avoid  looking  at  disciplines  and  programs  in  isolation.  Instead,  it  should  evaluate
competency  needs  and  excesses  across  all  programs  and  avoid  a  stove-piped  ap-
proach to competency management.
Budgetary Context

In  order  to  resolve  NASA’s  workforce  challenges,  others  have  strongly  advocated
for  increased  funding,  a  dramatic  reduction  in  contractor  support,  and  a  return  to
the civil service levels of the 1960s as the panacea for NASA’s workforce challenges.
The  Panel  believes  this  approach  is  inconsistent  with  the  notion  of  managerial  and
taxpayer  accountability.  It  also  ignores  the  fact  that,  with  a  proposed  3.1  percent
increase  in  the  President’s  FY  08  request,  NASA’s  budget  is  already  slated  for  a
larger  increase  than  the  one  percent  average  rate  of  growth  for  other  domestic  dis-
cretionary  agencies.  Although  Congress  certainly  may  appropriate  additional  funds
for  NASA,  I  personally  believe  this  is  unlikely  given  the  ‘‘pay-go’’  system,  which
would  require  any  increases  to  NASA  to  be  paid  for  with  cuts  to  other  important
federal programs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

Unless  Congress  does  decide  to  make  significant,  long-term  increases  to  NASA’s
appropriation,  NASA  will  have  to  deal  with  its  21st  century  challenges  by  devel-
oping  a  more  balanced,  optimally-sized,  and  skilled  workforce  tailored  to  current
and  projected  mission  needs.  NASA  could  facilitate  this  transition  by  adopting  a
more proactive workforce strategy based on the use of innovative strategic planning
mechanisms, objective data reliance, focused organizational health assessments, and
work-based  human  capital  reforms.  This  would  enhance  NASA’s  health  and  ensure
its ability to safely meet its program milestones in a cost effective manner.

Given  the  long-term  fiscal  challenges  facing  this  country,  I  believe  it  would  have
been  irresponsible,  unrealistic,  and  inaccurate  for  the  Panel  to  tell  the  Senate  Ap-
propriations  Subcommittee  that  NASA’s  workforce  problems  could  or  should  simply
be  solved  with  more  money.  Within  the  confines  of  the  projected  budget,  the  Panel
provided  an  objective  assessment  of  the  alignment  of  the  current  NASA  workforce
with the new programs, the Agency’s management strategies, and the tools required
by NASA.

The  Panel  believes  that  NASA  management  must  be  accountable  for  imple-
menting  the  Vision,  approved  by  the  President  and  Congress,  and  setting  priorities
consistent with that Vision and within the budget appropriated.
Proactive Workforce Management

The  Panel  applauds  the  work  of  NASA’s  civil  servants  and  contractors,  acknowl-
edging  them  as  the  Agency’s  greatest  asset.  In  examining  the  civil  service  portion
of  NASA’s  workforce,  however,  the  Panel  believed  that  NASA  should  be  more
proactive in making use of all available flexibilities—both those available to all fed-
eral  agencies  and  those  specifically  authorized  in  the  NASA  Flexibilities  Act  of
2004—to  develop  the  workforce  of  the  future.  Specifically,  we  recommended  that
NASA  expand  its  existing  recruiting  practices  by  establishing  a  nationally  recog-
nized, prestigious program to:

• Attract exemplary applicants with technical and administrative strengths.
• Focus on long-term core competency needs of the Agency.
• Replenish the workforce after decades of hiring freezes.

We  believed  that  the  existing  Distinguished  Scholar  Authority,  authorized  by  the
NASA  Flexibilities  Act,  could  be  used  as  the  lynchpin  for  establishing  such  a  pro-
gram and help NASA to recruit its next generation of leaders.

In  addition,  we  urged  NASA  to  be  much  more  proactive  in  establishing  strategic
partnerships with Federal, State, and local governments, as well as universities and
non-profits.  In  many  cases,  NASA  has  an  excess  of  certain  competencies  that  may
be useful to other organizations. By formally establishing a program to temporarily
or  permanently  out-place  blocks  of  employees  with  competencies  no  longer  needed
by the Agency, NASA would be able to widely share its talent with the Nation. We
recommended that NASA:

• Use inter-agency details for assignments with other federal partners.
• Partner with non-federal entities through the IPA program.

We  also  encouraged  NASA  to  explore  the  possibility  of  strategically  out-placing
some existing research programs that NASA will not need in the future, but are im-
portant  to  the  Nation  as  a  whole.  To  this  end,  we  recommended  that  NASA  head-
quarters identify potential opportunities across the Agency and provide initial seed-
money  to  the  university,  non-profit,  or  foundation  assuming  responsibility  for  the
function.  Affected  field  centers  would  then  be  expected  to  identify  potential  can-
didate institutions within their area and negotiate with them.
Overcoming Constraints

At the same time, we were struck by the significance of existing civil service con-
straints. Even if NASA took all available discretionary actions, we believed it would
not have sufficient flexibility to develop the required workforce. Accordingly, we rec-
ommended  a  package  of  additional  statutory  flexibilities.  Several  of  these  seem  rel-
atively uncontroversial:

for inflation in following years.

• Congress should increase the monetary cap on buy-outs to $35,000 and adjust
• OPM should grant NASA blanket authority to conduct buy-outs over the next
• Congress  should  authorize  NASA  to  temporarily  pay  the  government’s  share
of  health  care  premiums  for  non-retiring  employees  who  agree  to  resign  and
are not otherwise eligible to carry their benefits with them.

five years.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

• OPM  should  grant  NASA  blanket  authority  to  waive  salary  offsets  when  re-

cruiting reemployed federal annuitants for critical areas.

The  Panel  had  two  other  recommendations  that  were  more  controversial  and
would  require  greater  change  within  the  existing  civil  service  system.  First,  we  be-
lieve that NASA deserves the same Reduction-in-Force (RIF) framework as the Na-
tional  Institutes  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST).  The  existing  RIF  system  is
widely  acknowledged  to  be  counterproductive  and  expensive,  as  well  as  harmful  to
federal employees and organizational health. Accordingly, we urged Congress to ex-
empt  NASA  from  the  Title  5  RIF  rules  by  establishing  a  new  RIF  framework  mod-
eled on NIST’s Alternative Personnel Management System. This system would:
• Define competitive areas in a more targeted manner, such as career path.
• Limit both ‘‘bumping’’ and ‘‘retreating’’ to within the same occupational series
• Give enhanced weight to performance.

or specialty.

Second, the Panel believes that Congress should provide NASA with limited emer-
gency authority to invoke a fully eligible individual’s retirement if he or she can no
longer  reasonably  be  utilized  by  the  Agency.  Some  or  all  of  the  following  criteria
would have to be met:

• The employee’s skills are no longer required for mission accomplishment.
• The  employee’s  skills  are  outdated  or  unnecessary,  and  management  deter-
mines  that  retraining  would  not  be  practical,  or  the  employee  is  unwilling  to
update skills.

• Funding for the employee’s existing work is not available.
• The employee’s skills are not easily transferred to other work.

We believe retiring employees should be compensated fairly by being given sever-
ance pay in addition to earned annuities. This emergency statutory authority would
provide  NASA  with  one  means  to  secure  the  expertise  required  for  its  highly  com-
plex mission, while protecting the safety and integrity of the space program.

In  conclusion,  the  Panel  took  very  seriously  its  charge  to  think  creatively  about
ways in which NASA might most effectively plan for its workforce of the future. The
Panel  did  not  make  these  recommendations  without  considerable  study  and  fore-
thought.  Each  recommendation  is  consistent  with  the  goal  articulated  in  NASA’s
Workforce  Strategy:  to  develop  a  flexible,  scalable  workforce.  While  providing  cer-
tain additional flexibilities to NASA to help it address critical competency shortfalls
and  excesses,  the  Panel’s  proposed  package  of  flexibilities  would  preserve  the  best
of the civil service system for the 21st century.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:30 Dec 21, 2007 Jkt 035235 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\SA07\051707\35235 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

